<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89315-0033 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.3-15-89.f2.A1032</DOCID><TEXT><ITAG tagnum="69"><ITAG tagnum="52">9 CFR Part 3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Docket No. 87-004]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Animal Welfare_Standards</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service, USDA.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Proposed rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>We are proposing to amend the regulations for the humanehandling, care, treatment, and transportation of dogs and cats, guineapigs and hamsters, rabbits, and nonhuman primates. The regulations fordogs, cats, and nonhuman primates would be completely revised and rewritten.The regulations for guinea pigs, hamsters, and rabbits would be amended:to revise the space requirements for primary enclosures; to amend the temperaturerequirements in cargo spaces in primary conveyances; and to reinstate varioustransportation requirements. These actions are necessary to update theregulations, to make them more consistent with other Federal regulationsconcerning the handling, care, treatment, and transportation of these animals,and to comply with the recent amendments to the Animal Welfare Act (7 U.S.C.2131, <T3>et seq.</T3>), enacted December 23, 1985. Rewriting the regulationsis also intended to make them easier to understand, thereby increasingcompliance and making them more effective.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATES: </T2>We will consider written comments postmarked or receivedon or before August 14, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESS: </T2>Send an original and three copies of your comments toHelene R. Wright, Chief, Regulatory Analysis and Development Staff, PPD,APHIS, USDA, Room 1000, Federal Building, 6505 Belcrest Road, Hyattsville,MD 20782. Please state that your comments refer to Docket No. 87-004. Commentsreceived may be inspected at the APHIS Public Reading Room, Room 1141,U.S. Department of Agriculture, 14th Street and Independence Avenue, SW.,Washington, DC, 8:00 a.m to 4:30 p.m., Monday through Friday, except holidays.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>Dr. R.L. Crawford, Director, AnimalCare Staff, REAC, APHIS, USDA, Room 268, Federal Building, 6505 BelcrestRoad, Hyattsville, MD 20782, (301) 436-7833.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2><ITAG tagnum="84">General Background and Statutory Information</ITAG>Regulations on the humane handling, care, treatment, and transportationof (1) dogs and cats, (2) guinea pigs and hamsters, (3) rabbits, and (4)nonhuman primates, are contained in 9 CFR Part 3. Subpart A contains theregulations concerning dogs and cats; Subpart B contains the regulationsconcerning guinea pigs and hamsters; Subpart C contains the regulationsconcerning rabbits; and Subpart D contains the regulations concerning nonhumanprimates. The regulations in each of these Subparts include minimum standardsfor handling, housing, feeding, watering, sanitation, ventilation, shelter,and veterinary care. The regulations are issued and enforced by the Animaland Plant Health Inspection Service (APHIS), of the United States Departmentof Agriculture (USDA), under authority of the Animal Welfare Act, as amended(the Act) (7 U.S.C. 2131, <T3>et seq.</T3>).On December 23, 1985, extensive amendments to the Act were enacted (seePub. L. 99-198. ``The Food Security Act of 1985.'') Among other things,the amendments direct the Secretary of Agriculture to promulgate standardsto govern the humane handling, care, treatment, and transportation of animalsby dealers, research facilities, and exhibitors, for exercise of dogs,and for a physical environment adequate to promote the psychological well-beingof nonhuman primates.<ITAG tagnum="84">Previously Proposed Regulations</ITAG>In response to the 1985 amendments to the Act, we proposed, on March 31,1987, to revise 9 CFR Parts 1 and 2. Part 1 includes definitions of termsused throughout our regulations. Part 2 includes general requirements forlicensing and registration of facilities; recordkeeping and identificationof animals; holding periods and facilities; Institutional Animal Care andUse Committees; adequate veterinary care, and other areas of general concernrelevant to the humane care, handling, treatment and transportation ofall animals and individuals subject to our regulations. (52 FR 10292-10322).Documents containing Parts 1 and 2, as revised in accordance with our considerationof the nearly 8,000 comments we received in response to the March 31, 1987proposal, our ongoing consultation with the U.S. Department of Health andHuman Services and other interested agencies, and our experience in enforcingthe regulations, appear elsewhere in this issue of the <T4>Federal Register. </T4>The revised rules for Parts 1 and 2 are publishedfor the sole purpose of soliciting comments on the narrow issue of theinterrelationship of Parts 1 and 2 with the Part 3 standards we are proposingin this document. All comments on this issue should not be combined withsubstantive comments on the Part 3 standards and must reference docketnos. 88-013 and 88-014. We will refer to those documents at various pointsin our discussion of the proposed amendments to Part 3.The revised rule for Part 2 contains provisions and procedures for allowingexceptions by research facilities in compliance with the Animal Welfareregulations, including the standards proposed in this document, when necessaryfor the conduct of biomedical research. Exceptions or deviations from theregulations must first be explained, reviewed, and approved in accordancewith the procedures set forth in Part 2. We refer the reader to 2.30(g),2.35(b)(3), and 2.100, published elsewhere in this issue of the <T4>Federal Register </T4>for these provisions.<ITAG tagnum="84">Consultation and cooperation with other Federal departments, agencies,or instrumentalities</ITAG>The amendments to the Act also direct the Secretary of Agriculture to<ITAG tagnum="21">Consult and cooperate with other Federal departments, agencies, orinstrumentalities concerned with the welfare of animals used for research,experimentation or exhibition, or administration of statutes regulatingthe transportation in commerce or handling in connection therewith of anyanimals when establishing standards pursuant to section 2143 of this titleand in carrying out the purposes of this chapter.</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">(Section 1757, 99 Stat. 1649, Pub. L. 99-198, amending 7 U.S.C. 2145(a))Accordingly, we consulted with the Department of the Interior, U.S. Fishand Wildlife Service (USFWS), which regulates transportation of wild birdsand animals into the United States.The amendments also specifically direct the Secretary of Agriculture to``consult with the Secretary of Health and Human Services prior to issuanceof regulations.'' (See andSection; 1757, 99 Stat. 1649, Pub. L. 99-198, amending7 U.S.C. 2145(a).) The Department of Health and Human Services, throughthe Public Health Service, National Institutes of Health (NIH), currentlyissues guidelines on the care and use of animals studied in biomedicalresearch. The animals include dogs and cats, guinea pigs and hamsters,rabbits, and nonhuman primates. These NIH guidelines are contained in adocument entitled ``Guide for the Care and Use of Laboratory Animals''(NIH Guide or Guidelines).\1\<NOTE/> The Guide is widely accepted by scientific institutions asa primary reference on animal care and use. Compliance with the NIH Guidelinesis not mandatory except to obtain NIH funding, but most research laboratoriesin the United States do comply. While the Animal Welfare Act and regulationsaddress a broader range of activities and facilities than the NIH Guide,Congress' intent in requiring consultation with the Department of Healthand Human Services is to ensure that, whenever possible, the regulationsand the NIH Guidelines are consistent:<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ The NIH Office for Protection from Research Risks publishesanother document called the ``Public Health Service Policy on Humane Careand Use of Laboratory Animals,'' under authority of the Health ResearchExtension Act of 1985 (Pub. L. 99-158, November 20, 1985). However, theregulations in that document concern mainly the use of tranquilizers andother drugs on animals being used in research, appropriate pre- and post-surgicalveterinary care for animals being used in research, and the organizationand operation of animal care committees. These subjects are not coveredin this proposal, and we therefore do not discuss these NIH requirementsin this document.<ITAG tagnum="21">The Conferees expect the Secretary of Agriculture to have full responsibilityfor enforcement of the Animal Welfare Act. However, the Conferees alsorecognize that a portion of the nation's research facilities fall underregulation from more than one agency. While the legislative mandate ofeach agency is different, and they may regulate different aspects of animalcare, it is hoped that the agencies continue an open communications toavoid conflicting regulations wherever possible or practice. [sic]</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">(<T3>See </T3>Conference Report, <T3>Congressional Record </T3>of December 17, 1985, at page H12422.)We consider our mandate to consult with the Department of Health and HumanServices to be extremely important. We realize that having harmonious regulationsthroughout the Federal government on animal welfare matters would eliminateconfusion and simplify compliance for the individuals, including researchinstitutions, subject to those regulations. However, our goal in proposingthese regulations is to provide for the humane care, handling, treatment,and transportation of various animals. If we adopt regulations identicalwith those of other Federal Departments, but those regulations are ineffectiveor inadequate, then we have not met the statutory objective.We have attempted in these proposed regulations to meet both goals whereverwe have determined it is consistent with our responsibility to promoteanimal welfare. To achieve this, we have consulted extensively with NIHrepresentatives concerning standards for the humane care, handling, treatment,and transportation of dogs and cats, guinea pigs and hamsters, rabbits,and nonhuman primates. We have reviewed our existing regulations and theNIH guidelines. In addition, we have considered comments raised by memberagencies of the Interagency Research Animal Committee, which is comprisedof federal agencies that conduct research using animals. We have also consultedwith experts and professional organizations and have sought their recommendationson appropriate standards to accomplish our goal. After considering allthis information, we are proposing extensive revisions to the regulationsin 9 CFR Part 3, Subparts A, B, C, and D. In many cases, we are proposingregulations substantially identical to current NIH Guidelines. That isbecause, in these cases, we believe the NIH Guidelines are appropriateand adequate to provide for the humane care, handling, treatment, and transportationof the animals in question. In other cases, we are proposing to adopt,as our regulations, standards that will provide for the humane handlingand care of animals covered by the Act. We will discuss our proposed changeson a subpart-by-subpart basis. We are proposing to revise Subparts A and D in their entirety in this documentso that the regulations are complete and easier to read. However, we arenot providing an explanation for nonsubstantive revisions. <ITAG tagnum="84">Subpart A_Dogs and Cats</ITAG>Regulations for humane handling, care, treatment, and transportation ofdogs and cats are contained in 9 CFR Part 3, Subpart A. These regulationsinclude minimum standards for handling, housing, feeding, watering, sanitation,ventilation, shelter from extremes of weather and temperature, veterinarycare, and transportation. It should be noted that the proposed regulations apply only to live dogsand cats, unless indicated otherwise. We are proposing to revise and rewrite the current regulations based onour experience administering them. We are also proposing to amend our regulationsto add requirements for the exercise of dogs. This is specifically requiredby the 1985 amendments to the Act. (See Section 1752, 99 Stat. 1645, Pub.L. 99-198, amending Section 13 of the Act). We discuss each topic coveredin our proposed regulations below. Housing Facilities and Operating StandardsCurrent andSection;andSection; 3.1 through 3.3 provide requirements for facilitiesused to house dogs and cats. Current andSection; 3.1, ``Facilities, general,''contains regulations pertaining to housing facilities of any kind. It isfollowed by current andSection; 3.2, ``Facilities, indoor,'' and andSection;3.3, ``Facilities, outdoor.'' We are proposing to amend these sectionsto provide for an environment that better promotes the health, comfort,and well-being of dogs and cats. We are also proposing to add sectionsthat provide regulations specifically governing two other types of facilitiesused to house dogs and cats, sheltered housing facilities, and mobile ortraveling housing facilities. The term ``sheltered housing facility'' isdefined in Part 1, published elsewhere in this issue of the <T4>Federal Register</T4>, as ``a housing facility which provides the animalswith shelter; protection from the elements; and protection from temperatureextremes at all times. A sheltered housing facility may consist of pensor runs totally enclosed in a barn or building, or of connecting inside/outsideruns or pens with the inside pens in a totally enclosed building.'' Theterm ``mobile or traveling housing facility'' is also included in Part1, and is defined as ``a transporting vehicle such as a truck, trailer,or railway car, used to house animals while traveling for exhibition orpublic education purposes.''Some of the regulations we are proposing for housing facilities are applicableto housing facilities of any kind. As in the current regulations, thesestandards of general applicability would be included in one section, proposedandSection; 3.1. that would also include many of the provisions in currentandSection; 3.1. Additionally, we are proposing amendments to the currentregulations that are specific to particular types of housing facilities,and are including those provisions in separate sections of the proposedregulations. In some cases where the current regulations would be unchangedin substance, we have made wording changes to clarify the intent of theregulations. Housing facilities, generalIn proposed andSection; 3.1(b), we are proposing to add the requirementsthat a dealer's or exhibitor's housing facilities be physically separatedfrom any other business. When more than one dealer maintains facilitieson the premises, it can be difficult to determine which dealer is responsiblefor which animals and for the overall conditions. To avoid this difficulty,we are proposing to require that housing facilities other than those maintainedby research facilities and federal research facilities be separated fromother businesses. This can be done by using a security fence or by conductingeach business in a separate building. For example, if a security fenceis used, it would have to be constructed so that it prevents unauthorizedhumans, and animals the size of dogs, skunks, and raccoons, from goingthrough or under it. We are not imposing this requirement on research facilitiesbecause they are often part of a larger sponsoring establishment, suchas a university or pharmaceutical company, and responsibility for animaland site conditions rests with that establishment. Therefore, we have notencountered the enforcement difficulties noted above with research facilities.Proposed andSection; 3.1(b) would also require that housing facilities andareas used for storing animal food and bedding be kept free of any accumulationof trash, weeds, and discarded material, in order to prevent an unsanitarycondition and problems with diseases, pests, and odors. The need for orderlinessapplies particularly to the areas where animals are maintained in the housingfacilities. These areas would have to be kept free of clutter, includingequipment, furniture, and stored material, and materials not necessaryfor proper husbandry practices. We are proposing to include requirements concerning housing facility surfacesthat are common to all types of facilities in proposed andSection; 3.1(c).We are proposing to include requirements specific to particular types offacilities in separate sections. In andSection;3.1(c)(1), we propose to requirethat the surfaces of housing facilities either be easily cleaned and sanitized,or be removable or replaceable when worn or soiled. These provisions wouldalso apply to houses, dens, and other furniture-type fixtures or objectswithin the facility. Proposed andSection;3.1(c)(1) would also require that any surfaces that comein contact with dogs and cats be free of jagged edges or sharp points thatmight injure the animals, as well as rust that prevents the required cleaningand sanitization. Because we recognize that as long as water is used toclean animal areas, metal parts will rust, we would allow rust on metalsurfaces, as long as it does not reduce structural strength or interferewith proper cleaning and sanitizing. Section 3.1(c)(2) would require that all surfaces be maintained on a regularbasis and that surfaces that cannot be easily cleaned and sanitized bereplaced when worn or soiled. Section 3.1(c)(3) would require that hard surfaces that come in contactwith dogs or cats be cleaned daily and sanitized at least every two weeks,and as often as necessary to prevent any accumulation of excreta and diseasehazards. Section 3.10(b) provides for various methods of sanitizing primaryenclosures and food and water receptacles. Because these methods are effectivein general for sanitization of hard surfaces that cats and dogs come incontact with, any of them could be used for the sanitization required byandSection;3.1(c). Floors made of dirt, sand, gravel, grass, or other similarmaterial would have to be raked and spot-cleaned daily, since sanitizationis not practicable, and the flooring material would have to be replacedif raking and spot-cleaning are not sufficient to eliminate odors, diseases,pests, insects, or vermin infestation. All other surfaces would have tobe cleaned daily and sanitized when necessary to satisfy generally acceptedprofessional and husbandry practices. In the current regulations, andSection;3.1(b) provides regulations for waterand electric power. It specifies that reliable and adequate water and electricpower must be made available ``if required to comply with other provisionsof this subpart.'' In this proposed rule, provisions concerning water andelectric power are set forth in andSection;3.1(d). We are proposing thereto eliminate the qualifying statement cited above, and to <T3>require </T3>that all facilities have reliable and adequate electricpower and mechanically pressurized potable running water for the dogs'and cats' drinking needs, for cleaning, and for carrying out other husbandryrequirements. Based on our inspections of dealer, exhibitor, and researchfacilities, we believe that dog and cat facilities subject to the regulationscannot be properly cleaned and maintained without electric power and potablewater under pressure. We would require that a pressurized water systembe used to ensure that the water supply is of sufficient quantity and availabilityto meet the needs of the animals and the facility. We are proposing in andSection;3.1(e) to expand the regulations in currentandSection;3.1(c) concerning proper storage of food and bedding supplies.We would retain the requirements that food and bedding be stored so asto protect them from vermin infestation or contamination, and that perishablefood be refrigerated. Additionally, we are proposing requirements to ensurefurther the quality of the food and bedding used by animals, and thereforeof the area in which the animals are housed. We would specify that suppliesof food and bedding be stored in containers to protect the supplies fromspoilage as well as from infestation and contamination. The supplies wouldhave to be stored off the floor and away from the walls, to allow cleaningaround and underneath them. All food would have to be stored so as to preventcontamination or deterioration of its nutritive value. Open supplies offood and bedding would have to be stored in leakproof containers with tightlyfitting lids. Substances toxic to dogs and cats would not be allowed tobe stored in animal areas or in food storage and preparation areas. Proposed andSection;3.1(f) would continue to require that housing facilitiesprovide for removal and disposal of animal and food wastes, bedding, deadanimals, and debris, as provided in current andSection;3.1(d). We are proposingto clarify this requirement so that it includes all fluid wastes and toinclude a provision that arrangements must be made for removal and disposalof wastes at least daily, and more often if necessary. The proposed regulationswould also require that trash containers be leakproof and be tightly closedwhen not in use, and that no forms of animal waste, including dead animals,be kept in food and animal areas. Requirements for drainage are currently contained in andSection;andSection;3.2(e)and 3.3(d), under the sections concerning indoor facilities and outdoorfacilities, respectively. Since all types of animal housing facilities,including our proposed categories of sheltered housing facilities, andmobile or traveling housing facilities, must have some way of disposingof waste and liquids, we would consolidate all drainage and waste disposalrequirements in proposed andSection;3.1(f). Both current andSection;andSection;3.2(e) and 3.3(d) require that a suitablemethod of eliminating excess water be provided. That requirement wouldbe retained and expanded to pertain to sheltered and to mobile or travelinghousing facilities as well. Current andSection;3.2(e) requires that any drainsused be properly constructed and kept in good repair to guard against foulodors. Additionally, where closed drainage facilities are used, they mustbe equipped with traps and be installed so that they prevent any backupof sewage onto the floor. Those requirements would be retained and expandedfor indoor facilities, and the proposed expanded provisions would alsoapply to other types of facilities where such drainage is appropriate.We would require that disposal and drainage systems also minimize verminand pest infestation, and disease hazards. As part of this safeguard, wewould require that any sump or settlement pond, or similar system for drainageand animal waste disposal, be located an adequate distance from the animalarea of the housing facility. We would also require that puddles of waterin animal areas be promptly mopped up or drained so that the animals staydry. The requirement in current andSection; 3.1(e) that washing facilities beavailable to animal caretakers for their own cleanliness would be retainedand would appear in proposed andSection; 3.1(g). Categories of Housing Facilities The current regulations specify two kinds of housing facilities, ``indoor''and ``outdoor.'' These terms are defined in Part 1 of the Animal Welfareregulations, published elsewhere in this issue of the <T4>Federal Register. </T4>(<T3>See </T3>companion docket no. 88-013). Briefly, an indoor housing facilityis defined as an enclosed structure or building with environmental controlsthat is used to house animals. An outdoor housing facility is defined asa structure, building, land, or premises, used to house animals, that cannotbe temperature controlled and that does not have a completely enclosedtemperature-controlled shelter. We recognize that these two categoriesof housing facilities do not cover all of the wide variety of facilitiesused to house dogs and cats. For example, certain facilities, such as thosein which animals have access to pens in a building, but also have accessfrom their pens to outside runs, fall somewhere between ``indoor'' or ``outdoor''facilities. Another ``grey area'' involves traveling animal shows. In orderto clarify the intent and applicability of the regulations, we are proposingto add provisions for two additional types of housing facilities that areused to house dogs and cats: ``sheltered housing facilities,'' and ``mobileor traveling housing facilities.'' A sheltered housing facility is definedin Part 1 of the regulations to mean a facility that provides animals withshelter and protection from the elements and temperature extremes at alltimes, such as a building with a connecting inside/outside run or pen.A mobile or traveling housing facility is defined in Part 1 to mean a transportingvehicle such as a truck, trailer, or railway car, used to house animalswhile traveling for exhibition or public education purposes. (<T3>See </T3>companion docket no. 88-013, published elsewhere in this issueof the <T4>Federal Register.</T4>) Temperatures in Housing Facilities Enclosed housing facilities_that is, indoor facilities, the sheltered portionof sheltered housing facilities, and mobile or traveling facilities_wouldbe required to provide heating, cooling, and ventilation for the health,comfort, and well-being of dogs and cats housed there. The heating andcooling requirements would be set forth for each of the above categoriesin andSection;andSection;3.2(a), 3.3(a), and 3.5(a) respectively. The ventilationrequirements would be set forth in andSection;andSection;3.2(b), 3.3(b), and3.5(b) respectively.In establishing minimum temperatures for these facilities, the proposedregulations take into account whether a particular dog or cat housed thereis acclimated to relatively low temperatures, and whether for some otherreason, either because of breed, age, or condition, a dog or cat shouldnot be subjected to certain low temperatures. In andSection; 3.2(a) of thecurrent regulations for indoor facilities, the minimum temperature allowedis 50 anddegrees;F for all dogs and cats in those facilities that are notacclimated to lower temperatures. We are proposing that in indoor, sheltered,and mobile or traveling housing facilties, the minimum temperature allowedcontinue to be 50 anddegrees;F (10 anddegrees;C) for dogs or cats not acclimatedto lower temperatures. Because some dogs cannot be acclimated to lowertemperatures, we would also apply the 50 anddegrees;F minimum to breeds ofdogs or cats that cannot tolerate lower temperature without stress anddiscomfort (e.g., short-haired breeds such as beagles, greyhounds, andDoberman), and to dogs and cats that are sick, aged, young, or infirm.The minimum temperature for all other dogs and cats would be 35 anddegrees;F(1.7 anddegrees;C), except in indoor facilities, where the minimum temperaturefor all other dogs and cats would be 45 anddegrees;F (7.2 anddegrees;C) In the current regulations, there is no maximum temperature specified forindoor housing facilities, although auxiliary ventilation is required whenthe temperature rises to or above 85 anddegrees;F (29.5 anddegrees;C). In thisproposed rule, we establish a maximum temperature of 95 anddegrees;F (35anddegrees;C) for indoor facilities, mobile or traveling facilities, andthe sheltered part of sheltered housing facilities, when those facilitiescontain dogs or cats. For each of those categories of shelters, auxiliaryventilation, such as fans or air conditioning, would have to be used whenthe temperature rises to or above 85 anddegrees;F (29.5 anddegrees;C). Because outdoor facilities cannot be temperature-controlled, we believeit is necessary to judge a dog's or cat's suitability for outdoor housingon an individual basis. As provided in proposed andSection; 3.4(4)(1), adog or cat could not be kept in an outdoor facility if (1) it is not acclimatedto the temperatures prevalent in the area or region where the facilityis located; (2) it is of a breed that cannot tolerate the prevalent temperaturesof the area without stress or discomfort (such as short-haired breeds incold climates); or (3) it is aged, young, sick or infirm. We recognizethat in some situations, particularly in the case of dogs or cats obtainedfrom pounds, it will not be known whether animal has been acclimated toprevailing temperatures. Therefore, in proposed andSection; 3.4(a)(2), weprovide that if a dog's or cat's acclimation status is unknown, it mustnot be kept in an outdoor facility in any month in which, during the preceding5 years, the temperature at the facility has been less than 35 anddegrees;F(1.7 anddegrees;C).Ventilation of Housing FacilitiesThe requirements for ventilation of indoor housing facilities that areset forth in andSection; 3.2(b) of the current regulations would be retainedin the proposal, and would be extended to apply to all sheltered portionsof sheltered, and mobile or traveling, housing facilities to provide forthe health, comfort, and well-being of dogs and cats. Based on our inspectionsof dealer, exhibitor, and research facilities, we are proposing to add(1) that ventilation must also be provided to minimize ammonia levels inthese housing facilities; (2) that ventilation in mobile or traveling facilitiesmust minimize exhaust fumes; and (3) that in indoor housing facilities,the relative humidity must be maintained between 30 and 70 percent. Althoughthe 30-70 percent range would apply to all dogs and cats, we expect generallyaccepted professional and husbandry practices to be followed in providinghumidity levels appropriate to particular breeds of dogs and cats. The30-70 percent range corresponds to the recommendations contained in theNIH Guide. We are not proposing to require that precise humidity levelsbe maintained in sheltered housing facilities or mobile or traveling facilities.The configuration of many sheltered facilities makes humidity control impracticable,and mobile or traveling housing facilities may travel into many differentparts of the United States, with varying levels of humidity. Lighting in Housing FacilitiesThe proposed regulations would retain the requirement in andSection; 3.2(c)of the current regulations that indoor housing facilities have ample lightto permit routine cleaning and inspection. We are proposing to extend thisrequirement to all of the enclosed housing facilities included in the proposedregulations. We are also proposing to require in each case that eithernatural or artificial light be provided for at least 8 hours each day,corresponding to the natural period of daylight. Our experience inspectinglicensees' and registrants' facilities has shown us that in the past somelicensees and registrants have kept dogs and cats in darkened rooms throughoutmost of the day. In the case of indoor housing facilities and mobile ortraveling housing facilities, we would require that if only artifical light,such as fluorescent light, is used, it must provide full-spectrum illumination.Sheltered facilities, by their nature, allow the animals access to naturallight, so the requirement for full-spectrum illumination would not be necessaryfor those facilities. Also, we would retain the requirement in the currentregulations for indoor facilities that primary enclosures be placed soas not to expose to the animals in them to excessive light, and we wouldextend that requirement to sheltered enclosures. An example of excessivelight would be a situation where an animal is housed in the top cage ofa stack of cages, near a lighting fixture.Specific Provisions for Indoor Housing Facilities Section 3.2(d) of the current regulations, regarding the interior surfacesof indoor housing facilities, requires that those surfaces be substantiallyimpervious to moisture and readily sanitized. In andSection; 3.2(d) of theproposed regulations, we would retain the requirement that all surfacesbe impervious to moisture, but would make an exception in the case of ceilingsthat are replaceable. An example of this would be a suspended ceiling withreplaceable panels. The proposed requirements concerning interior surfacesare more stringent for indoor housing facilities than for any other typeof facility. Only in indoor facilities, for example, would ceilings haveto be either impervious to moisture or replaceable. This is because indoorfacilities generally operate on one ventilation system, and any diseaseorganisms or excessive odors that occur in the facility might spread throughoutthe facility, requiring a thorough cleaning or replacement of all interiorsurfaces.Specific Provision for Sheltered Housing Facilities In proposed andSection; 3.3(d) regarding sheltered housing facilities, wewould require that dogs and cats be provided with adequate shelter andprotection from the elements.In order to maintain sanitary conditions in sheltered housing facilities,we would estabish the following requirements in andSection; 3.3(e). The followingareas would have to be impervious to moisture: (1) indoor floor areas incontact with the animals; (2) outdoor floor areas not exposed to the directsun or made of a hard material such as wire, wood, metal, or concrete,in contact with the animals; and (3) all walls, boxes, houses, dens, andother surfaces in contact with the animals. Outside floor areas in contactwith the animals and exposed to the direct sun could consist of compactedearth, sand, gravel, or grass.Specific Provisions for Outdoor Housing Facilities The intent of andSection; 3.3 of the current regulations is to provide adequatestandards for the care of animals housed outdoors. However, our inspectionsof dealers' and exhibitors' facilities in climates with temperature extremeshave indicated that some licensees are not meeting what we believe shouldbe minimum standards for the treatment of dogs and cats. Specifically,we believe that the regulations need to be made more stringent regardingthe types of dogs and cats that can be kept outdoors, and regarding whatshelter is necessary for dogs and cats kept outdoors. Therefore we areproposing to revise the current requirements for outdoor facilities, tomake them more clearly defined and more stringent. We have discussed earlier in this document the categories of dogs and catsthat must not be kept in outdoor housing facilities. With regard to thetype of shelter required for dogs and cats housed outdoors, we believethat the current regulations should be expanded to specify what is necessaryfor better and more humane treatment of the dogs and cats. In essence,the current regulations require that dogs and cats be provided with sufficientshade to protect them from the direct rays of the sun, shelter to keepthem dry during rain or snow, and shelter when the atmospheric temperaturefalls below 50 anddegrees;F. (10 anddegrees;C). Additionally, bedding or someother protection is required when the ambient temperature falls below thatto which the dog or cat is acclimated.In andSection; 3.4(b) of this proposed rule, we require that all outdoorfacilities housing dogs or cats include a shelter structure that is accessibleto all animals in the facility, and that is large enough to allow all animalsin the structure to sit, stand, and lie in a normal manner, and to turnabout freely. As proposed in  andSection; 3.4(d), the shelter structure wouldhave to: (1) Provide adequate shelter and protection from the cold andheat; (2) be protected from the direct rays of the sun and the direct effectof wind, rain, or snow; (3) have a wind break and a rain break at its entrance;and (4) contain clean dry, bedding material. We are also proposing in andSection;3.4(b) that in addition to the shelter structure, there would have to bea separate outside area of shade provided, large enough to contain allthe animals at one time and to protect them from the direct rays of thesun. This shaded area would give the animals relief on hot days, when theywould be unlikely to seek shelter in an unventilated structure.In proposed andSection; 3.4(c), we would require that all building surfacesthat are in contact with dogs or cats in outdoor housing facilities beimpervious to moisture. Metal barrels, old refrigerators or freezers, andthe like would not be permitted as shelter structures. The floors of outdoorhousing facilities could be of compacted earth, sand, gravel, or grass,but would have to be kept clean. Primary EnclosuresWe are proposing to amend current  andSection; 3.4, ``Primary enclosures.''The current section provides general requirements for construction andmaintenance of primary enclosures, uniform space requirements for eachdog or cat housed in a primary enclosure, and provisions regarding litterand resting surfaces for cats and the tethering of dogs on chains. We areproposing to expand the current general requirements, to add some new requirements,and to clarify the existing requirements in accordance with the intentof the amendments to the Act. The proposed regulations regarding primary enclosures, contained in proposedandSection; 3.6, would require that all primary enclosures meet certain minimumrequirements that we believe are necessary for the safety and well-beingof dogs and cats. A primary enclosure is defined in Part 1 as ``any structureor device used to restrict an animal to a limited amount of space, suchas a room, pen, run, cage, compartment, pool, hutch, or tether.'' Includedamong the primary enclosures subject to the regulations would be thoseused by circuses, carnivals, traveling zoos, educational exhibits, andother traveling animal acts and shows. Proposed andSection; 3.6(a) wouldcontinue to require that primary enclosures be structurally sound and maintainedin good repair to protect the animals from injury, to contain them, andto keep predators out. We would also require that the primary enclosurekeep unauthorized humans out. We would continue to require that the primaryenclosures enable the animals to remain dry and clean, that they providethe animals with convenient access to food and water, that they providesufficient space for the dogs and cats to have normal freedom of movement,and that their floors be constructed in a manner that protects the animalsfrom injury. We would add the requirements that the primary enclosuresbe constructed without sharp points or edges, and that they provide sufficientshade to the animals in the enclosures and protect them from temperatureextremes and other weather conditions that might be uncomfortable or hazardousto the animals. We would also require that the primary enclosures be easilycleaned and sanitized. However, if the floors of primary enclosures consist of earth, sand, gravel,or grass, we would require that they be replaceable, rather than easilycleaned and sanitized. Additional Primary Enclosure Requirements for Cats We are proposing to change the space requirements for cats. In general,the proposed regulations would base how much space a cat should have onthe animal's weight, and whether it is a nursing mother. The space requirementsin andSection;andSection; 3.4(b) (1) and (3) of the current regulations areuniform for all cats, regardless of size, and require that each cat begiven a minimum of 2.5 ft\2\, with room to turn about freely, and to easilystand, sit, and lie in a confortable normal position. We believe, basedon our inspections of research facilities, that the current minimum spacerequirements should be increased for all cats. Additionally, because theweight of a cat is a good indicator of its overall size, we believe thatfloor space requirements should distinguish between cats of different weights.Our proposed standards would provide cats with the space we believe isnecessary and at the same time make our regulations correspond to the NIHGuide for the Care and Use of Laboratory Animals. In proposed andSection;3.6(b)(1), we would require that weaned cats weighing 8.8 lbs (4 kg) orless be provided with at least 3.0 ft\2\ (0.28 m\2\) of floor space, andthat cats weighing over 8.8 lbs (4 kg) be provided with a minimum of 4.0ft\2\ (0.37 m\2\) of floor space. Additionally, we would require that eachqueen with nursing kitten be provided with an additional amount of floorspace, equivalent to at least 5 percent of her minimum required floor spacefor each nursing kittens in the litter. For example, five nursing kittenswould require a 25-percent increase and 10 nursing kittens would requirea 50-percent increase. The minimum floor space required would be exclusiveof any food, water, or litter pans, and the height of the primary enclosurefor cats would have to be at least 24 inches (60.96 cm). All cats housed in the same primary enclosure would have to be compatible.The requirement in current andSection; 3.4(b)(3) that no more than 12 adultnonconditioned cats be housed in the same primary enclosure would be retainedand set forth in proposed andSection; 3.6(b)(2). In addition, the followingrestrictions would apply: queens in heat could not be housed in the sameprimary enclosure with sexually mature males, except for breeding; queenswith litters and kittens under 4 months of age could not be housed in thesame primary enclosure with any other adult cats, except when maintainedin a breeding colony; and cats with a vicious or aggressive dispositionwould have to be housed separately. In andSection; 3.6(b)(3), we are proposing to retain the current requirementthat a receptacle with litter be provided to contain excreta. The current standards for cats in andSection; 3.4(a)(2)(ii) state that theremust be a solid resting surface in each primary enclosure that will comfortablyhold all occupants at the same time, and that the resting surface be elevatedif the enclosure holds two or more cats. We are proposing to require inandSection; 3.6(b)(4) that all such resting surfaces be elevated, even ifonly one cat is in the enclosure, and to clarify that the resting surfacesnot be counted as part of the minimum floor space. The resting surfaceswould have to be impervious to moisture, and would have to be either easilycleaned and sanitized, or easily replaceable when soiled or worn. We are proposing to provide, in andSection; 3.6(b)(5), that cats in mobileor traveling shows or acts may be kept, while the show or act is travelingfrom one temporary location to another, in transport containers that complywith all requirements of andSection; 3.14 of this subpart other than themarking requirements in andSection; 3.14(a)(6). When the show or act is nottraveling, the cats would have to be placed in primary enclosures thatmeet the minimum requirements of andSection; 3.6. Mobile or traveling showsand acts normally remain in one location for several days and then moveto another location, with the movement taking a day or less. Because theanimals are less subject to injury in smaller enclosures while traveling,we would allow the use of transport cages during this time. When not traveling,however, the cats would have to be placed in primary enclosures that complywith the minimum space requirements and other requirements of andSection;3.6.Additional Primary Enclosure Requirements for Dogs In proposed andSection; 3.6(c), we would retain the formulas in andSection;3.4(b)(2) of the current regulations for calculating the floor space fordogs [(length of dog in inches + 6) andmultiply; (length of dog in inches+6) = required square inches of floor space; required square inches/144= required square feet]. Because of the great variation in size and bodyconformation among the various species of dogs, we believe the presentformula for calculating space based on body length is more appropriatethan a formula based on the weight of the dog. Space requirements basedon weight do not allow for the differences in body conformation among differentbreeds of dogs, such as bulldogs and whippets or greyhounds. Space requirementsbased on body length do allow for differences in body conformation andwould therefore be retained as a more appropriate method for determiningminimum space requirements. We are also proposing the require that theminimum height of a primary enclosure be at least 6 inches above the highestpoint of the body (normally the ears) of the tallest dog in the enclosurewhen standing in a normal position.As with cats, nursing mothers would have to be provided with additionalspace. In proposed andSection; 3.6(c)(1)(ii), we would require that eachbitch with nursing puppies be provided with an additional amount of floorspace, equal to 5 percent of her minimum floor space, for each nursingpuppy in the litter. In andSection; 3.4(b)(2)(ii) of the current regulations, requirements areset forth for dog houses with chains used as primary enclosures for dogskept outdoors. In andSection; 3.6(c)(2) of the proposed regulations, we wouldexpand those regulations and would apply the expanded regulations to applyto dogs that are tethered by any means, and not just by chains. We wouldretain the current requirement that a dog that is tethered be kept frombeing entangled, and would add the requirements that the dog not be ableto come into physical contact with other dogs in the housing facility,and be able to roam to the full range of the tether. We would retain thecurrent requirement that the tether be of the type commonly used for thesize dog involved, and that the tether be attached to the dog by a well-fittedcollar. Additionally, we propose to explicitly require that the collarmust not cause trauma or injury to the dog. The proposed regulations includethe following examples of types of collars that would be prohibited: collarsmade of wire, flat chains, chains with sharp edges, and chains with rustyor nonuniform links. As in the current regulations, the tether would haveto be at least three times the length of the dog as measured from the tipof its nose to the base of its tail. We would require that the tether beattached to the front of the dog's shelter structure or to a post in frontof the shelter structure, and that it allow the dog convenient access tothe shelter structure and to food and water containers. We are also proposing that dog housing area where chains or tethers areused must be enclosed by a perimeter fence at least 6 feet in height, soas to protect the dogs, to contain them, and to keep animals that sizeof dogs, racoons, and skunks from going through or under it. All dogs housed in the same primary enclosure would have to be compatible.The provision in andSection; 3.4(b)(2) limiting to 12 the number of nonconditionedadult dogs permitted to be housed in the same primary enclosure would beretained in proposed andSection; 3.6(c)(3). Additionally, that proposed paragraphwould contain the following provisions: bitches in heat must not be housedin the same primary enclosure with sexually mature males, except for breeding;bitches with litters must not be housed in the same primary enclosure withother adult dogs, and puppies under 4 months of age must not be housedin the same primary enclosure with adult dogs, except when maintained ina breeding colony; and dogs with a vicious or aggressive disposition mustbe housed separately. We are also proposing to provide, in andSection; 3.6(c)(4), that dogs inmobile or traveling shows or acts may be kept, while the show or act isbeing transported from one temporary location to another, in transportcontainers that comply with all requirements of proposed andSection; 3.14of this subpart, other than the marking requirements in andSection; 3.14(a)(6).When the show or act is not traveling, the dogs would have to be placedin primary enclosures that meet the minimum requirements of andSection; 3.6.Mobile or traveling shows and acts normally remain in one location forseveral days and then move to another location, with the movement takinga day or less. Because the animals are less subject to injury in smallerenclosures while traveling, we would allow the use of transport cages duringthis time. When stopped and not traveling, however, the dogs must be placedin primary enclosures that comply with the minimum space and other requirementsof andSection; 3.6. As explained above, we are also proposing similar provisionsregarding cats in mobile or traveling shows or acts. VarianceWe understand that the proposed minimum space requirements for dogs andcats might require persons subject to the Animal Welfare regulations torebuild or remodel their facilities and to expend previously unanticipatedand unbudgeted monies for new primary enclosures and fixtures. In someinstances, major structural modifications might be required to satisfythe proposed space requirements. Until the necessary adjustments were made,many registrants and licensees would not be in compliance with the proposedrequirements.In cases where the effective date of the regulations would not coincidewith a facility's fiscal year, we are aware that budget planning and fundingprocedures for the next fiscal year would take some time. Once funds havebeen appropriated, facilities would require additional time to make thenecessary space modifications. To allow facilities sufficient time to conformwith the proposed minimum space requirements, we are proposing to includea mechanism for issuing variances to eligible persons. This mechanism wouldbe similar to that already in place for licensees and registrants in SubpartE_``Specifications for the Humane Handling, Care, Treatment and Transportationof Marine Mammals.''A ``variance'' would be issued, in writing, by the Administrator of APHIS,and would allow an eligible registrant or licensee to continue operatingeven though not fully in compliance with the minimum space requirementsfor dogs and cats, including minimum space requirements for the exerciseof dogs.The variance would be limited in scope both as to time and to the primaryenclosures covered by it, and would specify the portions of the applicant'sfacilities to which it applied.Registrants and licensees maintaining or handling dogs or cats, havingdogs or cats on their premises or under their control or supervision, andnot complying with the minimum space requirements proposed in andSection;3.6, could apply for a variance. Facilities that are under constructionor that are in the design or preliminary construction stages on the datethese regulations become effective would not be eligible for a variance,since they could adapt their construction to comply with them. However,a facility that is so nearly complete that it would require substantialmodification at a previously unbudgeted and significant cost to bring itinto compliance would be eligible for a variance.A variance could be granted, at the sole discretion of the Administrator,for up to 2 years. We believe that this would allow sufficient time fora registrant or licensee to raise the necessary funds and to contract forthe required work, as well as to purchase whatever fixtures or equipmentwere necessary for it to comply with the minimum space requirements. Oneextension of up to 1 year could be granted by the Administrator if he orshe determined that it was necessary, based upon the facts presented inthe application for extension. The extension would be granted if justifieddue to unforeseen situations that prevented full compliance during thevariance period. As an example, unforeseen circumstances for research facilitiescould be nonallocation of public funds to make the necessary expenditures.An application for a variance would be required within 60 days of the effectivedate of these regulations and would have to be in writing. According tothe proposed regulations, it must list, in detail, specific reasons whythe variance was being requested, and each of the minimum space requirementsthe facility cannot meet. It must identify the species and number of dogsand cats that would be affected by the variance, and must state the amountof time necessary for the applicant to come into compliance and the estimatedcost of compliance.We are proposing to require a statement from the attending veterinarianconcerning the age and health status of the dogs and cats affected by thevariance, and addressing whether granting the variance would be detrimentalto the affected dogs and cats.As is presently the case for marine mammals, the Administrator could requirethe submission of an outside independent expert report, if the Administratorbelieves it would assist him or her in determining whether the grantingof a variance would be detrimental to the health and well-being of theaffected dogs and cats. The applicant would bear the cost of the expertreport.The Administrator would grant an application for a variance if he or shedetermined it was justified, or would deny it if he or she determined thatit was not justified or that granting it would be detrimental to the healthand well-being of the dogs and cats affected. The grant or denial wouldbe in writing. The applicant could request that the Administrator reconsiderhis or her decision to deny an application, in accordance with the requirementsof andSection; 3.6(d)(4). Similarly, a request for an extension would begranted by the Administrator if he or she determined that it was justified,or denied if he or she determined that it was not justified or that grantingit would be detrimental to the health and well-being of the dogs and catsaffected. The grant or denial of the extension would also be in writing.The applicant could request that the Administrator reconsider his or herdecision to deny an application for an extension, in accordance with therequirements of andSection; 3.6(d)(5). If the extension were granted uponreconsideration, it would be retroactive to the termination date of theinitial variance.Variances would be revocable for bad faith, such as a false representationin the initial application or in the request for extension. They couldalso be revoked if the purposes for which they were issued were not beingcarried out, or if detrimental to the health and well-being of the dogsor cats affected.Exercise and Socialization for DogsIn accordance with the 1985 amendments to the Act, we have developed standardsfor the exercise and socialization of dogs and are proposing a new andSection;3.7, titled ``Exercise and socialization for dogs.'' This section wouldbe divided into four subsections: social contact while being housed, held,or maintained; release for exercise and socialization; methods and periodof exercise; and exemptions from exercise.Social Contact for DogsUnder the provisions for social contact in proposed andSection; 3.7(a), wewould require that all dogs housed, held or maintained by any dealer, exhibitor,or research facility be maintained in compatible groups. We are proposingexceptions to this provision however, for certain situations that involveeither the provisions of an animal care and use procedure approved by aresearch facility's Committee, or the health and well-being of the dogs.Because of the social nature of dogs, we are also proposing to require,with similar exceptions, that all dogs be able to see and hear other dogs.If a dog is unable to see and hear other dogs simply because it is theonly dog in a facility, we would require that it receive positive physicalcontact with humans at least once a day. ``Positive physical contact''is defined in Part 1 as ``petting, stroking, or other touching, which isbeneficial to the well-being of the animal.'' (<T3>See </T3>companion docket no. 88-013, published elsewhere in this issueof the <T4>Federal Register</T4>.) This contact would have to total at least 60minutes each day and could be given in one or more periods.Release for Exercise and SocializationProvisions for the release of dogs for exercise and socialization are setforth in proposed andSection; 3.7(b). With certain exceptions that are explainedbelow, we are proposing to require that the following categories of dogs,if housed, held, or maintained by any dealer, exhibitor, or research facility,be released at least once a day for exercise and socialization: (1) Dogsthat are kept in individual cages or that are kept individually in pensor runs that provide less than four times the space required for that dog,and that do not allow visual and physical contact with other dogs; and(2) dogs housed, held, or maintained in groups that are not provided withthe greater of 80 sq. ft. of space or 150 percent of the minimum spacerequired for all dogs in the group. In some cases, a dog could be physicallyrestricted from other dogs and still receive what we consider adequatesocial contact with other dogs. For instance, the required socializationcould include a dog's being able to nuzzle another dog through a chainlink fence.However, dogs housed, held, or maintained individually would not have tobe released if they are kept in pens or runs that provide at least fourtimes the required space for that dog, and that allow the dogs visual andphysical contact with other dogs. Also, in certain cases, the approvedanimal care and use procedure might prohibit the dogs' release for exerciseand socialization. In those cases, the dogs would have to be maintainedin pens or runs that provide each dog with at least twice the minimum floorspace set forth in andSection; 3.6(c)(1) of the proposed subpart with regardto primary enclosures. The exercise area would have to be at least 80 squarefeet, except that the area would have to provide each dog with at leasttwice the minimum floor space required by proposed andSection; 3.6(c)(1).Dogs housed, held, or maintained in groups would not have to be releasedfor exercise if the dogs are maintained in pens or runs that provide thegreater of 80 square feet or 150 percent of the space each dog would requireunder proposed andSection; 3.6(c)(1) if maintained separately. The exercisearea would have to be the greater of 80 square feet or 150 percent of theminimum space requirement in andSection; 3.6(c)(1), as calculated for alldogs in the exercise area. For example, the following calculations mightbe used in the case of six beagles housed together. A 28-inch beagle wouldrequire a minimum floor space of 8 square feet. Therefore, 150 percentof six times the minimum per-beagle requirement of 8 square feet is 72square feet. Since that is less than 80 square feet, the larger space wouldbe required. We believe that 80 square feet is a generally accepted minimumstandard, based on comments we received from interested parties in responseto a request for information.The exercise period for all dogs that are released for exercise would haveto be at least 30 minutes each day, and could be provided in one or morerelease periods. The consensus of APHIS veterinarians with training andexperience in the care of dogs is that 30 minutes of daily exercise isa reasonable minimum for maintenance of a dog's health and well-being.Methods of ExerciseProposed andSection; 3.7(c) provides that the method or type of exerciseor release period used may be determined by the attending veterinarianand may consist of one or more methods. Suitable methods would include:walking on a leash; release into a room; release into a run or pen withmore than 80 square feet of floor space; or some other similar type ofarrangement. While forced exercise methods such as treadmills, carousels,or swimming would not be prohibited, they would not be considered acceptableforms of exercise for the release periods. Congressional intent with regardto the Act was to give dogs an <T3>opportunity </T3>for exercise, not to <T3>force </T3>them to exercise.Record of ExerciseUnder proposed andSection; 3.7(d), the licensee or registrant would haveto keep a record of each dog's release for exercise. These records wouldbe subject to APHIS inspection.Exemptions from ExerciseWe recognize that certain situations will require an immediate responsefrom facility personnel when a dog's welfare requires that it be providedless than the minimum standards for release for exercise. We are thereforeincluding a provision in proposed andSection; 3.7(e) that would authorizean attending veterinarian to exempt or restrict a particular dog from itsrequired exercise and social release period, if he or she determines thatit is necessary to do so for the dog's health, condition, or well-being.The exemption would have to be recorded by the attending veterinarian,who would be required to review the grant of exemption at least every 30days to determine if it is still warranted.FeedingIn proposed andSection; 3.8(a), concerning feeding requirements for dogsand cats, we are proposing to make minor changes to the feeding requirementsin current andSection; 3.5(a). In addition to the current provisions, wewould require that food given to a dog or cat be appropriate for the animal'sage.We are proposing to make minor additions in andSection; 3.8(b) to clarifythat food receptacles must be used for dogs and cats, and must be locatedso as to minimize contamination by pests as well as by excreta, and soas to be protected from rain or snow. Feeding pans would either have tobe made of a durable material that can be easily cleaned and sanitized,or be disposable and discarded after each use. We are proposing to requirethat food containers that are not discarded be cleaned daily and be sanitizedbefore being used to feed a different dog or cat or social grouping ofdogs or cats, and, as currently required, be sanitized at least once everytwo weeks. Self-feeders for the feeding of dry food would have to be cleanedand sanitized regularly. Measures would have to be taken to prevent molding,deterioration, and caking of the food. Any of the sanitization methodsallowed in proposed andSection; 3.10(b)(3) could be used for the sanitizationrequired in proposed andSection; 3.8.WateringCurrently, andSection; 3.6 contains provisions for offering liquids to dogsand cats and for the cleaning and disinfection of watering receptacles.Section 3.9 of the proposed rule would continue to require that potablewater be offered at least twice daily, if it is not continually available,and would add the requirement that water receptacles be sanitized beforebeing used to water a different dog or cat or social grouping of dogs orcats.Cleaning of Primary EnclosuresWe are proposing to revise and reword the provisions in current andSection;3.7, and to include them in proposed andSection; 3.10, to clarify the intendedrequirements for sanitation and other forms of hygiene. The revised sectionwould be titled ``Cleaning, Sanitization, Housekeeping, and Pest Control.''Currently, andSection; 3.7(a) requires that excreta must be removed froma primary enclosure ``as often as necessary to prevent contamination ofthe dogs or cats contained therein and to reduce disease hazards and odors.''This wording has resulted in differences of opinion between inspectorsand regulated persons as to what constitutes ``as often as necessary.''Therefore, in andSection; 3.10(a), we are proposing to change this wordingto require that excreta and food waste be removed from primary enclosuresor from under primary enclosures at least daily and as often as necessary.This daily cleaning requirement would apply to all types of housing facilitiesand to primary enclosures with grill-type floors, and to the ground areasunder raised runs with wire or slatted floors. Our experience indicatesthat daily cleaning is necessary to prevent the accumulation of feces andfood waste and to reduce disease hazards, pests, insects, and odors. Weare also proposing to require that when a primary enclosure is cleanedby steam or water, any dog or cat in the enclosure be removed during thecleaning process, to prevent the animal from being involuntarily wettedor injured.Sanitization of Primary Enclosures and Food and Water ReceptaclesThe provisions of proposed andSection; 3.10(b) regarding sanitization ofprimary enclosures and food and water receptacles would be basically thesame as those in andSection; 3.7(b) of the current requirements, except thatwe would allow the option of sanitizing with live steam under pressure.Additionally, we would make minor editorial changes to the current regulations.HousekeepingIn proposed andSection; 3.10(c), we would revise and reword andSection; 3.7(c)of the current regulations regarding housekeeping to clarify that paragraph'sintent. The current regulations require that premises be kept free of trashaccumulations and be kept clean enough and in good enough repair to protectthe animals and facilitate the husbandry practices required by Subpart3 of the regulations. We would retain the current requirements, but wouldadd language to clarify that one of the aims of the housekeeping provisionsis to keep premises rodent-free; additionally, we would specify what wewould require as good housekeeping practices. We would specify that premisesmust be kept free of accumulations of trash, junk, waste products, anddiscarded matter such as wood, bricks, and abandoned cars. Weeds, grasses,and bushes would have to be controlled so as to facilitate cleaning andpest control, and to protect the dogs' and cats' health and well-beingfrom hazards such as fox tails, burrs, sharp twigs, and fires.Pest ControlThe provisions of proposed andSection; 3.10(d) regarding pest control wouldbe basically the same as those in andSection; 3.7(d) of the current requirements.We are proposing some minor revisions to simplify the language used. Weare also proposing to clarify that a pest control program is necessaryto promote the health and well-being of the dogs and cats at a facilityand to reduce contamination by pests in animal areas.EmployeesCurrent andSection; 3.8 requires that there be a sufficient number of employeesto maintain the prescribed level of husbandry practices required by SubpartA and that husbandry practices be under the supervision of an animal caretakerwith a background in animal husbandry or care. We are proposing minor revisionsto this section in proposed andSection; 3.11 to make clear that this requirementis imposed upon every person subject to the regulations and that the burdenof verifying and ensuring that the supervisor and other employees are appropriatelyqualified is on the employer subject to the regulations. We are not proposingto prescribe a specific number of employees for each facility, becausethe number of employees needed will vary according to the size and configurationof the facility, and according to the number and type of animals housedthere. We would require that a facility have enough employees to carryout proper feeding, cleaning, observation, and other generally acceptedprofessional and husbandry practices.Social Grouping We are proposing to slightly revise current andSection; 3.9 regarding socialgrouping of dogs and cats in order to reduce the stress suffered by certaindogs and cats. Under proposed andSection; 3.12(d), we would allow dogs andcats to be maintained together in the same primary enclosure, or to bemaintained in the same primary enclosure with other species of animals,if they are compatible. The present regulations require that dogs and catsbe kept separate from each other, and from other animals, regardless ofhow well they get along together, or whether they are distressed by separationbecause they have been raised together and are compatible. If dogs andcats are not compatible with each other or with other animals, keepingthem in the same primary enclosure would continue to be prohibited. Transportation Standards <ITAG tagnum="81">Consignments to Carriers and Intermediate Handlers</ITAG>The current obligations imposed upon carriers and intermediate handlers(defined in Part 1 of the regulations) would be expanded to ensure thewell-being of dogs and cats during transport in commerce. Certain prerequisitesmust be satisfied before carriers and intermediate handlers may acceptdogs and cats for transport in commerce. Additionally, the carriers andintermediate handlers had certain duties to fulfill after the shipmenthas reached its destination. Various obligations are presently containedin current andSection;andSection; 3.11 and 3.14. We are proposing to consolidatethem in one section, proposed andSection; 3.13, and to add some additionalones that are necessary for the dogs' and cats' welfare. The reader should note that our proposed regulations do not specificallyrefer to operators of auction sales, unlike the current regulations. Thedefinition of the term ``dealer'' was amended in 1976 to include any personwho ``negotiates the purchase or sale'' of animals for research, teaching,exhibition, or use as a pet. Operators of auction sales are therefore dealers.However, we did not remove the reference to them in the 1977 amendmentsto the regulations. We are proposing to do so now, to clarify the regulations.Accordingly, all references to dealers in the regulations would includeoperators of auction sales. We would remove from the regulations the requirements that certificationsaccompanying shipments of dogs and cats include an ``assigned accreditationnumber'' (as provided in current andSection; 3.11(c)(4)), because the programunder which accreditation numbers are assigned has not been implemented.Proposed andSection; 3.13(c) would require that written instructions concerningfood and water requirements for each dog and cat in the shipment be securelyattached to the outside of the primary enclosure before a carrier or intermediatehandler can accept it for transport. This requirement is contained in currentandSection; 3.14(d). The instructions would have to be easily noticed andread. Current andSection; 3.14 also requires that adult dogs and cats begiven food at least once every 24 hours after acceptance for transportation,and water at least once every 12 hours after acceptance for transportation.It is conceivable under these regulations that a dog or cat could havebeen fed up to 24 hours before being consigned for transport in commerceand would then not be offered food for another 24-hour period. To avoidthis occurrence, we are proposing to add a certification requirement toproposed andSection; 3.13(d) that would require that a carrier or intermediatehandler not accept a dog or cat for transport in commerce unless certificationby the consignor accompanies the animal and specifies in writing the dateand time each dog and cat was last provided food and water before acceptancefor transport. Proposed andSection; 3.16 would require that the time periodsfor feeding and watering the dogs after acceptance for transport beginwith the time of the last feeding and watering before acceptance for transport.To avoid situations where the carrier or intermediate handler would haveto provide food and water immediately after accepting the animals, we wouldrequire that the certification also state that the dogs and cats were providedwater within the 4 hours before delivery to the carrier or intermediatehandler, and were provided food within 12 hours before delivery to thecarrier or intermediate handler. Carriers and intermediate handlers would not be allowed to accept dogsand cats for transport unless the certification described above is signedand dated by the consignor, and the time of the execution of the certificationis included. This certification as well as others required in proposedandSection; 3.13 would have to include the tag number or tattoo assignedto each dog and cat under andSection; 2.50 of the regulations. The certifications of the consignor regarding the acclimation of a dogor cat to lower temperatures than those prescribed in current andSection;andSection;3.16 and 3.17 of the regulations (included in proposed andSection;andSection;3.18 and 3.19) would be clarified. Proposed andSection; 3.14(f) would clarifythe provisions in andSection; 3.11(c) to require that the temperatures towhich a dog or cat is exposed must meet generally accepted temperatureranges for the age, condition, and breed of the animal, even if it is acclimatedto temperatures lower than those prescribed in the regulations. A carrieror intermediate handler would not be permitted to expose a dog or cat totemperatures lower than those prescribed by the regulations, unless a veterinariancertifies that the animal is acclimated to such lower temperatures, andunless the veterinarian includes in the certification the minimum temperatureto which the animal may be exposed. Proposed andSection; 3.13(g) would retain the provision in current andSection;3.11(d) that requires the carrier or intermediate handler to attempt tonotify the consignee of the arrival of the animal upon arrival, and every6 hours after arrival. Proposed andSection; 3.13(g) would also include limitationson how long a dog or cat can be held at a terminal facility while waitingto be picked up by the consignee. The same time limitations are imposedunder Part 2 of the regulations, andSection; 2.80, ``C.O.D. shipments'' (<T3>see </T3>companion docket no. 88-014, published elsewhere in this issueof the <T4>Federal Register</T4>), so that the carrier or intermediate handlermust attempt to notify the consignee for 24 hours after arrival, then mustreturn the animal to the consignor or to whomever the consignor designatesif the consignee cannot be notified. If the consignee is notified and doesnot take physical delivery of the dog or cat within 48 hours of notification,the carrier or intermediate handler must likewise return the animal tothe consignor or to whomever the consignor designates. Proposed andSection;3.13(g) would also require that carriers and intermediate handlers continueto maintain dogs and cats in accordance with generally accepted professionaland husbandry practices as long as the animals are in their custody andcontrol and until the animals are delivered to the consignee or to theconsignor or to whomever the consignor designates. We would require thatthe carrier or intermediate handler obligate the consignor to pay for expensesincurred by the carrier or intermediate handler in returning the animalto the consignor. All of these certifications and notification requirements would help minimizeand alleviate many of the stresses of travel for dogs and cats and accordinglyare necessary for their general welfare and well-being. Primary Enclosures Used to Transport Dogs and CatsWe are proposing to reformat current andSection; 3.12, which concerns primaryenclosures used to transport dogs and cats, and to move those provisionsto proposed andSection; 3.14. Additionally, we are proposing to revise thecontents of several paragraphs in the section, and add requirements forsurface transportation. When the transportation standards were rewrittenin 1978 to incorporate the 1976 amendments to the Act concerning the commercialtransportation of animals, the existing standards for surface transportationwere inadvertently omitted. Since that time, the standards have pertainedto the commercial transportation by common carrier and only a few subsectionshave pertained to surface transportation by private vehicle. This omissionhas caused numerous difficulties in the enforcement of standards regardingsurface transportation of dogs and cats, and in the prosecution of personswho have improperly handled and transported dogs and cats by private surfacevehicle. We are therefore proposing to reinstate the surface transportationstandards that were inadvertently omitted in 1978.We would require in andSection; 3.14(a) that dogs and cats be shipped inprimary enclosures. In addition to the requirements in current andSection;3.12(a) regarding construction of primary enclosures used for transportation,we are proposing to require in andSection; 3.14(a) that the primary enclosurebe constructed so that: (1) The animal being transported is at all timessecurely contained within the enclosure and cannot put any part of itsbody outside of the enclosure in a way that could injure the animal orpeople; (2) any material used in or on the enclosure is nontoxic to theanimal; and (3) if a slatted or wire mesh floor is used in the enclosure,it be constructed so that the animal cannot put any part of its body throughthe spaces between the slats or through the holes in the mesh. Unless thedogs and cats are on raised floors made of wire or other nonsolid material,the primary enclosure would have to contain enough previously unused litterto absorb and cover excreta.In addition to retaining the cleaning and sanitization requirements thatcurrently appear in andSection; 3.12(e), we would also require in proposedandSection; 3.14(b) that if the dogs or cats being transported are in transitfor more than 24 hours, either the enclosures be cleaned and the litterreplaced, or other means, such as moving the animals to a different enclosure,be used to prevent the soiling of the dogs or cats by body wastes.In proposed andSection; 3.14(c), we set forth ventilation requirements morerestrictive than those in the current regulations by removing two of thecurrent options for primary enclosure configurations with regard to ventilation.The current regulations allow the primary enclosures to have ventilationopenings on either two, three, or four sides. Studies made by the CivilAeromedical Institute, Federal Aviation Administration, Oklahoma City,OK, indicate that maximized ventilation with regard to transportation cratesis beneficial to the well-being of dogs, by allowing them to adjust betterto the high temperatures and humidity encountered when shipped in warmweather. These studies also indicate that, within reason and for shortperiods of time, increased ventilation in transportation crates is notdetrimental to dogs during cold weather. Therefore, we are proposing torequire that there be ventilation openings on each of the four walls ofprimary enclosures used to transport dogs and cats, and that the ventilationopenings total at least 8 percent of the total surface of each wall, withthe total combined surface area of the ventilation openings comprisingat least 14 percent of the total combined surface area of all the wallsof the primary enclosure.Section 3.12(h) of the current regulations requires that a primary enclosurethat is permanently affixed to a primary conveyance so that the front openingof the enclosure is its only source of ventilation must face either theoutside of the conveyance or an unobstructed aisle or passageway. Becauseprimary enclosures that open directly to the outside of the conveyancemay expose the animals in the enclosure to the elements, we are proposingin andSection; 3.14(c)(3) to require that enclosures with a front openingopen only to an unobstructed aisle or passageway. We are also proposingin andSection; 3.14(c)(3) to require that the ventilation openings of primaryenclosures permanently affixed to a conveyance be covered with bars, mesh,or smooth expanded metal having air spaces. Under the current regulations,andSection; 3.12(b) requires that live dogs or cats transported in the sameprimary enclosure be of the same species and be maintained in compatiblegroups. We are proposing to retain this wording in proposed andSection; 3.14(d),with the added provision that dogs and cats that are private pets, areof comparable size, and are compatible, may be transported together inthe same primary enclosure. Based on our observations of shipments of dogsand cats and on information received from pet owners and dealers, we havedetermined that shipping companion animals individually may cause themmore stress than shipping them together.We are also proposing in andSection; 3.14(d) that: (1) Puppies or kittens180 days of age of less may not be transported in the same primary enclosurewith adult dogs or cats other than their dams; (2) dogs or cats that areaggressive or vicious must be transported individually in a primary enclosure;and (3) female dogs or cats in season (estrus) must not be transportedin the same primary enclosure with any male dog or cat.The requirement in andSection; 3.12(c) that each dog or cat transported ina primary enclosure have sufficent space to turn about freely in a standingposition, and to sit, and lie in a natural position would be retained andmoved to proposed andSection; 3.14(e)(1).<ITAG tagnum="81">Transportation by Air</ITAG>Because certain requirements for primary enclosures used in surface transportationwere omitted from the 1978 revisions to the regulations, the provisionsin current andSection; 3.12(d) regarding the number of animals that may betransported in a primary enclosure are designed only for air transportation.We are therefore proposing to set forth the provisions of current andSection;3.12(d), with some amendments, in proposed andSection; 3.14(f), titled ``Transportationby air.'' We are proposing that a maximum of two live dogs or cats, 6 monthsof age or more, that are comparable in size, may be transported in thesame primary enclosure when shipped by air. The present standard allowsonly one dog or cat, 6 months or more of age, to a container. Althoughthe current regulations were establish to minimize stress on animals beingshipped, we have determined from our observations at airports, and frominformation received from pet owners and dealers, that it is often morestressful for a dog or cat to travel alone than in an enclosure with acompanion animal.We are also proposing that a maximum of two live puppies, 8 weeks to 6months of age, of comparable size, and weighing over 20 lb (9 kg) eachmay be transported in the same primary enclosure. Present standards allowonly one such puppy per primary enclosure. The present standards also allowonly two live puppies and kittens, 8 weeks to 6 months of age, but notweighing over 20 lb (9 kg) each, to be shipped in the same primary enclosure.We are proposing that it be permissible to transport a maximum of threesuch puppies or kittens in the same primary enclosure. As we noted above,we believe it is appropriate to allow an animal being shipped the opportunityfor companionship, and the small size of the animals described by thisprovision would allow three animals to be shipped comfortably in standardair shipping enclosures. In proposed andSection; 3.14(f)(4), we would retainthe provision in current andSection; 3.12(d) that weaned puppies or kittensless than 8 weeks old and of comparable size, or puppies or kittens thatare less than 8 weeks old and are littermates accompanied by their dam,may be shipped in the same primary enclosure to research facilities. Thisprovision is limited to research facilities by the Act.<ITAG tagnum="81">Transportation by Surface Vehicle</ITAG>We are proposing to add a new andSection; 3.14(g) regarding transportationby surface vehicle. These provisions would reinstate primary enclosurerequirements that were inadvertently omitted when the standards for thecommercial transportation of dogs and cats were revised in 1978. We areproposing that a maximum of four dogs or cats may be transported in thesame primary enclosure when shipped by surface vehicle, provided all othertransportation requirements in proposed andSection; 3.14 are complied with.We would allow shipment of more dogs and cats in surface vehicle enclosuresthan in air shipping enclosures for several reasons. First, standard enclosuresfor surface transportation are larger than than those customarily usedfor air transportation. Additionally, when animals are transported by surfacevehicle, there is more opportunity for the driver or another person tocheck on the animals to ensure that their health is being maintained andthat the animals are compatible.Weaned live puppies or kittens less than 8 weeks of age, or puppies orkittens that are less than 8 weeks of age, are littermates, and are accompaniedby their dam, would be permitted to be transported in the same primaryenclosure when shipped to a research facility, including federal researchfacilities.<ITAG tagnum="81">Documents Accompanying Animals</ITAG>Proposed andSection; 3.14(h) would require that shipping documents accompanyingthe shipments either be maintained by the operator of the conveyance orbe securely attached in a readily accessible manner to the outside of theprimary enclosures in a way that allows them to be detached for examinationand securely reattached. Instructions for food and water and for administrationof drugs, medication, and other special care would have to be attachedto each primary enclosure in a manner that makes them easy to notice, todetach for examination, and to reattach securely.<ITAG tagnum="81">Primary Conveyances</ITAG>To protect the health of dogs and cats during transportation in commerce,the regulations in current andSection;andSection; 3.16 and 3.17 prohibit animalsin transporting devices or holding areas of terminal facilities from beingsubjected to temperatures above or below a specified range. Temperatureis also of concern when animals are being transported in the cargo spacesof primary conveyances. Until 1978, requirements concerning allowable temperaturesin primary conveyances were included in andSection; 3.13 of the regulations.However, these requirements were inadvertently omitted from the regulationsduring the last major revision in 1978.The intervening years have demonstrated the need to reinstated these requirementsfor two principal reasons: (1) The current requirements concerning temperaturesin primary conveyances are inconsistent, because dogs and cats in transportingdevices and in holding areas of terminal facilities must not be exposedto temperature outside a specified range, but dogs and cats in animal cargospaces of primary conveyance_mainly cars and trucks_are not afforded thethe same protection; and (2) as air freight rates have risen dramaticallyduring this time, increasing numbers of animals are being shipped by surfacetransportation_some for very long distances_with no provision that theanimals are not subjected to extremes of temperature.Under the requirements for air transportation in proposed andSection; 3.15(d),we would specify that during transportation, including time spent on theground, live dogs and cats must be transported in cargo areas that areheated or cooled as needed to maintain the required ambient temperature.The cargo areas would also have to be pressurized while the conveyanceis in the air. In proposed andSection; 3.15(e), we would require that duringsurface transportation, auxillary ventilation, such as fans, blowers orair conditioning, be used in animal cargo spaces containing live dogs orcats when the ambient temperature within the animal cargo space is 85 anddegrees;F(29.5 anddegrees;C) or higher. Additionally, the ambient temperature wouldnot be permitted to exceed 95 anddegrees;F (35 anddegrees;C) at any time; norto exceed 85 anddegrees;F (29.5 anddegrees;C) for a period of more than 4 hours;nor to fall below 45 anddegrees;F (7.2 anddegrees;C) for a period of more than4 hours; nor to fall below 35 anddegrees;F (1.7 anddegrees;C) at any time.We are proposing to add requirements in proposed andSection; 3.15(c) thata primary conveyance in a way that provides protection from the elements.Current andSection; 3.13(f) requires that dogs and cats not be transportedwith any material, substance or device that may reasonably be expectedto harm the animals. In proposed andSection; 3.15 (h), we would clarify theintent of that requirement to indicate that the material, substance ordevice must not accompany the animals only the shipment is conducted ``ina such a manner'' that might be reasonably be expected to harm the dogsand cats.<ITAG tagnum="81">Food and Water Requirements</ITAG>Requirements regarding food and water for dogs and cats being transported,currently contained in andSection; 3.14, would be set forth in proposed andSection;3.16. We would remove the provision concerning the minimum amount of waterthat must be offered to dogs or cats under 16 weeks of age. The currentregulations require that these dogs and cats be offered at least 60 cc(approximately 2 oz) of potable water within a prescribed time. The minimumamount in the current regulations is so small that we believe the youngdogs and cats would be better served by simply falling under the generalrequirements concerning the offering of potable water. Current andSection; 3.14(a) requires that dogs and cats be offered waterwithin 12 hours after the start of transportation or acceptance for transportation.Current andSection; 3.14(b) requires that puppies and kittens be providedfood at least once every 12 hours, and dogs and cats over 16 weeks of agebe provided food at least once every 24 hours. The current regulationsspecify that these time periods begin at the time the animals are accpetedfor transport or the time transport begins, depending on who is carryingout the transport. This method of calculating when the time begins, however,could result in some dogs and cats not being provided water and food forunacceptably lengthy periods of time_in those cases where the animals wereprovided food and water the maximum time allowed before transport or acceptancefor transport, and then not again until the maximum time allowed aftertransport or acceptance for transport. Therefore, we are proposing in andSection;andSection;3.16 (a) and (b) that the time periods for providing food and water tothe animals <T3>after </T3>transport or acceptance for transport begin at the timethe dog or cat was last provided food and water before initiation of transportor acceptance for transport. In order to minimize the instances where carriers and intermediate handlershave to provide food and water to the animals immediately after acceptingthem for transport, consignors subject to the regulations would be requiredto certify that each dog or cat was provided water within 4 hours beforedelivery for transportation and that each dog or cat was provided foodwithin 12 hours before delivery for transportation. The proposed regulationswould require that the certification include the date and times the foodand water was offered. The provisions in current andSection; 3.14(d), concerning a carrier or intermediatehandler's responsibility regarding written feeding and watering instructions,would be set forth in proposed andSection; 3.13(c). We are proposing to addthe provision that food and water receptacles must be securely attachedinside the primary enclosure and placed so that the receptacles can befilled from outside the enclosure without opening the door. We are proposingthis provision based on information from carriers and intermediate handlers,which indicates that when a primary enclosure is opened to provide foodor water to the animal inside, there is often a significant risk of theanimal escaping from the enclosure. andSection; 3.17 <T3>Care in Transit. </T3>The provisions regading care in transit in currentandSection; 3.15 would be set forth in proposed andSection; 3.17. We are proposingsome minor reformatting for readability, and three additions to the currentprovisions. The current regulations require that the driver of a surfacevehicle check on the dogs or cats he or she is transporting. In proposedandSection; 3.17(a), we would allow this observation to be conducted eitherby the operator of the conveyance or a person accompanying the operator,but would make it the responsibility of the regulated person transportingthe dogs and cats to ensure that this observation is carried out. Additionally,in proposed andSection; 3.17(a), we would use language that specifies thatdogs and cats in obvious physical distress be given veterinary care atthe closest available veterinary facility. We are proposing to make thischange to clarify our intent as to the meaning of ``as soon as possible''in the current regulations. In proposed andSection; 3.17(c), we would add an exception to the currentregulations that prohibit transport in commerce of a dog or cat in physicaldistress, to allow transport for the purposes of obtaining veterinary carefor the condition. We are proposing to add a subsection andSection; 3.17(e), that would specifythat these transportation standards remain in effect and must be compliedwith until the animal reaches its final destination, or the consignee acceptsdelivery of the animal. We believe this provision is necessary to preventany gap in care for the dog or cat and in responsibility for its care.<ITAG tagnum="81">Terminal Facilities </ITAG>Current andSection; 3.16 imposes duties on carriers and intermediate handlersholding dogs or cats in animal holding areas of terminals to keep the animalsaway from inanimate cargo, to clean and sanitize the area, to have an effectivepest control program, to provide ventilation, and to maintain the ambienttemperature within certain prescribed limits. There is currently no similarobligation imposed on other persons who transport these animals. As a result,under the current regulations, animals could be held in animal holdingareas under hazardous conditions. We are proposing to move the provisions regarding terminal facilities toproposed andSection; 3.18, and would require that the same duties be imposedon any person subject to the regulations who transports dogs or cats andwho holds them in the animal holding areas. Because the animals requirethis minimum level of care no matter which regulated persons are movingthem, it is illogical to place these duties only on carriers and intermediatehandlers. Also, the length of time that dogs and cats can be maintainedin terminal facilities upon arrival after transportation would be the sameas that proposed in andSection; 3.13(g). Additionally, we are proposing to add in andSection; 3.18(d) the provisionthat the ambient temperature in the animal holding area of terminal facilitiesmay not fall below 35anddegrees; F (1.7anddegrees; C) at any time live dogsor cats are present. The proposed regulations would specify a procedurefor measuring the ambient temperature. In cases where a terminal facilitycontains more than one primary enclosure, it is possible that several temperaturereadings would have to be made to determine the ambient temperature ateach primary enclosure. Also, proposed andSection; 3.18(e) contains thoseprovisions contained in current andSection; 3.17 that require shelter fromthe elements for dogs and cats, because the current provisions apply topersons holding a dog or cat in an animal holding area of a terminal facility.<ITAG tagnum="81">Handling </ITAG>Current andSection; 3.17 also imposes duties on carriers and intermediatehandlers for proper handling and movement of dogs and cats. For reasonsexplained above under ``Terminal facilities,'' proposed andSection; 3.19would also impose the same duties on any person subject to the regulationswhen handling a dog or cat at any time during the course of transportationin commerce, so that the animals' health, safety and well-being will beprotected at all times during transport. This would include movement froman animal holding area of a terminal facility to a primary conveyance andfrom a primary conveyance to a terminal facility. This would also includemovement of the dog or cat on a transporting device used to transfer theanimal from a primary conveyance to an animal holding area and vice versa,movement from one primary conveyance to another, and movement from placeto place within the terminal facility. Proposed andSection; 3.19(b) would require that care be exercised to avoidhandling primary enclosures in such a way that dogs or cats in the primaryenclosures are cuased physical or emotional distress. Because of problemsand complaints concerning the handling of dog and cat shipments in baggageareas by airlines, we are proposing that primary enclosures containingdogs or cats must not be placed on unattended conveyor belts or on elevatedconveyor ramps such as baggage claim conveyor belts and inclined conveyorramps leading to baggage claim areas. We would allow primary enclosuresto be placed on inclined conveyor ramps that are used to load and unloadaircraft, if there is an attendant at each end of the conveyor belt. <ITAG tagnum="84">Subparts B and C_Guinea Pigs, Hamsters, and Rabbits </ITAG>Regulations on the humane handling, care, treatment, and transportationof guinea pigs, hamsters, and rabbits are contained in 9 CFR Part 3, SubpartB for guinea pigs and hamsters, and Subpart C for rabbits. These regulationsinclude minimum standards for handling, housing, feeding, watering, sanitation,ventilation, shelter from extremes of weather and temperatures, veterinarycare, and transportation. We propose to amend these regulations by revising the space requirementsfor primary enclosures and by prescribing minimum and maximum temperaturesfor cargo spaces in primary conveyances. These proposed amendments arediscussed in detail below. Space Requirements for Guinea PigsOur current requirements concerning space in primary enclosures used tohouse guinea pigs (contained in andSection; 3.28(b)(2)) are as follows:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,tp0,i1,s25,8,8</C> <H1>Weight/stage of maturity </H1><H1>Floor area/animal in \2\ </H1><H1>Interior height in</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Weaning to 350g <D>60 </D><D>6.5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andgreater; 350g <D>90 </D><D>6.5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Breeders <D>180 </D><D>6.5</D></ITAG></ITAG>In May of 1987, the National Association for Biomedical Research (NABR)petitioned us to delete the requirement for additional space for breederguinea pigs.In its petition, the NABR cited a study performed at Charles River Laboratories,a major laboratory animal breeder located in Wilmington, Massachusetts.This study concerned the effect of cage size on reproductivity. As describedin a report accompanying the petition, the study used three groups of 60female guinea pigs each. One group was housed four guinea pigs to a cageof 720 square inches (180 square inches each), as prescribed by Animaland Plant Health Inspection Service (APHIS) regulations. Another groupwas housed six to a cage of 720 square inches (120 square inches each),and the third group was housed seven to a cage of 720 square inches (102.86square inches each). The study showed no significant difference in thereproductive performance (gross litter averages, live births, average weaninglitter sizes, and total number of pups weaned during the same timeframe)between the breeder guinea pigs housed according to APHIS regulations andthe breeder guinea pigs housed in less space. These results indicate thatbreeder guinea pigs, including nursing females with litters, do not requirefloor space in excess of that required for nonbreeder guinea pigs.The NABR also cited a study performed by the Department of ComparativeMedicine of the Milton S. Hershey Medical Center at the Pennsylvania StateUniversity at Hershey, Pennsylvania. This study was conducted to determinethe percent of available floor space used by groups of breeder guinea pigs.The study compared a group of four guinea pigs housed in a cage of 720square inches (180 square inches each) with a group of seven guinea pigshoused in a cage the same size (102.86 square inches each). The study hypothesizedthat a decrease in floor area per animal would lead to increased use ofthe available floor area as animals tried to avoid stress associated withovercrowding. Conversely, the study also hypothesized that if herding orfamily grouping were important to the well-being of the animals, a decreasein floor space would not lead to an increased use of the available floorarea. A computer-coupled video tracking system recorded the movement ofthe guinea pigs over 12-hour light and dark cycles. The study revealedthat both groups of breeder guinea pigs used the periphery of the cagealmost to the exclusion of the center floor space. These results providea basis for changing our regulations concerning space requirements forbreeder guinea pigs.We have carefully reviewed and analysed the material submitted to us. Webelieve the data is sound and the petition has merit. Therefore, we proposeto delete our requirement for additional space for breeder guinea pigsand to require the same minimum floor space for breeder guinea pigs, includingnursing females with litters, as for nonbreeder guinea pigs.We also propose to revise the space requirements in primary enclosuresfor nonbreeder guinea pigs weighing more than 350 grams.Our current regulations require a minimum floor space of 90 square inchesfor nonbreeder guinea pigs weighing more than 350 grams. By comparison,the NIH Guide recommends 101 square inches for each guinea pig weighingover 350 grams, only slightly less than the 102.86 square inches providedeach breeder guinea pigs housed in groups of seven in the Charles Riverand Hershey Medical Center studies.Based on all the data available to us, we believe that more floor spacefor nonbreeder guinea pigs weighing over 350 grams would be beneficial,giving them more space for moving about. Therefore, we propose to increase,from 90 square inches to 101 square inches, the minimum floor space werequire for guinea pigs weighing over 350 grams.We also propose to require that primary enclosures used to house guineapigs have a minimum interior height of 7 inches. This is an increase of\1/2\ inch over our current requirement of 6\1/2\ inches. We believe thanan extra \1/2\ inch in height would benefit guinea pigs by providing additionalspace for them to make normal postural adjustments.Space Requirements for HamstersOur current requirements concerning space in primary enclosures used tohouse hamsters (contained in andSection; 3.28(b)(3)) are as follows:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>6,L2,tp0,i1,s200,12,12,12,12,12</C> <H1>Age</H1><H1>Floor area/animal</H1><H2>Dwarf in \2\</H2><H2>Other in \2\</H2><H1>Interior height</H1><H2>Dwarf in \2\</H2><H2>Other in \2\</H2><H1>Maximum population per enclosure</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Weaning to 5 wks <D>5.0 </D><D>10.0 </D><D>5.0 </D><D>5.5 </D><D>20 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5 to 10 wks <D>7.5 </D><D>12.5 </D><D>5.0 </D><D>5.5 </D><D>16</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andgreater; 10 wks <D>9.0 </D><D>15.0 </D><D>5.0 </D><D>5.5 </D><D>13</D></ITAG></ITAG>In addition, andSection; 3.28(b)(3) requires that a nursing female hamster,together with her litter, be housed in a primary enclosure that containsno other hamsters and that provides at least 25 square inches of floorspace for dwarf hamsters and at least 121 square inches of floor spacefor hamsters other than dwarf.We believe that increasing both floor area and cage height would benefithamsters by providing additional room for them to move about and make normalpostural adjustments. We have carefully considered the space recommendationscontained in the NIH Guide. We believe that they are an improvement overour current regulations. Therefore, we are proposing to adopt the samefloor area and cage height requirements as are currently in the NIH Guide.Our requirements for females with litters would not be amended.The NIH Guide contains the following minimum space recommendations forhamsters:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>5,L2,tp0,i1,s200,14,14,14,14</C> <H1>Weight g</H1><H1>Floor area/animal</H1><H2>in \2\ </H2><H2>cm \2\</H2><H1>Cage height</H1><H2>in </H2><H2>cm</H2><ITAG tagnum="1">60 <D>10 </D><D>64.52 </D><D>6 </D><D>15.24 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">60 to 80 <D>13 </D><D>83.88 </D><D>6 </D><D>15.24 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">80 to 100 <D>16 </D><D>103.23 </D><D>6 </D><D>15.24 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andgreater; 100 <D>19 </D><D>122.59 </D><D>6 </D><D>15.24</D></ITAG></ITAG>The NIH Guide notes that females with litters require additional spaceand refers readers to our regulations.We also propose to delete our requirements concerning maximum populationper enclosure because we believe that population is not a critical factoraffecting the well-being of hamsters, as long as each hamster has at leastthe minimum amount of floor space that we have proposed.Space Requirements for RabbitsOur current requirements concerning space in primary enclosures used tohouse rabbits (contained in (andSection; 3.53(b)) are as follows:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>5,L2,tp0,i1,s200,14,14,14,14</C> <H1>Category</H1><H1>Weight/animal</H1><H2>lbs</H2><H2>(kgs)</H2><H1>Floor area/animal</H1><H2>in \2\</H2><H2>(ft \2\)</H2><ITAG tagnum="1">Groups<D>3-5</D><D>(1.4-2.7)</D><D>144</D><D>(1)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>6-8</D><D>(2.7-4.0)</D><D>288</D><D>(2)</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>andgreater;9</D><D>(andgreater;4.0)</D><D>432</D><D>(3)</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Individual adults<D>3-5</D><D>(1.4-2.7)</D><D>180</D><D>(1.25)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>6-8</D><D>(2.7-4.0)</D><D>360</D><D>(2.50)</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>9-11</D><D>(4.0-5.4)</D><D>540</D><D>(3.75)</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>andgreater;12</D><D>(andgreater;5.4)</D><D>720</D><D>(5.00)</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nursing females<D>3-5</D><D>(1.4-2.7)</D><D>576</D><D>(4.00)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>6-8</D><D>(2.7-4.0)</D><D>720</D><D>(5.00)</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>9-11</D><D>(4.0-5.4)</D><D>864</D><D>(6.00)</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>andgreater;12</D><D>(andgreater;5.4)</D><D>1080</D><D>(7.50)</D></ITAG>We believe that rabbits, like guinea pigs and hamsters, would benefit fromadditional space. Based on all the data available to us, we believe thatthe current NIH guidelines would provide them with adequate space. Theseguidelines are different from our current regulations in two ways, whichwe have carefully considered and believe are improvements over our currentregulations: (1) Space recommendations are for individual rabbits only;and (2) there is a minimum interior cage height of 14 inches. Under ourproposal, this would mean that rabbits housed in groups would have to beprovided the same amount of floor space per rabbit as those housed individually.It would also mean that rabbits would have adequate overhead space to accommodatenormal physical posturing.The NIH Guide contains the following minimum space recommendations forrabbits:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>5,L2,tp0,i1,s200,14,14,14,14</C> <H1>Weight kg</H1><H1>Floor area/animal</H1><H2>ft \2\</H2><H2>m \2\</H2><H1>Cage height</H1><H2>in</H2><H2>cm</H2><ITAG tagnum="1">2<D>1.5</D><D>0.14</D><D>14</D><D>35.56</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2-4<D>3.0</D><D>0.28</D><D>14</D><D>35.56</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4-5.4<D>4.0</D><D>0.37</D><D>14</D><D>35.56</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andgreater;5.4<D>5.0</D><D>0.46</D><D>14</D><D>35.56</D></ITAG></ITAG>The NIH Guide notes that females with litters require additional spaceand refers readers to our regulations.We also propose to revise our space requirements for females with littersto the following:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>7,L2,tp0,i1,s100,12,12,12,12,12,12</C> <H1> </H1><H1>Weight of female rabbit</H1><H2>lbs</H2><H2>kgs</H2><H1>Minimum area/female andamp; litters \1\</H1><H2>ft \2\</H2><H2>m \2\</H2><H1>Minimum interior hgt</H1><H2>in</H2><H2>cm</H2><ITAG tagnum="1">Females with litters<D>4.4</D><D>2</D><D>4.0</D><D>0.37</D><D>14</D><D>35.56</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>4.4-8.8</D><D>2-4</D><D>5.0</D><D>0.46</D><D>14</D><D>35.56</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>8.8-11.9</D><D>4-5.4</D><D>6.0</D><D>0.56</D><D>14</D><D>35.56</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>andgreater;11.9</D><D>andgreater;5.4</D><D>7.5</D><D>0.70</D><D>14</D><D>35.56</D><F>\1\ The minimum floor spaces indicated in the table above are for thenursing female, together with her litter.</F></ITAG>The proposed minimum space requirements for females with litters are roughlythe same as the current requirements for nursing females. We are proposingnew weight categories and a new term for nursing females to make the formatof the proposed space requirements for females with litters parallel theformat of the proposed space requirements for other rabbits.Ambient Temperature Requirements in Primary ConveyancesTo protect the health of guinea pigs, hamsters, and rabbits during transportationin commerce, the regulations in 9 CFR in Part 3, andSection;andSection; 3.40,3.41, 3.65, and 3.66, prohibit animals in transporting devices or holdingareas of terminal facilities from being subjected to temperatures aboveor below a specified range.Temperature is also of concern when animals are being transported in thecargo spaces of primary conveyances. Until 1977, requirements concerningallowable ambient temperatures in primary conveyances were part of theregulations in 9 CFR Part 3, andSection;andSection; 3.37 and 3.62. However,these requirements were inadvertently omitted from the regulations duringthe last major revision in 1977.The intervening years have demonstrated the need to re-adopt these requirementsfor two principal rseasons: (1) The current requirements concerning ambienttemperatures are inconsistent, because guineas pigs, hamsters, and rabbitsin transporting devices and in holding areas of terminal facilities maynot be exposed to temperatures outside a specified range, but guinea pigs,hamsters, and rabbits in animal cargo spaces of primary conveyances_mainlycars and trucks_are not afforded the same protection; and (2) as air freightrates have risen dramatically during this time, increasing numbers of animalsare being shipped by surface transportation_some for very long distances_withno provision to ensure that the animals are not subjected to extremes oftemperature.We therefore propose to reinstate requirements concerning ambient temperaturesin primary conveyances. The proposed requirements, which would be applicableto all types of primary conveyances (motor vehicle, air, rail, and marine),would require animal cargo spaces in primary conveyances transporting liveanimals to be mechanically sound and to provide fresh air by means of windows,doors, vents, or air conditioning so as to minimize drafts, odors, andmoisture condensation. We also propose to require that auxiliary ventilationbe used in any animal cargo space containing live guinea pigs, hamsters,or rabbits if the ambient temperature is 75anddegrees; F (23.9anddegrees; C)or higher. Furthermore, we propose to require that the ambient temperaturein the animal cargo space be maintained at or below 85anddegrees; F (29.5anddegrees;C) but no lower than 45anddegrees; F (7.2anddegrees; C), except that temperaturesbelow 45anddegrees; F (7.2anddegrees; C) would be allowed for hamsters andrabbits if the animals are accompanied by a certificate of acclimationto lower temperatures. Requirements concerning the certificate of acclimationare contained in andSection; 3.35 of the regulations for hamsters and inandSection; 3.60 of the regulations for rabbits. We do not propose to allowguinea pigs to be transported in cargo spaces where the ambient temperaturefalls below 45anddegrees; F (7.2anddegrees; C) because guinea pigs cannot toleratesuch low temperatures.These proposed requirements concerning fresh air and auxiliary ventilationare necessary to ensure that the animals have adequate ventilation. Themaximum and minimum ambient temperatures would help ensure that the animalsare not subjected to extremes of temperature during transportation in commerce.We recognize, however, that some hamsters and rabbits may be comfortableat temperatures below the lower limits proposed; the provisions conceringthe certificate of acclimation would allow them to be transported at temperaturesbelow 45anddegrees; F (7.2anddegrees; C).MiscellaneousWe propose to revise andSection;andSection; 3.40, 3.41, and 3.66 of the regulations,which contain transportation requirements, to clarify that responsibilityfor meeting these requirements rests with any person who is subject tothe Animal Welfare regulations and who transports live guinea pigs, hamsters,or rabbits. Currently, the regulations place this responsibility only withcarriers and intermediate handlers. However, other persons, including dealers,exhibitors, and research facilities, including federal research facilities,hold animals in terminal facilities and move animals in transporting devices,and the same temperature restrictions are necessary for the well-beingof the animals.We propose to revise andSection;andSection; 3.36 and 3.61 of the regulations,which contain requirements for primary enclosures used to transport liveguinea pigs, hamsters, and rabbits, to clarify that the responsibilityfor meeting these requirements rests with any person who is subject tothe Animal Welfare regulations and who offers a live guinea pig, hamster,or rabbit for transportation in commerce.<ITAG tagnum="84">Subpart D_Nonhuman Primates</ITAG>Regulations on the humane handling, care, treatment, and transportationof nonhuman primates are contained in 9 CFR Part 3, Subpart D. These regulationsinclude minimum standards for handling, housing, social grouping and separationof species, feeding, watering, sanitation, ventilation, shelter from extremesof weather and temperature, veterinary care, and transportation.We are proposing to revise and rewrite the current regulations based onour experience administering the Act and them. We are also proposing toamend our regulations to add requirements for a physical environment adequateto promote the psychological well-being of nonhuman primates. This is specificallyrequired by the 1985 amendments to section 13 of the Act. (See andSection;1752, 99 Stat. 1645, Pub. L. 99-198, amending 7 U.S.C. 2143.) We discusseach topic covered in our proposed regulations below.In preparing to revise and amend Subpart D, we engaged in extensive studyof the environmental needs of nonhuman primates that must be met to promotetheir psychological well-being. We actively sought input from various professionalcommunities that are subject to the regulations. We formed a committeeto study the psychological needs of nonhuman primates maintained by theresearch community and to make specific recommendations to us concerningthe various issues presented by the 1985 amendments to the Act. This committeewas comprised of APHIS representatives and ten members of the scientificresearch community. The members were experts recommended by the NationalInstitutes of Health and were appointed by APHIS to formulate recommendationsfor means of providing an environment to promote the psychological well-beingof nonhuman primates. Observers from NIH were also present during committeedeliberations, although they were not members of the committee.We also sought and obtained input from organizations, such as the NationalAssociation for Biomedical Research, which represent facilities utilizingnonhuman primates in their research.We invited animal exhibitors to participate in the development of regulationsto promote the psychological well-being of nonhuman primates. The AmericanAssociation of Zoological Parks and Aquariums, a nonprofit, tax-exemptorganization dedicated to the advancement of zoological parks and aquariumsfor conservation, education, scientific studies and recreation, formeda Primate Study Committee to develop materials concerning space requirementsand the various environmental enrichments required by different speciesof nonhuman primates, based upon their social behavior and species-typicalactivity, in order to promote their psychological well-being.The results of these efforts are explained in greater detail below in ourdiscussion of proposed minimum space and environmental requirements.The regulations we are proposing in this revision of Subpart D are minimumstandards to be applied to all species of nonhuman primates. We are continuingto include current footnote 1 of Subpart D in this proposal, although itis revised to reflect the need to promote the psychological well-beingof nonhuman primates. Rather than stating that ``discretion'' must be useddue to the variation in species, we are proposing to require that theseminimum standards be applied in a manner that is considered appropriatefor the relevant species in accordance with customary and generally acceptedprofessional and husbandry practices.The Act applies to all nonhuman primates, whether living or dead. The standardswe are proposing are principally applicable to live nonhuman primates.As stated in proposed footnote 1, the proposed regulations apply only tolive nonhuman primates, unless stated otherwise.Housing Facilities and Operating StandardsCurrent sections 3.75 through 3.77 provide requirements for facilitiesused to house nonhuman primates. Current andSection; 3.75, ``Facilities,general,'' contains regulations pertaining to housing facilities of anykind. It is followed by current andSection; 3.76, ``Facilities, indoor,''and andSection; 3.77, ``Facilities, outdoor.'' We are proposing to amendthese sections to provide for an environment that better promotes the psychologicalwell-being of nonhuman primates. We are also proposing to add sectionsthat provide regulations specifically governing two other types of housingfacilities used to house nonhuman primates, sheltered housing facilitiesand mobile or traveling housing facilities. The term ``sheltered housingfacility'' is defined in Part 1 (<T3>see </T3>companion docket no. 88-013, published elsewhere in this issueof the <T4>Federal Register</T4>) as ``a housing facility which provides the animalswith shelter; protection from the elements; and protection from temperatureextremes at all times. A sheltered housing facility may consist of runsor pens totally enclosed in a barn or building, or of connecting inside/outsideruns or pens with the inside pens in a totally enclosed building.'' Theterm ``mobile or traveling housing facility'', also defined in Part 1,means ``a transporting vehicle such as a truck, trailer, or railway car,used to house animals while traveling for exhibition or public educationpurposes.''Some of the requirements we are proposing for housing facilities are applicableto housing facilities of any kind. As in the current regulations, thesestandards of general applicability would be included in one section, proposedandSection; 3.75, which would also include many of the provisions in currentandSection; 3.75. Additionally, we are proposing amendments to the currentregulations that are specific to particular types of housing facilities,and are including those provisions in separate sections of the proposedregulations. In some cases, where the current regulations would be unchangedin substance, we have made wording changes to clarify the intent of theregulations.Housing facilities, generalBecause nonhuman primates vary widely in size, weight, and range of activity,the design, composition and structural strength required of housing facilitiesvaries as well. We are proposing to require in proposed andSection; 3.75(a)that the design, composition, and structural strength of a housing facilitybe appropriate for the particular species housed in it. For example, theactual structural requirements for a housing facility would differ dependingupon whether it is used to house marmosets, a small nonhuman primate species,or great apes, a typically large species weighing more than 88 lbs. (40kg.).In proposed andSection; 3.75(b), we are proposing to add the requirementthat a dealer's or exhibitor's housing facilities be physically separatedfrom any other business. When a housing facility is located on the samepremises as any other business there is likely to be increased trafficand activity which is known to be distressful to nonhuman primates. Alsowhen more than one dealer maintains facilities on the premises, it canbe difficult to determine which dealer is responsible for which animalsand for the conditions of the facility. This has made inspection and enforcementof the regulations difficult. To avoid these difficulties we are proposingto require that housing facilities, other than those maintained by researchfacilities and federal research facilities, be physically separated fromother businesses. This can be done by using a security fence or by conductingeach business in a separate building. The means of separation used wouldhave to be constructed so that it prevents unauthorized humans, and animalsthe size of dogs, skunks, and raccoons, from going through it or underit. For example, if a security fence is used, it would have to be at least6-feet high and constructed in a manner that restricts any unauthorizedentry. We are not imposing this requirement upon research facilities becausethey are often part of a larger sponsoring establishment, such as a universityor pharmaceutical company, and responsibility for animal and site conditionsrests with that establishment. Therefore, we have not encountered the enforcementdifficulties noted above with research facilities.We are also proposing in subsection (b) that housing facilities and areasused for storing animal food and bedding be kept free of any accumulationof trash, weeds, and discarded material in order to prevent unsanitaryconditions, diseases, pests, and odors. The need for orderliness appliesparticularly to animal areas inside of housing facilities, and we are proposingthat they must be kept free of clutter, including equipment, furniture,or stored material, and materials not necessary for proper husbandry practices.In proposed andSection; 3.75(c) we are proposing to include requirementsconcerning housing facility surfaces that are common to all types of facilities.The current regulations require that interior surfaces of indoor housingfacilities be constructed and maintained so that they are substantiallyimpervious to moisture and may be readily sanitized. They do not specifyfrequency of sanitization. They also do not provide any requirements forbuilding surfaces used in outdoor housing facilities.Under our proposal, any surfaces that come in contact with nonhuman primatesmust be maintained regularly so that they are kept in good condition. Interiorsurfaces and furniture-type fixtures or objects within the facility, suchas perches, swings, and dens, must be made so that they can be readilycleaned and sanitized, or removed or replaced when worn or soiled. We areproposing to add this requirement because we would no longer require impervioussurfaces under our proposal in an effort to encourage provision of morenatural environments for the animals. Because porous surfaces may not beadequately sanitized, we are requiring instead that they be removed orreplaced when worn or soiled. This requirement appears in proposed andSection;3.75(c)(2). Otherwise, the manner of construction and the materials usedmust allow for cleaning and sanitization.Proposed andSection; 3.75(c)(1) would require that surfaces that come incontact with nonhuman primates be free of jagged edges or sharp pointsthat could injure the animals, as well as rust that prevents the requiredcleaning and sanitization or affects the structural integrity of the surfaces.Because we recognize that as long as water is used to clean animal areasmetal parts will rust, we would allow some rust on metal areas, as longas it does not reduce structural strength or interfere with proper cleaningand sanitization because that could present hazards to the animals.Proposed andSection; 3.75(c)(3) would require that hard surfaces that comein contact with nonhuman primates be cleaned daily and sanitized at leastonce every two weeks and as often as necessary to prevent any accumulationof excreta or disease hazards, in accordance with generally accepted husbandrypractices, unless the nonhuman primates engage in scent marking. Scentmarking is an inborn method used by certain species of nonhuman primatesin nature (such as species of prosimians, marmosets, tamarins, and callimico)to establish their territory and for identification by other members ofthe species. Animals can detect that another member of the species hasoccupied a site by the scent left behind and can locate companions in thismanner. It is distressful for these primates to have their scent markseliminated since they lose their territorial claims and their frame ofreference. We are therefore proposing that hard surfaces that come in contactwith nonhuman primates that scent mark be spot cleaned daily and that theybe sanitized at regular intervals that would be determined in accordancewith generally accepted professional and husbandry practices. We invitecomments on the length of intervals that should be allowed to pass betweenregular cleanings for those species engaging in scent marking.We are proposing to remove the requirement that housing facilities haveimpervious surfaces because many can simulate more natural environmentsby providing dirt floors and planted areas that are beneficial to the nonhumanprimates' psychological well-being. Proposed andSection; 3.75(c)(3) wouldprovide that outdoor floors could be made of dirt, sand, gravel, grass,or other similar material that can be readily cleaned and is removable.Proposed andSection; 3.84(b)(3) provides various methods of sanitizing primaryenclosures. Because these methods are effective in general for sanitizationof hard surfaces that nonhuman primates come in contact with, except fordirt floors and planted areas, any of them could be used for the sanitizationrequired by proposed andSection; 3.75(c)(3). The method of sanitization wouldbe determined by the housing facility operator. Planted enclosures andfloors made of dirt, sand, gravel, grass, or other similar material wouldhave to be raked and spot cleaned daily, since sanitization is not practicable.Contaminated flooring material would have to be removed if raking and spotcleaning does not eliminate odors, diseases, insects, pests, or vermininfestation. The material could then be replaced or a different materialcould be used.In the current regulations, andSection; 3.75(b) provides requirements forwater and electric power. It specifies that reliable and adequate waterand electric power must be made available ``if required to comply withother provisions of this subpart.'' In this proposed rule, provisions concerningwater and electric power are set forth in andSection; 3.75(d). We are proposingthere to eliminate the qualifying statement cited above, and to <T3>require </T3>reliable electric power that is adequate for heating,cooling, ventilation, lighting, and other husbandry requirements, and mechanicallypressurized potable running water for the nonhuman primates' drinking needsand adequate for cleaning and for carrying out other husbandry requirements.Based upon our inspections of dealer, exhibitor, and research facilities,we believe that nonhuman primate facilities subject to the Animal Welfareregulations cannot be properly cleaned and maintained without electricpower and running potable water under pressure.We are proposing in andSection; 3.75(e) to expand the regulations in currentandSection; 3.75(c) concerning proper storage of food and bedding supplies.We would retain the requirements that food and bedding be stored so asto protect them from vermin infestation or contamination, and that perishablefood be refrigerated. We are proposing requirements to ensure further thequality of the physical environment surrounding nonhuman primates. We areproposing to add a requirement that food and bedding be stored in leakproofcontainers to protect the supplies from spoilage, contamination, and vermininfestation, and that open food and bedding supplies be kept in leakproofcontainers with tightly fitting lids to prevent spoilage and contamination.Proposed andSection; 3.75(e) would require that substances that would betoxic to nonhuman primates be stored away from animal areas and food storageand preparation areas. Only the food and bedding in use could be kept inanimal areas and we would require that when they are not in use they mustbe properly stored. In addition, all food would have to be stored so asto prevent contamination or deterioration of its nutritive value. The supplieswould have to be stored off the floor and away from the walls, to allowcleaning around and underneath them.The proposed regulations would continue to require that housing facilitiesprovide for removal and disposal of animal and food wastes, bedding, deadanimals, and debris, as provided in current andSection; 3.75(d). We are proposingto clarify this requirement so that it clearly applies to all fluid wastesand to include a requirement that arrangements must be made for promptdaily removal and disposal of wastes. Removal and disposal must be donemore than once each day if necessary to avoid problems with odors, pests,insects, and diseases. The proposed regulations would also require thattrash containers be leakproof and tightly closed when not in use, and thatall forms of animal waste, including dead animals, be kept out of foodand animal areas.Requirements for drainage systems are currently provided in andSection;andSection;3.76(e) and 3.77(d) for indoor and outdoor facilities, respectively. Becauseall types of animal housing facilities, including sheltered housing facilitiesand mobile or traveling housing facilities, require a proper disposal facilityand drainage system, we are proposing to consolidate all drainage and wastedisposal requirements in proposed andSection; 3.75(f). The requirements fordrainage systems would be expanded to provide that in all types of housingfacilities whether open or closed drains, waste sump ponds, or settlementponds are used they must be properly constructed, installed, and maintained,and they must minimize vermin and pest infestation, insects, odors, anddisease hazards. As part of this safeguard, we would require that wastesump ponds and settlement ponds be located an adequate distance from theanimal area of the housing facility to prevent problems with vermin, pests,odors, insects, and disease hazards. Drainage systems must also rapidlyeliminate animal wastes and water so that the animals can stay dry. Thisis necessary because it is known to be distressful to nonhuman primatesto be involuntarily wetted.The requirement contained in current andSection; 3.75(e) that washing facilitiesbe available to animal caretakers for their cleanliness would be retainedand would appear in proposed andSection; 3.75(g).Requirements for different types of housing facilitiesThe current regulations specify two kinds of housing facilities, indoorand outdoor. These terms are defined in Part 1 of the regulations. (<T3>See</T3> companion docket no. 88-013, published elsewhere in this issueof the <T4>Federal Register</T4>.) An indoor housing facility is defined as ``anystructure or building with environmental controls housing or intended tohouse animals'' that is fully enclosed and has a continuous connectionbetween the floor, ground, and ceiling, is capable of being temperatureand humidity controlled, and has at least one door for entry and exit.An outdoor housing facility is defined as ``any structure, building, land,or premise, housing or intended to house animals, and which does not meetthe defintion of an indoor housing facility or a sheltered housing facilityand in which temperatures cannot be controlled within set limits. We areproposing to add two additional sections containing requirements for shelteredhousing facilities and mobile or traveling housing facilities, previouslydefined in this document.Requirements for enclosed or partially enclosed housing facilitiesThree of the four types of housing facilities that may be used to housenonhuman primates are either enclosed or partially enclosed. They are indoorhousing facilities, mobile or traveling housing facilities, and the shelteredportion of sheltered housing facilities. We are proposing to require thatall of these enclosed types of housing facilities be required to provideheating, cooling, and ventilation, and to maintain temperatures withinthe temperature limits provided in current paragraphs (a) and (b) of andSection;3.76 ``Facilities, indoor'' as follows:<ITAG tagnum="81">1. Temperature requirements</ITAG>Under our proposal, there must be sufficient heat provided to protect nonhumanprimates from cold temperatures. The ambient temperature (defined in Part1 of the regulations as the temperature surrounding the animal) must notfall below 50 anddegrees;F (10 anddegrees;C). We would require cooling to protectnonhuman primates from high temperatures. The ambient temperature mustnot rise above 85 anddegrees;F (29.5 anddegrees;C), except that for mobileor traveling housing facilities only, the upper temperature limit is 95anddegrees;F (35 anddegrees;C) when nonhuman primates are present, howeverauxiliary ventilation such as fans or air conditioning must be providedif the temperature is 85 anddegrees;F (29.5 anddegrees;C) or higher. Becausethe various species of nonhuman primates have different optimal ambienttemperatures and different tolerances for higher and lower temperatures,we are proposing to require that the actual ambient temperature maintainedbe at a level that ensures the health and well-being of the species housed,in accordance with generally accepted professional and husbandry practices.<ITAG tagnum="81">2. Ventilation</ITAG>The current requirement in andSection; 3.76(b) for ventilation of indoorhousing facilities would be applicable to the three types of enclosed housingfacilities to provide for the health, comfort, and well-being of nonhumanprimates. For sheltered housing facilities the requirement would only applyto the sheltered portion of the facility since the outdoor portion couldnot be humidity controlled. We are proposing to add that ventilation mustalso be provided to minimize ammonia levels in these housing facilitiesand that mobile or traveling housing facilities must be ventilated to minimizeexhaust fumes, to protect the well-being of the nonhuman primates.<ITAG tagnum="81">3. Relative humidity level</ITAG>Except in mobile or traveling housing facilities, we would also requirethat the relative humidity in enclosed facilities be maintained between30 and 70 percent. The actual relative humdity maintained would dependupon the species housed and must be maintained at a level that ensuresthe health and well-being of the species housed, in accordance with generallyaccepted professional and husbandry practices. For example, certain speciesof nonhuman primates are known to be less tolerant of a wide range of humiditylevels and therefore should be maintained at more specific humidity levels.The NIH Guide provides precise humdity levels for certain species. Individualssubject to our regulations can refer to the NIH Guide for these animalsbecause use of the Guide will maintain actual humidity levels within therequirements of these regulations and conforms with generally acceptedprofessional and husbandry practices. We are not proposing to require that a precise range of humidity levelsbe maintained in mobile or traveling housing facilities since they travelinto all parts of the United States which have varying levels of humidity.Typically, the species of nonhuman primates that travel in these facilitiesare chimpanzees used in circuses and trained animal acts. Chimpanzees cantolerate a wider range of relative humidity levels than most species ofnonhuman primates and would not be exposed to an undue health hazard ifthere is no range of humidity levels specified in the regulations. However,we would require that the relative humidity level be maintained at a levelthat ensures the health and the well-being of the species housed, in accordancewith generally accepted professional and husbandry practices. Operatorsof mobile or traveling housing facilities as well as all other housingfacility operators would still be subject to the general requirement containedin footnote 1 which provides that these regulations must be applied inaccordance with customary and generally accepted professional and husbandrypractices considered appropriate for each species and accordingly couldnot expose nonhuman primates to relative humidity levels that are consideredhazardous to that species' physical well-being without violating the regulations.<ITAG tagnum="81">4. Lighting </ITAG>The proposed regulations would continue the requirement presently imposedupon indoor facilities in current andSection; 3.76(c) to provide adequatelight to premit routine inspection and cleaning of the housing facility,and observation of nonhuman primates. This requirement would apply to thethree types of enclosed housing facilities included in the proposed regulations.We are proposing in proposed andSection;andSection; 3.76(c), 3.77(c), and 3.79(d)to require a daily lighting cycle of at least 8 consecutive hours of lightand at least 8 consecutive hours of darkness each day in order to maintaina normal lighting cycle for the nonhuman primates' well-being. A diurnallighting cycle is known to be necessary for nonhuman primates to maintainnormal breeding practices and to promote their psychological well-being.We would continue to allow artificial light to be used, but the proposedregulations would specify that it must provide full-spectrum illumination.Safeguards against exposing nonhuman primates to excessive light wouldbe retained and would apply to all enclosed housing facilities. Requirements for outdoor or partially outdoor housing facilities <ITAG tagnum="81">1. Shelter from the elements. </ITAG>Outdoor housing facilities cannot be temperature controlled. Our proposalwould allow only those nonhuman primates that are acclimated to the prevailingseasonal temperature and that can tolerate without stress or discomfortthe range of temperatures, humidity, and climactic conditions known tooccur at the facility at the time of year they are housed there to be housedin outdoor facilities, in order to protect their physical welfare. As in current andSection; 3.77(a)-(c) outdoor housing facilities must provideshelter from the elements and protection from various weather conditions,such as sun, wind, rain, cold air, and snow. For example, nonhuman primatesmust be provided with shade from the sun and protection from precipitationso that they remain dry. This requirement appears in proposed andSection;3.78(b). We would require that the shelter provided be maintained in goodrepair, and that it be constructed in a manner and made of material thatcan be radily cleaned and sanitized in accordance with proposed andSection;3.75(c). The shelter provided in an outdoor or sheltered housing facilitywould be required to provide heat to prevent the temperature from fallingbelow 50 anddegrees;F (10 anddegrees;C). The requirement to provide protection from the elements would also be applicableto sheltered housing facilities. We would require that nonhuman primatesbe provided shelter from the elements at all times. Accordingly, unlessthe nonhuman primates have continual ready access to the sheltered portionof the facility, some additional form of shelter must be provided thatsatisfies the requirements contained in paragraphs (a) through (e) of proposedandSection; 3.77.Proposed andSection;andSection; 3.77(e) and 3.78(c) would require that theshelters in both sheltered and outdoor housing facilities be large enoughto provide protection comfortably to all the nonhuman primate housed inthe facility at the same time. Sheltered housing facilities and outdoorhousing facilities would be required to have multiple shelters if thereare aggressive or dominant animals present that might deter other nonhumanprimates from utilizing the shelters when they so desire. We consideredmultiple shelters necessary under these circumstances in order to preventthe destress that would result if a nonhuman primates was prevented fromoccupying a shelter because it was intimidated. <ITAG tagnum="81">2. Perimeter fence. </ITAG>We are proposing additional requirements for housing facilities havingoutdoor areas, in order to protect the safety of nonhuman primates andto provide for their well-being. In proposed andSection;andSection; 3.77(f)and 3.78(d), we would require that unless a natural barrier exists thatwould restrict the animals to the housing facility and prevent unauthorizedhumans and animals from having contact with the nonhuman primates, a perimeterfence at least 6 feet in height be placed around the outdoor areas of shelteredhousing facilities and outdoor housing facilities, and that it be placedat least 3 feet from the outside wall of the primary enclosure. In certainsettings a perimeter fence is not needed because the animals are protectedby natural barriers, such as moats or swamps surrounding the facility.The exception for natural boundaries would be subject to the Administrator'sapproval. The perimeter fence could be slatted, latticed or of other similardesign, as long as it is designed and constructed in a manner that restrictsunauthorized humans and animals from entering or have contact with thenonhuman primates, including animals capable of digging underneath it,and that prevents small animals the size of dogs, raccoons, and skunksfrom entering through it. We would require that it be placed at least 3feet from the outside wall of the primary enclosure because this is consideredto be a sufficient safety zone between the nonhuman primates and the publicand would allow sufficient room to use cleaning equipment necessary forcleaning the waste and refuse that nonhuman primates throw into it. Thefence would not be required if the outside walls of the primary enclosureare high enough and built in a manner that prevents contact with or entryby other animals. To avoid the need for a perimeter fence we would requirethat the outside walls of the primary enclosure be made of a heavy dutymaterial such as concrete, wood, metal, plastic, or glass, that preventsunauthorized entry by and contact with humans and animals. Additional safety requirementWe are also proposing to add a requirement for facilities that are at leastpartially outdoors and are accessible to the public in order to protectnonhuman primates from the public and to protect the public from nonhumanprimates. Public barriers would be required for sheltered housing facilitiesunder proposed andSection; 3.77(g), outdoor housing facilities under proposedandSection; 3.78(e), and for mobile or traveling housing facilities underproposed andSection; 3.79(e). The proposed regulations would require barrierspreventing unauthorized physical contact between the public and nonhumanprimates for fixed public exhibits and traveling animal exhibits, at anytime the public is present, both to protect the public and the nonhumanprimates. We are also proposing to require that nonhuman primates usedin trained animal acts or uncaged public exhibits be under the controland supervision of an experienced handler or trainer whenever the publicis present. The proposed regulations would permit trained nonhuman primatesused in animal acts and uncaged public exhibits to have physical contactwith the public, as allowed under andSection; 2.131, but only if the nonhumanprimates are under the direct control and supervision of an experiencedhandler or trainer at all times during the contact, in order to preventinjury to both the nonhuman primates and the public.Primary enclosuresWe are proposing to revise completely current andSection; 3.78, ``Primaryenclosures.'' We are doing so in accordance with the 1985 amendments tothe Act. Under the amendments, the Secretary of Agriculture is directedto ``promulgate standards to govern the humane handling, care, treatment,and transportation of animals by dealers, research facilities, and exhibitors.''The standards must include minimum requirements ``for a physical environmentadequate to promote the psychological well-being of primates.'' (7 U.S.C.andSection; 2143(a)(2)(B)) Included among the primary enclosures subjectto the regulations would be those used by circuses, carnivals, travelingzoos, educational exhibits, and other traveling animal acts and shows.As explained in greater detail below, we are proposing different minimumspace and environment requirements for research facilities, dealers, exhibitors,and traveling or mobile animal act exhibitors, in order to promote thepsychological well-being of nonhuman primates and to provide for the primates'minimum needs. All primary enclosures would be required to meet the proposedminimum requirements. We consider the proposed requirements to be the minimumnecessary for nonhuman primates' health, safety, and psychological well-being.Our proposal is in contrast to current andSection; 3.78, which provides generalrequirements for construction and maintenance of primary enclosures anduniform space requirements for every nonhuman primate housed in a primaryenclosure.We are also proposing to add a subsection on social grouping of nonhumanprimates within primary enclosures.<ITAG tagnum="81">General requirements</ITAG>Primary enclosures are defined in Part 1 of the regulations as ``any structureor device used to restrict an animal to a limited amount of space, suchas a room, pen, run, cage, compartment, pool, hutch, or tether.'' ProposedandSection; 3.80(a) would continue to require that primary enclosures bestructurally sound and maintained in good repair to protect the animalsfrom injury, to contain them, and to keep predators out, that they enablethe animals to remain dry and clean, that they provide the animals withconvenient access to clean food and water, that their floors be constructedin a manner that protects the animals from injury, and that they providesufficient space for the nonhuman primates to make normal postural adjustmentswith freedom of movement.We are also proposing in proposed andSection; 3.80(a) to require specificallythat the primary enclosures have no sharp points or edges that could injurethe animals, that they keep unauthorized people and predators from enteringthe enclosure or having physical contact with nonhuman primates, that theyprovide shelter and protection from extreme temperature and weather conditionsthat can be dangerous to the animals' health and welfare, that they providesufficient shade to protect all the animals contained in the enclosureat one time, and that they enable all surfaces to be readily cleaned andsanitized or replaced if worn or soiled.These additional requirements are intended to provide more specific minimumcriteria that must be satisfied by regulated persons maintaining nonhumanprimates in order to provide for the welfare of the animals.<ITAG tagnum="81">Social grouping</ITAG>We are proposing to include a new subsection of proposed andSection; 3.80``Primary enclosures'' to emphasize that nonhuman primates must be groupedin a primary enclosure with compatible members of their species or withother nonhuman primate species, either in pairs, family groups, or othercompatible social groupings, whenever possible and consistent with providingfor the nonhuman primates' health, safety, and well-being, unless socialgrouping is prohibited by an animal care and use procedure and approvedby the facility's Committee. Compatibility would be based upon generallyaccepted professional practices and upon observation of the nonhuman primatesto determine that they are in fact compatible. We are proposing this requirementbased upon scientific evidence and our experience, both of which indicatethat nonhuman primates are social beings in nature and require contactwith other nonhuman primates for their psychological well-being. The expertcommittee convened by APHIS also recommended social grouping to promotethe psychological well-being of nonhuman primates. Social deprivation isregarded by the scientific community as psychologically debilitating tosocial animals. Where social grouping is not possible or is determinedby the attending veterinarian to be contrary to providing for the nonhumanprimates' health, safety, and well-being as explained below, or is prohibitedby an animal care and use procedure approved by the research facility'sCommittee in accordance with Part 2 of the regulations, we are proposingto require that nonhuman primates be at least able to see and hear othernonhuman primates, unless this is also prohibited by an animal care anduse procedure approved by the research facility's Committee. In this case,the isolated individually housed nonhuman primates would be required tohave positive physical contact or other interaction with their keeper orwith another familiar and knowledgeable person for at least one hour eachday. We invite comments addressing the different measures that may be takento satisfy the requirement to provide positive physical contact or otherinteraction to individually housed nonhuman primates.Space and physical environmentAs stated above, we are completely revising the minimum space requirementsfor nonhuman primates set forth in current paragraphs (1) and (2) of andSection;3.78(b). The current requirements specify that primary enclosures be ``constructedand maintained so as to provide sufficient space to allow each nonhumanprimate to make normal postural adjustments with adequate freedom of movement''and provide a minimum floor space equal to an area of at least three timesthe area occupied by each animal when standing on four feet, regardlessof the size or condition of the animal. We are also proposing to add requirementsfor enhancing the environment of the primary enclosures used for maintainingnonhuman primates, in accordance with the 1985 amendments to the Act.In preparing our proposal of minimum requirements for a physical environmentadequate to promote the psychological well-being of nonhuman primates,we utilized the Agency's expertise and experience in regulating the humanehandling, care, and treatment of nonhuman primates. Because this is thefirst occasion the Agency has been charged with responsibility for regulationsto promote the psychological well-being of nonhuman primates, we consideredit important and instructive to consult with experts and representativesof regulated industries. We requested their advice on the minimum spaceand other environmental requirements they considered necessary to meetthe psychological needs of nonhuman primates.As stated previously in this Supplementary Information, the National Institutesof Health (NIH), Public Health Service recommended experts to advise usregarding minimum standards for promoting the psychological well-beingof nonhuman primates. A group of 10 nonhuman primate experts was selectedand was asked to formulate a recommendation for these minimum standards.We also requested the American Association of Zoological Parks and Aquariums(AAZPA) to recommend minimum requirements. Both groups presented us witha comprehensive report consisting of their recommendations for appropriatespace requirements, environmental enhancements, social grouping and interaction,and other minimum standards they considered necessary to promote the psychologicalwell-being of nonhuman primates. The consensus of opinion was that nonhumanprimates need physical and mental stimulation for their psychological well-being,to enhance their developmental growth, and to make them better sociallyadjusted. The reports indicated that the need for stimulation could bemet by allowing them sufficient space to engage in species-typical behavior,by providing enclosure complexities such as perches and swings, by providingmanipulable objects (such as balls and other objects), and by varying themethods of feeding (such as allowing the primates to forage for food).The reports indicated that social interaction and exercise are equallynecessary to promote their psychological well-being and that social groupingincreases the primates' physical activity. The reports differed, however,in their recommendations of the precise means, or combination of means,considered necessary to promote the primates' psychological needs. Basedon these reports and our observation of and experience with nonhuman primates,and considering the differences of opinion among the various professionalcommunities maintaining nonhuman primates, we have determined that nonhumanprimates have an acknowledged need for physical and mental stimulation,and that their needs can be met in various ways. We have considered the environmental conditions under which nonhuman primatesare maintained by regulated persons, and are proposing minimum standardsfor primary enclosures used by research facilities (including federal researchfacilities), dealers, exhibitors, and traveling or mobile animal act exhibitors.We have proposed four sets of minimum standards because the environmentin which a nonhuman primate is maintained may satisfy some of its needsand may require providing other forms of stimulation or environmental enhancementsto satisfy other needs. For example, grouping by families and compatiblenonhuman primate species would meet the need for social interaction ofprimates maintained in permanent zoo exhibits, while creating other needs,such as the need of exhibited animals to have privacy from each other andfrom the public. In other cases, environmental conditions may restrictthe opportunity to provide stimulation through otherwise accepted meansbecause it may not be in the best interest of the primates' safety, health,and well-being to do so. For example, dealers may need to individuallyhouse newcomers if placing them in an enclosure with an established groupwould cause aggressive behavior among the other nonhuman primates. Thepsychological needs of the individually housed primates would have to bemet through other means. Accordingly, as explained in greater detail below, we are proposing thatprimary enclosures used to maintain nonhuman primates must provide sufficientspace, as set forth in our proposal, and that nonhuman primates must haveexercise, social interaction (or human interaction), and environmentalenrichments, consistent with their safety, health, and well-being. Theminimum amount of space that would be required for each nonhuman primate,and the kind and amount of other means of meeting psychological needs thatwould be required under our proposal would vary among the four sets ofminimum standards and would depend upon all the forms and opportunitiesfor physical and mental stimulation presented to nonhumn primates in theenvironments typically provided by research facilities, dealers, exhibitors,and mobile or traveling animal act exhibitors, respectively. Under ourproposal, when an acknowledged means of providing the stimulation considerednecessary for the primates' psychological well-being is amply suppliedbecause of the environment in which the primates are maintained, otherrequirements for providing stimulation may be affected, as long as a sufficientamount and variety of stimulation is provided to meet the animals' psychologicalneeds. The proposed space requirements are minimum standards that must be providedto <T3>each </T3>nonhuman primate contained in a primary enclosure, unlessotherwise specified. Consequently, if two nonhuman primates are housedtogether in one enclosure maintained by a research facility, the minimumfloor area would be the sum of the minimum floor area space requirementsthat must be provided to each animal. The minimum height for the animalwould likewise be increased, up to twice the greatest height required forany of the nonhuman primates contained in the primary enclosure but notto exceed 84 inches in height. This is because taller enclosures wouldnot fit in most rooms and would not be necessary as long as each animalhas a sufficient volume of space. Also, the proposed regulations wouldnot allow the size of a primary enclosure to be reduced because it containsa suspended fixture, such as a swing or a perch.<ITAG tagnum="81">1. Research facilities, federal research facilities </ITAG>Our observations of nonhuman primates maintained in research facilitiesand the advice of the expert committee convened by APHIS, indicate thatnonhuman primates used in research typically interact regularly with theirhuman caretakers. Studies involving nonhuman primates often require observationby and physical contact with a principal investigator, perhaps severaltimes each day. In fact, it has been shown that even intrusive procedures,such as drawing blood, are not stressful to chimpanzees maintained in researchfacilities, if performed by a familiar, trusted caretaker. Interactionwith human caretakers, if a positive experience, is considered significantin alleviating distress under experimental conditions and helps promotethe psychological well-being of nonhuman primates maintained in researchenvironments.Although human interaction provides a primary source of stimulation tononhuman primates maintained by research facilities, we have determinedthat other forms of physical and mental stimulation must also be provided.The need for environmental enrichments is explained under the heading,``Additional requirements for research facilities.'' Specific requirementsare proposed in andSection; 3.81, ``Additional requirements for researchfacilities.''We have also determined that nonhuman primates need greater space thanthat required under the current regulations, so that they can engage inspecies-typical physical activity that is necessary for their psychologicalwell-being. As stated above, the minimum space requirements we are proposingmust be provided to <T3>each </T3>nonhuman primate in an enclosure. Accordingly, nonhuman primatesmaintained in groups will have larger enclosures in which to engage inphysical activity. Communally-housed primates engage in increased physicalactivity, prompted by their interaction. Those housed individually willhave to be released into larger primary enclosures (at least three timesthe minimum area and twice the minimum height up to 84 inches) for exerciseunless they are housed in primary enclosures that provide twice the minimumvolume required. This release requirement is also explained in greaterdetail under the heading, ``Additional requirements for research facilities.''We are proposing minimum primary enclosures space requirements that weconsider sufficient to promote the psychological well-being of nonhumanprimates, in light of the social interaction they receive and the additionalenvironmental enhancements that must also be provided. The minimum enclosuresizes proposed are based on the typical weight of the species, except forbrachiating species, in accordance with the following table:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>7,L2,tp0,i1,6,10,10,10,10,8,8</C> <H1>Group</H1><H1>Weight</H1><H2>lbs.</H2><H2>(kg.)</H2><H1>Floor Area/Animal</H1><H2>ft.\2\</H2><H2>(m\2\)</H2><H1>Height</H1><H2>in.</H2><H2>(cm.)</H2><ITAG tagnum="1">1 <D>2.2 </D><D>(1) </D><D>1.6 </D><D>(0.15) </D><D>20 </D><D>(50.8)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2 <D>2.2-6.6 </D><D>(1-3) </D><D>3.0 </D><D>(0.28) </D><D>30 </D><D>(76.2)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3 <D>6.6-20.0 </D><D>(3-10) </D><D>4.3 </D><D>(0.40) </D><D>30 </D><D>(76.2)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4 <D>20.0-33.0 </D><D>(10-15) </D><D>6.0 </D><D>(0.56) </D><D>32 </D><D>(81.28)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5 <D>33.0-55.0 </D><D>(15-25) </D><D>8.0 </D><D>(0.74) </D><D>36 </D><D>(91.44)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">6 <D>55.0-88.0 </D><D>(25-40) </D><D>25.1 </D><D>(2.33) </D><D>84 </D><D>(213.36)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7 <D>andgreater;88.0 </D><D>(andgreater;40 kg.) </D><D>50.0 </D><D>(4.65) </D><D>84 </D><D>(213.36)</D></ITAG></ITAG>The proposed enclosure sizes are similar to those provided in the NIH Guide,except that the NIH Guide categorizes nonhuman primates by weight intosix categories, combining Groups 6 and 7 into one category for all nonhumanprimate species over 55.0 pounds. We do not believe it would be appropriateto require the same minimum floor area and height for the larger greatapes weighing over 88.0 pounds, such as gorillas, as for the smaller greatape species, since the former are substantially larger in size and consequentlyrequire more space for their psychological well-being. Our decision topropose seven weight groups for determining minimum space requirementsis in accordance with the recommendations we received from the expert committeeon nonhuman primates.The proposed minimum floor area and height that must be provided by researchfacilities, including federal research facilities, were also recommendedby the committee as sufficient to promote the psychological well-beingof nonhuman primates.Nonhuman primates would be categorized into these seven groups by the typicalweight of animals of their species, except for infants (up to 6 monthsof age) and juveniles (6 months to 3 years of age) of various species thatmay weigh so much less than adults of their species that they are groupedwith lighter weight species unless they obviously require greater spaceto make normal postural adjustments and movements, and except for brachiatingspecies. Brachiating species are those that typically hang or swing bytheir arms so that they are suspended in the air and fully extended. Thefollowing are examples of the types of nonhuman primates that fall intoeach group:<ITAG tagnum="15">Group 1_Marmosets, Tamarins, and infants of various species.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Group 2_Capuchins, Squirrel Monkeys and species of similar size, andjuveniles of various species.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Group 3_Macaques and African species.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Group 4_Male Macaques and large African species.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Group 5_Baboons and nonbrachiating species larger than 33.0 lbs. (15kg.).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Group 6_Great Apes up to 88.0 lbs. (40 kg.) and brachiating species.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Group 7_Great Apes greater than 88.0 lbs. (40 kg.).</ITAG>We determined it appropriate to provide guidelines to research facilitiesby proposing these seven weight groups. In most instances, the specifieddimensions for the various species will be sufficient to promote the primates'psychological well-being, and the table can be used to determine the minimumspace requirements for each species. However, if a nonhuman primate isunable to make normal postural adjustments and movements, or cannot doso without difficulty, notwithstanding the table, it must be provided greaterspace.We encourage the design and development of pimary enclosures that promotethe psychological well-being of nonhuman primates by providing them withsufficient space and unrestricted opportunity for movement and exercise,and by allowing them to interact physically and socially with other nonhumanprimates. Accordingly, we are proposing to allow the use of primary enclosuresthat do not precisely meet the space requirements otherwise required ofresearch facilities upon application to the Administrator for permission.An applicant would be required to demonstrate both in writing and throughuse of photographic aids that the proposed primary enclosure provides sufficientspace and is designed so that the nonhuman primates can express species-typicalbehavior. The Administrator would grant the application if he or she determinesit meets our requirements for promoting the psychological well-being ofthe nonhuman primates, or would deny it if he or she determines that itis detrimental to the health and psychological well-being of the nonhumanprimates proposed to be housed in the enclosure. The nonhuman primateshoused in the enclosure would be excused from the required social releaseperiod required in proposed andSection; 3.81(a)(3) if the applicant demonstratesthat the primary enclosure is designed and constructed in a manner thatprovides for the nonhuman primates' psychological well-being by allowingthem sufficient exercise and social interaction.Additional requirements are imposed upon research facilities to provideenvironmental enrichments whenever possible in accordance with the mandateof the Act, as amended, and Part 2 of the Animal Welfare regulations. Sincethere are unique considerations in many instances because of the necessitiesof animal care and use procedures, we are proposing to place these additionalrequirements in a separate section, proposed andSection; 3.81, which followsthis discussion of minimum space and environmental requirements. We believethat the space requirements of proposed andSection; 3.80(c)(1) together withthe requirements proposed in andSection; 3.81 will promote the psychologicalwell-being of nonhuman primates used in research. <ITAG tagnum="81">2. Dealers </ITAG>From our experience in regulating dealers, we have determined that dealersobtain nonhuman primates from various parts of the country and the world.These nonhuman primates are of various species and may have been transportedindividually or with an established group. In most instances, the timeperiod nonhuman primates are held by dealers is relatively brief. Generally,dealers hold the animals until they are sold, which usually occurs quickly,or until arrangements are made for transferring them to their new owner.Accordingly, nonhuman primates maintained by dealers are typically subjectto the stresses of travel and transiency. Unlike nonhuman primates maintained by research facilities, that have beenconditioned so that their health status is stable and known, newly importedare transported nonhuman primates can carry disease organisms requiringquarantine and/or veterinary care. Some may carry disease organisms thatdo not affect it, but that may affect others primates of the same speciesfrom different locales, and other species that may be suspectible. Thisrisk exists even after they have completed a quarantine period. In addition,the stress of shipment makes them more susceptible to disease. Accordingly,health concerns frequently require that nonhuman primates be individuallyhoused, to promote their well-being. These concerns would not impact uponestablished groups, since all the animals in the group would have beenexposed to the same disease hazards and would generally have the same immunities.Established groups of nonhuman primates are known to have defined socialstructures, with dominant animals at the head of the pecking order. Whennew primates of the same or different species are introduced into an establishedgroup, aggression among the primates frequently results as they attemptto establish the newcomer's status in the social structure. This aggressivebehavior is dangerous for the nonhuman primates and for their caretakers.We believe that the hazards attendant to altering the social compositionof an established group for what is generally a brief period may requirethat individual nonhuman primates obtained by dealers be housed apart fromestablished social groups for the primates' safety, and that they shouldnot be introduced into the group. Accordingly, we believe that these health and safety concerns justify requiringthat nonhuman primates' needs be met through means that do not includephysical interaction with other nonhuman primates, in accordance with thedetermination of the attending veterinarian, unless the primates are partof an established group. Under our proposal, dealers would remain subjectto the requirements of paragraph (b), ``Social grouping,'' and must ensurethat individually housed nonhuman primates can see and hear other nonhumanprimates of their own or compatible species, or have positive physicalcontact or other interaction with their keeper or other familiar and knowledgeableperson for at least one hour a day. Because social interaction among nonhuman primates maintained by dealersmay be restricted for health and safety reasons, we would require thatdealers provide multiple enrichments of the physical environment of theprimary enclosures that are appropriate for the nonhuman primates' speciesand age, in order to satisfy the animals' psychological needs. The proposedenrichments are essential for providing sufficient physical and mentalstimulation to the nonhuman primates, particularly if they are individuallyhoused. Examples of enrichments we would require include providing perches,swings, mirrors, or other increased cage complexities; providing toys,balls, and objects for the animals to play with or manipulate; and varyingthe method of feeding to make it more interesting to the primates or tostimulate feeding in nature. We would require multiple enrichments foreach animal housed in a primary enclosure. We are proposing minimum space requirements for individually housed nonhumanprimates held by dealers that are twice the minimum floor area and twicethe minimum height (up to a maximum of 84 inches) that research facilitieswould be required to provide. We believe the increase in minimum spacerequirements over that required of research facilities is necessary topromote physical activity because individually housed nonhuman primatesmay not be released for exercise and are not as active as those housedin social groups. The reader should note that nonhuman primates maintainedin research facilities housed in enclosures providing twice the minimumfloor area and twice the minimum height, up to a maximum of 84 inches,are not required to be released for exercise under our proposal. Nonhumanprimates held by dealers also have less social interaction with other speciesthan those maintained in research facilities, for reasons cited above,and have less interaction with humans. Increasing the required minimumspace will provide an opportunity for greater physical activity and stimulation.We would require that nonhuman primates housed in pairs, families, or othersocial groups be provided the same minimum space as research facilitieswould be required to provide. Unlike the requirements we are proposingfor individually housed nonhuman primates, we are not proposing to requiretwice the minimum space that research facilities must provide to pairs,families, or other social groups, because the nonhuman primates will receiveincreased physical and mental stimulation through interaction with othergroup members. The different species of nonhuman primates would be categorized into thesame 7 groups as for research facilities. Because of the increased spaceprovided, the brief time they are held by dealers, and the health and safetyreasons cited above, we would not require that the animals be releasedfor exercise or social interaction. The proposed regulations would allow dealers to provide the same minimumspace required of research facilities under certain specifically identifiedcircumstances, when necessary. These purposes are limited to: holding theanimal for a required quarantine period, having the animal receive veterinarycare as directed by the attending veterinarian, and transporting the animalto or from an auction sale and holding it at the sale. All of these occasionswould be brief. Based on our observation of and experience in regulatingdealers we believe that it is necessary to restrict the animals' spaceunder these circumstances so that the dealers can properly observe andhandle the nonhuman primates. It would also reduce the possibility of injuryto both the nonhuman primate and its handler. The requirement to provideenvironmental enrichments would remain in full force to provide for theanimals' psychological needs during these short-term periods. <ITAG tagnum="81">3. Exhibitors </ITAG>We believe that many of the psychological needs of nonhuman primates maintainedin zoos are satisfied because they are housed in primary enclosures insocial groups in more naturalistic environments. Because of their communalhousing they have greater opportunity for physical activity and mentalstimulation. Perches and climbing structures are often provided to themin their naturalistic environment so that the viewing public can observetheir species-typical behavior. However, we have determined, based uponthe information available to us, that their environment necessitates environmentalenrichments to accommodate other needs in promoting their psychologicalwell-being. For example, some species of nonhuman primates maintained inpermanent zoo exhibits may require privacy and refuge from the public,and from each other, as a result of daily public exposure. Also, unlikenonhuman primates maintained by research facilities and dealers, primatesmaintained in permanent zoo exhibits are encouraged to mate and reproduce.It has been scientifically shown that nonhuman primates in psychologicaldistress do not engage in normal reproductive behavior. Accordingly, theirphysical environment must be enriched to promote their psychological well-being,so that they may do so. We are proposing minimum space and environmental enrichment requirementsthat are similar to this recommendations presented to us by the AmericanAssociation of Zoological Parks and Aquariums (AAZPA) in its report. Thisstudy was compiled at our request and was the result of a collective effortof a committee of AAZPA members. The AAZPA study categorizes nonhuman primatesinto seven groups based upon the known social behavior of the animals,as opposed to typical weight of the species. Each nonhuman primate specieshas different needs, based upon its typical social behavior and physicalactivity that must be satisfied for their psychological well-being in azoo or exhibition environment. The minimum space, environmental enrichments, and social grouping requiredin the proposed regulations for each group of nonhuman primates is basedupon our experience in regulating exhibitors and the industry's recommendationsafter observation of and experience with the animals. We believe they willbe appropriate to promote the psychological well-being of each of the species.The specific minimum space and environmental requirements are set forthin the rule portion of this document at proposed andSection;3.80(c)(3), andappear in chart form. The chart divides the various species into 7 groupsand offers examples of the types of nonhuman primates included in each.For each grouping, the chart specifies the minimum number of nonhuman primatesto be housed together in a primary enclosure, the minimum space requirementsfor that group, whether shelters are required and if so how many and ofwhat size and the furnishings that are required to enrich the environmentin the primary enclosure and provide for the animals' psychological well-being.Except for great apes, we are proposing minimum space requirements forgroups of nonhuman primates, in accordance with the AAZPA recommendations,and not for individual animals. <ITAG tagnum="81">4. Mobile or traveling animal act exhibitors </ITAG>Our proposal for minimum space and environmental requirements applicableto mobile or traveling animal act exhibitors is in two parts. One partpertains to nonhuman primates that participate daily in animal acts, shows,or training periods outside of their primary enclosure. The second pertainsto nonhuman primates that are permanently contained in their primary enclosure.We are proposing regulations in accordance with these two classificationsbecause we have determined, based upon observation and our experience inregulating mobile or traveling animal act exhibitors, that animals usedin trained animal acts are generally released daily for training or forperformances, except during brief layovers between shows, and that untrainedanimals are used primarily for public exhibition and are not released.We are not aware of any nonhuman primates used in traveling exhibitionsthat would justify proposing an additional set of requirements. Trained, performing nonhuman primates receive a great deal of mental andphysical stimulation on a daily basis. Their lives are enriched and variedthrough multiple performances on a daily basis, and training sessions inbetween. When performing, the primates are in a close, working relationshipwith their trainer, and with any other animals in the act. Between performances,the nonhuman primates are given training sessions to sharpen their performancesand to learn new routines. We believe that these nonhuman primates' psychologicalneeds are met by their interaction and activity. Accordingly, we do notconsider it necessary to require additional environmental enrichments intheir primary enclosures. We are proposing in andSection;3.80(c)(4)(i) thatmobile or traveling animal act exhibitors provide the minimum space requiredof research facilities. We believe this space is sufficient to promotethe psychological well-being of the nonhuman primates when they are containedin primary enclosures. Nonhuman primates used in mobile or traveling animal act exhibits thatare not trained and are used for static or stationary exhibits do not receivedaily interaction with their caretakers, unlike those maintained in researchfacilities. Often they are solitary exhibits, such as gorillas held forpublic viewing, and do not interact with other nonhuman primates. Unlikethe nonhuman primates held by dealers, the animals are maintained underthese circumstances for long periods, without being released, and thereforerequire more environmental stimuli and opportunities for physical activityto promote their psychological well-being than nonhuman primates maintainedby research facilities, dealers, and exhibitors. We are therefore proposingto require multiple environmental enrichments that allow the differentspecies of nonhuman primates to engage in species-typical behavior. Theenrichments required would be similar in kind to those that dealers andexhibitors are required to provide, and they too must be appropriate forthe species and age of the animal. We are proposing that the minimum spacethat must be provided to these nonhuman primates be at least three timesthe floor area and twice the height (up to a maximum height of 84 inches)that research facilities are required to provide. We believe that enclosuresproviding this minimum space would be appropriate for housing up to threenonhuman primates under these circumstances, since their social interactionwill provide greater opportunity for physical stimulation. The minimumspace provided would be required to be increased in accordance with paragraph(d) of proposed andSection;3.80 for each additional 1-3 nonhuman primatesalso housed in the primary enclosure. We believe that the increased minimumspace is necessary to encourage and allow greater physical activity andwould also be consistent with highway travel restrictions. We believe thatif these requirements are met, the psychological needs of these nonhumanprimates will be satisfied. Except where otherwise stated, the minimum space requirements providedin proposed andSection;3.80(c) are mandatory for each individual nonhumanprimate housed in a primary enclosure. Accordingly, the minimum space providedmust be increased when nonhuman primates are housed in multiples in a primaryenclosure so that each has a sufficient volume of space in which to expressspecies-typical behavior since overcrowding is known to result in nonhumanprimates becoming agitated and to cause them to express abnormal behavior.We are proposing to require that primary enclosures be increased in sizeby the floor area required for each nonhuman primates if it were housedindividually and that the minimum height provided by twice that requiredfor the largest nonhuman primate in the enclosure, up to a maximum heightof 84 inches. We are not proposing to require that the minimum height providedbe increased for each additional animal housed in the primary enclosuresince the enlarged area coupled with the doubled height should providesufficient volume for the nonhuman primates' activity. Also, the maximumheight ceiling of 84 inches is a practical limitation since enclosuresof greater height would not fit in many rooms. Based upon the cited authorities and our experience, we believe that theseproposed minimum space and environmental enrichment requirements are sufficientto promote the psychological well-being of nonhuman primates maintainedby regulated persons. <ITAG tagnum="84">Variance </ITAG>We understood that the proposed minimum space requirements for nonhumanprimates might require persons subject to the Animal Welfare regulationsto rebuild or remodel their facialities and to expend previously unanticipatedand unbudgeted monies for new primary enclosures and fixtures. In someinstances major structural modifications might be required in order tosatisfy the proposed space requirements. Until the necessary adjustmentswere made, many registrants and licensees would not be in compliance withthe proposed requirements. In cases where the effective date of the regulations would not coincidewith a facility's fiscal years, we are aware that budget planning and fundingprocedures for the next fiscal year would take some time. Once funds havebeen appropriated, facilities would require additional time to make thenecessary space modifications. To allow facilities sufficient time to conformwith the proposed minimum space requirements, we are proposing to includea mechanism for issuing variances to eligible persons. This mechanism wouldbe similar to that already in place for licensees and registrants in SubpartE_``Specifications for the Humane Handling, Care, Treatment and Transportationof Marine Mammals.''A ``variance'' would be issued, in writing, by the Administrator of APHIS,and would allow an eligible registrant or licensee to continue operatingeven though not fully in compliance with the minimum space requirementsfor nonhuman primates. A variance would be limited to the proposed minimumspace requirements. It would not allow noncompliance with the proposedenvironmental enrichment, social grouping, and release requirements; theserequirements would have to be complied with upon the effective date ofthe regulations. The variance would be limited in scope both as to timeand to the primary enclosures covered by it, and would specify the portionsof the applicant's facilities to which it applied.Registrants and licensees maintaining or handling nonhuman primates, havingnonhuman primates on their premises or under their control or supervision,and not complying with the minimum space requirements proposed in andSection;3.80, would have to apply for a variance. Facilities that are under constructionor that are in the design or preliminary construction stages on the datethese regulations become effective, would not be eligible for a variancesince they could adapt their construction to comply with them. However,a facility that was so nearly complete that it would require substantialmodification at a previously unbudgeted and significant cost to bring itinto compliance would be eligible for a variance.A variance could be granted, at the sole discretion of the Administrator,for up to 2 years. We believe that this would allow sufficient time fora registrant or licensee to raise the necessary funds and to contract forthe required work, as well as to purchase whatever fixtures or equipmentwere necessary for it to comply with the minimum space requirements. Oneextension of up to 1 year could be granted by the Administator if he orshe determined that it was necessary, based upon the facts presented inthe application for an extension. The extension would be granted if justifieddue to unforeseen situations that prevented full compliance during thevariance period. As an example, unforeseen circumstances for research facilitiescould be nonallocation of public funds to make the necessary expenditures.An application for a variance would be required within 60 days of the effectivedate of these regulations and would have to be in writing. According tothe proposed regulations it must list, in detail, specific reasons whythe variance was being requested, and each of the minimum space requirementsthe facility cannot meet. It must identify the species and number of nonhumanprimates that would be affected by the variance, and must state the amountof time necessary for the applicant to come into compliance and the estimatedcost of compliance.We are proposing to require a statement from the attending veterinarianconcerning the age and health status of the nonhuman primates affectedby the variance, and addressing whether granting the variance would bedetrimental to the affected nonhuman primates.As is presently the case for marine mammals, the Administrator could requirethe submission of an outside independent expert report, if the Administratorbelieves it would assist him or her in determining whether the grantingof a variance would be detrimental to the health and psychological well-beingof the affected nonhuman primates. The applicant would bear the cost ofthe expert report.The Administrator would grant an application for a variance if he or shedetermined it was justified, or would deny it if he or she determined thatit was not justified or that granting it would be detrimental to the healthand psychological well-being of the nonhuman primates affected. The grantor denial would be in writing. The applicant could request that the Administratorreconsider his or her decision to deny an application, in accordance withthe requirements of andSection; 3.80(e)(4). Similarly, a request for an extensionwould be granted by the Administrator if he or she determined that it wasjustified, or denied if he or she determined that it was not justifiedor that granting it would be detrimental to the health and psychologicalwell-being of the nonhuman primates affected. The grant or denial of theextension would also be in writing. The applicant could request that theAdministrator reconsider his or her decision to deny an application foran extension, in accordance with the requirements of andSection; 3.80(e)(5).If the extension were granted upon reconsideration, it would be retroactiveto the termination date of the initial variance.Variances would be revocable for bad faith, such as a false representationon the initial application or in the request for extension. They couldalso be revoked if the purposes for which they were issued were not beingcarried out, or if they were detrimental to the health and psychologicalwell-being of the nonhuman primates affected.<ITAG tagnum="84">Additional requirements for research facilities</ITAG>In proposed andSection; 3.81, ``Additional requirements for research facilities,''we are proposing environmental enrichments that research facilities wouldbe required to provide, in addition to the minimum space requirements containedin proposed andSection; 3.80(c)(1). We are doing so because the Animal WelfareAct, as amended, and the regulations contained in Part 2 of the AnimalWelfare regulations (<T3>see </T3>companion docket no. 88-014, published elsewhere in this issueof the <T4>Federal Register </T4>impose specific duties on research facilitiesholding animals for research, testing, or teaching that are not imposedupon other regulated persons or industries, and that can affect their determinationof the specific means employed to promote the psychological well-beingof nonhuman primates. For example, andSection; 2.30(h) requires that researchfacilities provide for the psychological well-being of nonhuman primatesin accordance with the regulations and standards and that they maintaina record system indicating that they are complying with the regulations.Also, under the regulations in Part 2, Subpart C_``Institutional AnimalCare and Use Committee and Other Requirements for Research Facilities,''each facility's Committee must, among other things, review and approvea proposed animal care and use procedure [ACUP] before research, testing,or teaching can commence, inspect the facility for compliance with theseregulations in accordance with andSection; 2.35, and report deficiencies.Research facilities must also establish a written policy ensuring thatthe attending veterinarian is consulted in ACUP planning and development.Accordingly, in addition to prescribing the environmental enrichments thatresearch facilities would be required to provide, proposed andSection; 3.81includes reference to the role of the Committee and the attending veterinarianin promoting the psychological well-being of nonhuman primates.After considering all the information available to us, including the reportof the expert committee on nonhuman primates, we are proposing the followingminimum requirements to promote the psychological well-being of nonhumanprimates in accordance with the Act, as amended. These requirements arein addition to the minimum space requirements set forth in proposed andSection;3.80(c)(1).As explained above under the heading, ``Space and physical environment,''many of the psychological needs of nonhuman primates used in research facilitiesare met through their regular interaction with their human caretakers.However, we believe that environmental enrichments must also be providedby research facilities so that the primates can engage in species-typicalbehavior and receive sufficient physical and mental stimulation at alltimes. Proposed andSection; 3.81(a)(1) provides examples of the kinds ofenrichments that would be required under our proposal. These include: (1)Perches, swings, mirrors, and other cage complexities; (2) toys or objectsto manipulate; and (3) varied methods of feeding. We would require a combinationof environmental enrichments and that at least one form of enrichment fromeach type listed be provided. Proposed andSection; 3.81 would also requirethat research facilities house nonhuman primates in social groupings inprimary enclosures whenever possible, to increase their physical activityand for their psychological well-being.We are proposing additional requirements applicable to individually housednonhuman primates. In order to ensure that these primates have sufficientopportunity for physical activity, we would require that they be releasedfor at least four hours of exercise each week into an area that has atleast three times the floor area and twice the height of their primaryenclosure. Release would not be required if they are maintained in a primaryenclosure with other nonhuman primates, or if they are maintained in aprimary enclosure that is at least twice as great as that required forthe species, because they would have greater opportunities to engage inphysical activity on an ongoing basis. Under our proposal, nonhuman primatesmay be placed with compatible species during the required release period.This social interaction would promote their psychological well-being andis known to increase their physical activity.Proposed andSection; 3.81(a)(4) would also require research facilities toprovide for the special psychological needs of individually housed nonhumanprimates that are infants or juveniles, that are used in research thatdoes not provide for much activity, and those showing signs of psychologicaldistress. We would require that they consult with the attending veterinarianwho would instruct the facility as to the additional environmental enrichmentsthat must be provided to provide for the primates' psychological well-being.These three categories of nonhuman primates are specifically identifiedin the proposed regulations because we concur with the expert committeeon nonhuman primates that they require additional consideration of theirneeds to promote their psychological well-being. Infants and juvenilesare in the formative period of their developmental growth and require physicaland mental stimulation for normal development. They also require socialinteraction with other nonhuman primates so that they can function in accordancewith the typical social behavior for their species. Similarly, those requiredto be inactive lack the physical activity and stimulation considered importantfor their psychological well-being, and their needs must be provided forin different ways. The special needs of those showing signs of psychologicaldistress must also be individually addressed to prevent the developmentof psychological disorders. Because the needs and circumstances of individuallyhoused nonhuman primates falling under any of these categories will differon an individual basis, we believe it is appropriate to require that researchfacilities consult with their attending veterinarian, who has expertisein the care and treatment of the species being attended, and can prescribethe additional measures deemed necessary to satisfy the primates' psychologicalneeds. We would require the attending veterinarian to keep records of theseadditional instructions, and they would be subject to APHIS inspectionunder proposed andSection; 3.81(c).We are proposing to add a prohibition against confining nonhuman primatesin chairs, unless required by an animal care and use procedure and approvedby the Committee in accordance with Part 2 of the Animal Welfare regulations,and unless the animal is released daily for exercise for at least one continuoushour each day during the period of confinement unless continuous restraintin a chair is required by an animal care and use procedure and approvedby the Committee. If continuous restraint is approved we are proposingto require that the nonhuman primate be released for exercise for at leastone hour before and one hour after the period of restraint. We are proposingto include this prohibition because of the importance of physical activityin promoting the psychological well-being of nonhuman primates.The proposed regulations would also require that documentation of the releaseof nonhuman primates and of additional environmental enrichments orderedunder paragraph (a)(4) be kept by the attending veterinarian, subject toinspection by APHIS inspectors, and in the case of federal research facilities,to review by officials of any federal funding agency. These records wouldalso be subject to inspection by the Committee in accordance with the regulationsin Part 2. (<T3>See </T3>companion docket no. 88-014, published elsewhere in this issueof the <T4>Federal Register</T4>.)We recognize that certain situations will require an immediate responsefrom facility personnel when it is necessary to provide less than the minimumstandards to a nonhuman primate, due to the condition of the animal, inorder to provide for its welfare. We are proposing to include a provisionin proposed andSection; 3.81 that would authorize attending veterinariansto exempt or restrict a particular nonhuman primate from its required exerciseand social release period if he or she determines that it is necessaryfor the nonhuman primate's health, condition, or psychological well-beingdue to the physical or psychological condition of the animal. The exemptionwould be for a period of up to 30 days and must be recorded by the attendingveterinarian and subject to APHIS inspection and in the case of federalresearch facilities, to review by officials of any federal funding agency.We would require that the research facility be responsible for having theattending veterinarian review the grant of exemption at least every 30days to determine if it is still warranted under the circumstances. Exemptionswould be required to be included in the research facility's annual reportand in the Committee's inspection report under andSection; 2.35(b)(2)(i)(C).(<T3>See </T3>companion docket no. 88-014, published elsewhere in this issueof the <T4>Federal Register.</T4>) We believe that this exemption procedure wouldfill the need to have short-term authorization for deviation from theseproposed standards due to unusual or unanticipated circumstances.FeedingWe are proposing to revise the provisions of current andSection; 3.79 ``Feeding,''to include means of enhancing the psychological well-being of nonhumanprimates by varying the types of food and the methods of feeding, suchas by using task-oriented feeding or allowing the animals to forage forfood as in nature. We believe that requiring variation in the nonhumanprimates' feeding on a daily basis is a necessary means of providing necessarymental and physical stimulation.Proposed andSection; 3.82 would require multiple feeding sites if membersof dominant nonhuman primate or other species are fed together with othernonhuman primates and would require observation of the feeding practicesof the animals to determine that each receives a sufficient amount of food.We believe that this will also enhance the psychological well-being ofnonhuman primates by ensuring that each has access to food and will notbe prevented from obtaining food due to the aggressive behavior of others.We are proposing minor changes to current andSection; 3.79 to provide thatthe amount of food, type of food, and frequency of feeding must be appropriatefor the species, size, age, and condition of the nonhuman primate, andmust be in accordance with generally accepted professional and husbandrypractices and nutritional standards. In accordance with those practicesand standards, consideration would also be given to the conditions underwhich the animal is kept, such as whether it is maintained in a primaryenclosure allowing it frequent vigorous activity or if it is maintainedin a primary enclosure that is more limiting, and whether it is maintainedoutdoors in a cold environment or in a warm environment, since these variablesmay affect the amount of food that is appropriate for the animal. Also,in accordance with Part 2 of the Animal Welfare regulations, any deviationfrom these standards due to the necessities of research must be justifiedby an animal care and use procedure approved by the facility's Committee.(See companion docket no. 88-014, published elsewhere in this issue ofthe <T4>Federal Register.)</T4>Proposed andSection; 3.82 would also require that nonhuman primates be fedat least once each day unless otherwise required to provide adequate veterinarycare to the animals.We would continue to require sanitization of food containers at least onceevery two weeks and would also require that food containers be sanitizedanytime they are used to provide food to a different nonhuman primate orsocial grouping of nonhuman primates. Approved methods for sanitizationwould be those methods provided in proposed andSection; 3.84(b) for sanitizationof primary enclosures.WateringWe are proposing minor changes to current andSection; 3.80 to require thatsufficient potable water be provided to the nonhuman primates. We are retainingthe requirement that if water is not available to the nonhuman primatesat all times, it must be offered to them at least twice a day and we areproposing to add a requirement that the water be offered for at least onehour each time it is offered. The attending veterinarian could vary theserequirements if he or she determines it is necessary to provide adequateveterinary care to the nonhuman primates. The proposed regulation wouldcontinue to require sanitization of water containers at least once everytwo weeks and would also require sanitization when used to provide waterto a different nonhuman primate or social grouping of nonhuman primates.Approved methods of sanitization would be those methods provided in proposedandSection; 3.84(b)(3) for sanitization of primary enclosures.Cleaning, sanitization, housekeeping, and pest controlIn proposed andSection; 3.84 we are proposing requirements similar to thosein current andSection; 3.81 concerning cleaning, sanitization, housekeeping,and pest control, in order to provide for the welfare and well-being ofnonhuman primates. The proposed revisions to current andSection; 3.81 includerequiring removal of excreta and food waste from primary enclosures andfrom pans underneath primary enclosures with grill-type floors at leastdaily and as often as necessary, rather than merely ``as often as necessary''as in the current regulations, and requiring removal of the animals froma primary enclosure when a cleaning method using water is performed sothat they will not be involuntarily wetted or injured. We are proposingto require that fixtures inside of primary enclosures, such as bars andshelves, must be kept clean and be replaced when worn. In addition to requiringsanitization of planted areas inside of primary enclosures and gravel,sand, and dirt surfaces by removing contaiminated material, the proposedregulations would require that they be raked and spot cleaned daily. Asexplained above under the heading ``Facilities, general'' if the nonhumanprimates engage in scent marking, the primary enclosures must be spot cleaneddaily and sanitized at regular intervals established in accordance withgenerally accepted professional and husbandry practices, so as not to causethose animals psychological distress.We believe that these additional requirements will enhance the physicalenvironment in which nonhuman primates are maintained through cleanlinessand that they are necessary for their general welfare.We are proposing nonsubstantive changes to current subsections (a)-(d)for purposes of clarity. We believe that these clarifications will makethe regulations easier to understand and comply with.EmployeesCurrent andSection; 3.82 requires that there be a sufficient number of employeesto maintain the prescribed level of husbandry practices required by SubpartD and the rendering of husbandry practices be under the supervision ofan animal caretaker with a background in animal husbandry or care. We areproposing minor revisions to this section in proposed andSection; 3.85 tomake clear that this requirement is imposed upon every person subject tothe Animal Welfare regulations, and that the burden of making certain thatthe supervisor is appropriately qualified is on the employer regulatedunder the Act. We are not proposing to prescribe a specific number of employeesfor each facility, because the number of employees needed will vary accordingto the size and configuration of the facility, and according to the numberand type of animals housed there. We would require that a facility haveenough employees to carry out proper feeding, cleaning, observation, andother generally accepted professional and husbandary practices.Social grouping and separationWe are proposing to revise current andSection; 3.83 concerning social groupingof nonhuman primates in primary enclosures in order to promote their psychologicalwell-being. The current regulations provide that when nonhuman primatesare housed together they must be maintained in compatible groups and mustnot be housed in the same enclosure with animal species other than nonhumanprimates. We are proposing to allow nonhuman primates to be housed withother nonhuman primate species and with other animal species as long asthey are compatible, do not compete with the other species for food andshelter, and will not be hazardous in any way to the health and well-beingof each other.We are proposing to add the following regulations requiring separationof nonhuman primates in the following circumstances: (1) Nonhuman primatesexhibiting vicious or overly aggressive behavior must be housed separatelyand (2) nonhuman primates under quarantine or treatment for a communicabledisease must be housed separately. We believe the requirements to housenonhuman primates separately under these limited circumstances are necessaryto allow nonhuman primates to peacefully coexist in primary enclosures,as is required for their psychologial well-being, and to protect theirphysical health and welfare.The proposed regulations would include provisions for keeping familiestogether and for keeping compatible groups constant. This is because studiesof nonhuman primates have shown that they are socialized in a family-orientedmanner in nature and that varying a group's composition may lead to distressor aggressive behavior towards new members of the group. Accordingly, webelieve these regulations are necessary to promote the psychological well-beingof nonhuman primates.<ITAG tagnum="84">Transportation standards</ITAG>In preparing our proposal to amend the transportation standards we consultedthe ``Interagency Primate Steering Committee Guidelines'' developed bythe United States National Institutes of Health-sponsored Interagency PrimateSteering Committee. The Interagency Primate Steering Committee is composedof an inter-agency group of scientists concerned with the care and handlingof nonhuman primates. The introduction to the Guidelines states the following:<ITAG tagnum="21">Shipment of nonhuman primates by a carrier from one location to anotheris stressful, even under the best of conditions. The purpose of these guidelinesis to minimize the effects of transportation stress on these animals andto have them arrive at their destination in as good a physical conditionas possible, with a minimal degree of illness or mortality. Secondly, theguidelines are intended to serve as a reference for adequate care of nonhumanprimates for all persons involved with the shipping of these animals.</ITAG>We also considered the transportation standards proposed by the U.S. Departmentof the Interior, Fish and Wildlife Service (USFWS) for nonhuman primatesimported from abroad.Based upon our experience enforcing the current regulations, and our considerationof the information available to us, we are proposing the following revisionsto the transportation standards in order to safeguard the health, safety,and psychological well-being of nonhuman primates transported in commerce.As part of this revision, we are proposing to include requirements thatwere previously part of the Animal Welfare regulations but were inadvertentlyomitted from the 1977 revision of the regulations. When the transportationstandards were rewritten in 1977 to incorporate the 1976 amendments tothe Act concerning the commercial transportation of animals, the existingstandards for surface transportation were not included in the regulations.Since that time, the standards have pertained to the commercial transportationby common carrier and only a few subsections have pertained to surfacetransportation by private vehicle. This omission has caused numerous difficultiesin the enforcement of standards regarding surface transportation of nonhumanprimates and in the prosecution of persons who have improperly handledand transported nonhuman primates by private surface vehicle. The reinstatedregulations particularly affect provisions concerning ambient temperaturespecifications during surface transportation that should result in improvedtraveling conditions for nonhuman primates. They also impose similar requirementson all persons subject to the Animal Welfare regulations engaged in thetransportation of nonhuman primates, so that the animals will be affordednecessary protections whenever they are transported in commerce. Consignments to Carriers and Intermediate Handlers for Transportation The current obligations imposed upon carriers and intermediate handlers(defined in Part 1 of the regulations and published elsewhere in this issueof the <T4>Federal Register</T4>) would be expanded to ensure the well-being ofnonhuman primates during transport in commerce. Certain prerequisites mustbe satisfied before carriers and intermediate handlers may accept nonhumanprimates for transport in commerce. Additionally, the carriers and intermediatehandlers have certain duties to fulfill after the shipment has reachedits destination. Various obligations are presently contained in currentandSection;andSection; 3.85 and 3.88. We are proposing to consolidate themin one section, proposed andSection; 3.87, and to add some additional onesthat are necessary for the nonhuman primates' welfare.The reader should note that our proposed regulations do not specificallyrefer to operators of auction sales, unlike the current regulations. Thedefinition of the term ``dealer'' was amended in 1976 to include any personwho ``negotiates the purchase or sale'' of animals for research, teaching,exhibition, or use as a pet. Operators of auction sales are therefore dealers.However, we did not remove the reference to them in the 1977 amendmentsto the regulations. We are proposing to do so now, to clarify the regulations.Accordingly, all references to dealers in the regulations would includeoperators of auction sales.In sum, the requirements imposed on carriers and intermediate handlersin current andSection; 3.85 are as follows: (1) Current andSection; 3.85(a)requires that carriers and intermediate handlers not accept a live nonhumanprimate for shipment from any person subject to the regulations more than4 hours before the scheduled departure time of the primary conveyance inwhich the animal will be shipped, except that this time may be extendedby agreement to 6 hours if specific prior scheduling of the shipment hasbeen made. (2) Current andSection; 3.85(b) requires that carriers or intermediatehandlers accept a nonhuman primate for shipment only if it is in a primaryenclosure meeting the requirements of current andSection; 3.85 ``Primaryenclosures used to transport live nonhuman primates,'' except that theymay accept a nonhuman primate if it is consigned by a person subject tothe regulations who provides a certificate stating that the primary enclosureconforms with andSection; 3.85, unless the enclosure is obviously defective.The information required to be in the certificate is stated in the regulation.Current andSection; 3.85(c) states that carriers and intermediate handlerswhose facilities do not meet the minimum temperature requirements providedin the regulations may accept a nonhuman primate for transport if the consignorfurnishes a certificate executed by a veterinarian accredited by USDA within10 days before delivery of the animal for transport stating that the nonhumanprimate is acclimated to air temperatures lower than those prescribed incurrent andSection;andSection; 3.90 and 3.91. The information required to bein the certificate is likewise stated in the regulation. Current andSection;3.85(d) requires carriers and intermediate handlers to notify the consigneeof the animal's arrival at least once every 6 hours following arrival ofthe nonhuman primate at the animal holding area of a terminal facilityand to record the time, date, and method of attempted and final notificationon the shipping document.Current andSection; 3.88 requires the following: (1) andSection; 3.88(a) requiresthat nonhuman primates be offered potable water within the four hours precedingtransport in commerce. Dealers, exhibitors, and research facilities arerequired to provide water to nonhuman primates transported in their ownprimary conveyance at least every 12 hours after transportation is begunand carriers and intermediate handlers are required to do so at least every12 hours after they accept the animal for transport. (2) Current andSection; 3.88(b) provides requirements concerning the frequencyof feeding nonhuman primates and similarly distinguishes between thosepersons transporting nonhuman primates in their own primary conveyances,and carriers and intermediate handlers.(3) Current andSection; 3.88(c) requires any dealer, research facility, exhibitor,or operator of an auction sale consigning nonhuman primates for transportto affix written instructions concerning the animals' food and water requirementson the outside of the primary enclosure used for transporting the nonhumanprimate. (4) Current andSection; 3.88(d) states that no carrier or intermediate handlershall accept a nonhuman primate for transport in commerce unless writteninstructions concerning food and water requirements are affixed to theoutside of its primary enclosure. We are proposing to place the various prerequisites that must be satisfiedbefore carriers and intermediate handlers can accept a nonhuman primatefor transport in commerce in proposed andSection; 3.87, and to add some additionalones that are necessary for the nonhuman primates' well-being. We are alsoproposing nonsubstantive changes to current andSection; 3.85(a) in proposedandSection; 3.87(a). Proposed andSection; 3.87(c) would contain the requirements of current andSection;3.88(d) by requiring that written instructions concerning the food andwater requirements for each nonhuman primate in the shipment be securelyattached to the outside of the primary enclosure before a carrier or intermediatehandler may accept it for transport. As stated above, current andSection; 3.88(a) provides that nonhuman primatesmust be provided water at least every 12 hours after acceptance by carriersand intermediate handlers for transportation. Current andSection; 3.88(b)provides that nonhuman primates more than 1 year of age be offered foodat least once every 24 hours after acceptance by carriers and intermediatehandlers for transportation and that nonhuman primates less than 1 yearof age be offered food at least once every 12 hours after acceptance fortransportation. It is conceivable under these regulations that a nonhumanprimate would have been fed up to 24 hours before being consigned for transportationin commerce and would then not be offered food for another 24-hour period.To avoid this occurrence, and to be sure that nonhuman primates are givenwater as often as required for their well-being, we are proposing to adda certification requirement in proposed andSection; 3.87(d) that would statethat each nonhuman primate in a primary enclosure delivered for transportwas last offered food during the 12 hours before delivery to a carrieror intermediate handler and was last offered water during the 4 hours beforedelivery to a carrier or intermediate handler. It must also state the dateand time each nonhuman primate in the primary enclosure was last offeredfood and water. Carriers and intermediate handlers would not be allowedto accept nonhuman primates for transport unless this certification accompaniesthe animal, is signed and dated by the consignor, and the date and timeit was executed is stated. This certification, as well as the others requiredin proposed andSection; 3.87, would also have to specify the species of nonhumanprimate contained in the primary enclosure. In addition, as provided under proposed andSection; 3.90, ``Food and waterrequirements,'' the time periods applicable to carriers and intermediatehandlers for feeding and watering the nonhuman primates would begin withthe time the animal was last offered food and water, in accordance withthe certification. The proposed requirement that the consignor certifythat the nonhuman primates were provided water within the 4 hours beforedelivery to the carrier or intermediate handler, and were offered foodwithin 12 hours before delivery to the carrier or intermediate handleraccepting the animals, would avoid situations where the carrier or intermediatehandler would have to provide food and water immediately upon acceptance.We are adding these requirements so that carriers and intermediate handlerswill be better able to provide any needed care and so that the nonhumanprimates being transported will not go more than 12 hours without wateror 24 hours without being offered food, if they are 1 year of age or more,and will not go more than 12 hours without being offered food, if theyare less than 1 year of age. We believe these timeframes are appropriatefor the health and well-being of nonhuman primates.We would clarify the certifications required from the consignor regardingconformance of the primary enclosure with the regulations in Subpart Dand acclimation of a nonhuman primate to temperatures lower than thoseprescribed in the regulations. We would require that the certificationof acclimation be signed by a veterinarian, that it specify a minimum temperaturethat the nonhuman primate can safely be exposed to, and that it specifyeach of the animals contained in the primary enclosure to which the certificationis attached, rather than referring to the shipment of animals as a whole.The contents of the certifications are provided in subsections (e) and(f) of proposed andSection; 3.87, respectively. We would clarify currentandSection; 3.85(c) by requiring that the temperatures to which a nonhumanprimate is exposed must not be lower than the minimum temperature specifiedby the veterinarian and must be reasonably within the generally and professionallyaccepted range for the nonhuman primate as determined by the veterinarian,considering its age, condition, and species of the animal, even if it isacclimated to temperatures lower than those prescribed in the regulations.We are proposing to add limitations on how a nonhuman primate can be heldat a terminal facility while waiting to be picked up by the consignee.We are proposing to adopt the time limitations provided in Part 2, andSection;2.80, ``C.O.D. shipments''. (<T3>See</T3> companion docket no. 88-014, published elsewhere in this issueof the <T4>Federal Register.</T4>) Accordingly, the consignor must attempt tonotify the consignee upon arrival, and at least once every 6 hours for24 hours after arrival, and then must return the animal to the consignoror to whomever the consignor designates if the consignee cannot be notified.If the consignee is notified and does not take physical delivery of thenonhuman primate within 48 hours of its arrival, the carrier or intermediatehandler must likewise return the animal to the consignor or to whomeverthe consignor designates.We are proposing to revise current andSection; 3.85(d) to specifically requirethat carriers and intermediate handlers continue to maintain nonhuman primatesin accordance with generally accepted professional and husbandry practicesas long as the animals are in their custody and control and until the animalsare delivered to the consignee or returned to the consignor or to whomeverthe consignor designates. We would require the carrier or intermediatehandler to obligate the consignor to reimburse it for the expenses incurredby the carrier or intermediate handler in returning the animal. These requirementsappear in proposed andSection; 3.87(g).All of these certifications and notification requirements would help minimizeand alleviate many of the stresses of travel for nonhuman primates andare necessary for their general welfare and psychological well-being duringtravel.Primary Enclosures Used to Transport Nonhuman PrimatesWe are proposing to reorganize the provisions of current andSection; 3.86and to make nonsubstantive changes to this section for clarity. We areproposing the following substantive changes as well.We are proposing to completely revise the current regulations concerningthe number of nonhuman primates that can be transported together in oneprimary enclosure. The current regulations allow up to ten nonhuman primatesto be transported in one primary enclosure. The guidelines issued by theInteragency Primates Steering Committee for the transportation of nonhumanprimates state that, as a general principle, nonhuman primates should betransported in individual compartments to avoid transmission of diseaseexcept when necessary to minimize social stress. Based upon our experiencein regulating the transportation of nonhuman primates and upon considerationof the information available, we have determined that placing this numberof nonhuman primates together in a situation that is unusual to and thereforestressful to the animals is dangerous for the animals and to the humanshandling them. We are proposing that each nonhuman primate be transportedindividually in separate primary enclosures that may be connecting, exceptthat the following social groupings may be maintained during transportation:(1) A mother with her nursing infant, (2) an established male-female couple(unless the female is in estrus) or a family group, and (3) a pair of juvenilesthat have not reached puberty.The requirements for ventilation openings for primary enclosures that arenot permanently affixed to the primary conveyance would be competely revisedto provide substantially greater ventilation openings for the nonhumanprimates' comfort during travel. The current regulations require that ifventilation openings on two opposite walls of the primary enclosure arepresent, they comprise at least 16 percent of the surface area of eachwall, and if there are ventilation openings on four walls, they compriseat least 8 percent of the surface area of each wall. We are proposing thatthese requirements be increased to 30 percent and 20 percent, respectively,and that the ventilation openings be located above the midline of the enclosure,since this is safer for the animals and for the humans handling the primaryenclosures. The ventilation opening requirements for permanently affixedenclosures that have only one front opening would remain at 90 percentof the surface of the front opening. The proposed revision to the ventilationopening requirements would result in healthier and more comfortable transportationconditions for nonhuman primates, and would therefore promote their psychologicalwell-being.We are proposing an additional construction requirement that would allowthe floor of a primary enclosure to be wire mesh or slatted but it mustbe designed and constructed so that the nonhuman primate contained insidecannot put any part of its body between the slats or through the mesh inorder to prevent injury to the nonhuman primates. Also we would requirethat primary enclosures be constructed of materials that are nontoxic tothe animal and will not otherwise harm their health or well-being.In proposed andSection; 3.88(f), we are proposing additional marking requirementsfor the outside of primary enclosures to better ensure that they are handledcarefully and in a manner that avoids causing the nonhuman primates additionalstress.We are also proposing that the documents that must accompany the nonhumanprimates be held by the operator of the primary conveyance if it is a surfaceconveyance, or attached to the outside of the primary enclosure. If theyare attached to the primary enclosure, they must be placed in a securebut accessible manner so that they can be removed and securely returned,and so that they are easily noticed. We would require that instructionsfor food and water, and for administration of drugs, medication, and otherspecial care be attached to the primary enclosure. These requirements wouldhelp ensure that the animals are treated and handled in accordance withtheir individual requirements.Primary ConveyancesPrescribed ambient temperature limits in primary conveyances used to transportnonhuman primates were part of the standards before the 1977 revisionsto the regulations, but were inadvertently omitted from those revisions.We are proposing to reinstate them for surface transportation in theseproposed regulations in order to prevent nonhuman primates from being transportedunder intolerable temperature conditions that would be harmful to theirhealth and physical well-being. The current regulations prescribe upperand lower ambient temperature limits for nonhuman primates held in terminalfacilities and prescribe lower temperature limits for nonhuman primatesplaced on transporting devices. It is equally important for the healthand well-being of nonhuman primates that these limits be followed whilethe animals are in transport as well as when they are on either end oftheir journey. Under our proposed regulations, all persons subject to theAnimal Welfare regulations would be required to maintain the temperatureinside a primary conveyance between 45 anddegrees;F (7.2 anddegrees;C) and85 anddegrees;F (30 anddegrees;C) during surface transportation at all timesa nonhuman primate is present. Because it would be impracticable to monitorthe ambient air temperature inside the cargo area during air transportation,we would require instead that it be maintained at a level that ensuresthe health and well-being of the species housed, in accordance with generallyaccepted professional and husbandry practices, at all times a nonhumanprimate is present. We are also proposing to add requirements that a primaryenclosure must be positioned in a primary conveyance in a manner that providesprotection from the elements, such as rain, wind, snow, and sun, and thatis far enough away from animals that are generally considered to be naturalpredators or enemies of nonhuman primates so that the nonhuman primatescannot reach, see, or smell them. These added precautions would avoid exposingnonhuman primates to known causes of distress and would make travelingless stressful for the animals. Food and Water RequirementsWe are proposing to make nonsubstantive changes to the current regulationsto make it clear that carriers and intermediate handlers must provide foodand water to nonhuman primates being transported within a prescribed numberof hours from the time the animals were last offered food and water. Wewould require consignors subject to the Animal Welfare regulations to certifythe date and time the nonhuman primates were last offered food and water.Carriers and intermediate handlers would be required to determine the appropriatetime for providing food and water based upon the information in the certification.Everyone else transporting a nonhuman primate must provide food and waterwithin a prescribed number of hours after they last offered the animalfood and water. We are proposing this requirement so that nonhuman primateswill not go longer than 24 hours without food or longer than 12 hours withoutwater. The prescribed number of hours differs based upon the age of thenonhuman primate and is the same as in the current regulations. We wouldalso require that nonhuman primates must be offered food within 12 hoursbefore being transported in commerce so that carriers and intermediatehandlers would not have to provide food and water immediately upon acceptance.Proper food must be provided, in accordance with andSection; 3.82, howeverwe realize that the necessities of travel may require less variation inthe types of food offered and in the method of feeding. Accordingly, footnote6 of proposed andSection; 3.90 has been added to take the exigencies of travelinto account. Requirements for design, construction, and placement of foodand water containers would be included for the nonhuman primates' safety,comfort, and well-being. The requirement that carriers and intermediatehandlers must not accept nonhuman primates for transport unless writteninstructions concerning food and water requirements are affixed to theoutside of the primary enclosure has been incorporated in proposed andSection;3.87, as previously discussed. Proposed andSection; 3.90 would require consignorssubject to the Animal Welfare regulations to attach securely to the primaryenclosure all written instructions concerning the nonhuman primates' foodand water requirements during transportation. Care in TransitWe would clarify current andSection; 3.89 to expressly require compliancewith these regulations by any person subject to the Animal Welfare regulationswho is transporting a nonhuman primate in commerce, regardless of whetherthe nonhuman primate is consigned for transport. We are proposing nonsubstantive changes to this section for purposes ofclarity along with the following substantive changes. We are proposing to require that during surface transportation, regulatedpersons subject to the regulations must obtain any veterinary care neededfor the nonhuman primate at the closest available veterinary facility.During air transportation, carriers or intermediate handlers must arrangefor any veterinary care that is needed for the nonhuman primate as soonas possible. We are also proposing to add an exemption to the current regulations thatprohibit the transportation in commerce of a nonhuman primate in obviousphysical distress that would allow transport for the purpose of providingveterinary care for the condition. When nonhuman primates are initially removed from their primary enclosuresafter travel they may be unusually active or perhaps agitated. In orderto avoid any resultant injury to the animals we are proposing a requirementthat would allow only authorized and experienced persons to remove nonhumanprimates from their primary enclosures during transport in order to protectboth the nonhuman primates, which could injure themselves in frenzied movement,and the people handling them. We are proposing to add a subsection that would specify that these transportationstandards remain in effect and must continue to be complied with untilthe animal reaches its final destination, or until the consignee takesphysical delivery of the animal if the animal has been consigned for transportation.We believe that this provision is necessary to prevent any gap in carefor the nonhuman primate and in responsibility for its care. Terminal Facilities Current andSection; 3.90 imposes duties on carriers and intermediate handlersholding nonhuman primates in animal holding areas of terminals to keepthe animals away from inanimate cargo, to clean and sanitize the area,to have an effective pest control program, to provide ventilation, andto maintain the ambient temperature within certain prescribed limits. Underthe current regulations, there is no similar obligation imposed upon otherpersons who transport these animals. As a result, animals could be heldin animal holding areas under hazardous conditions. We are proposing that the same duties currently imposed upon carriers andintermediate handlers be imposed upon any person subject to the AnimalWelfare regulations transporting nonhuman primates and holding them inanimal holding areas, since the animals require the same minimum levelof care regardless of which regulated persons is transporting the animals.We would add restrictions to prevent regulated persons from holding nonhumanprimates within physical and visual reach of other animals and other speciesof nonhuman primates, since this is upsetting to them. We are also proposingthat the length of time regulated persons be allowed to hold nonhuman primatesin terminal facilities upon arrival be the same as that allowed for consignedanimals under proposed andSection; 3.87(g). We believe that this limitationon holding periods in terminal facilities is necessary to prevent regulatedpersons from leaving nonhuman primates in terminal facilities for any reason,such as to await additional shipments, and that it will help reduce thestress of travel for nonhuman primates. Proposed andSection; 3.92 would continue the temperature and ventilationrequirements contained in current andSection; 3.90 and would also containthe provisions requiring shelter from the elements for nonhuman primatesthat are currently in andSection; 3.91 ``Handling,'' because they are applicableto regulated persons holding nonhuman primates in animal holding areasof terminal facilities. The proposed regulations for handling would belimited to the safeguards that must be provided during physical handlingand movement of nonhuman primates, as its heading suggests. Handling Current andSection; 3.91 imposes duties on carriers and intermediate handlersfor proper handling and movement of nonhuman primates. For the reasonsexplained above under ``Terminal facilities,'' we are proposing that thesesame duties be imposed upon any person subject to the Animal Welfare regulationshandling a nonhuman primate at any time during the course of transportationin commerce, so that the animals' health, safety, and well-being will beprotected at all times during transport. The proposed regulations wouldcontinue to include movement from an animal holding area of a terminalfacility to a primary conveyance and from a primary conveyance to a terminalfacility. It would also continue to provide requirements for movement ofa nonhuman primate on a transporting device. We are proposing to broadenthis section to include movement within and between primary conveyances,and movement within and between terminal facilities, because nonhuman primatesmay travel on several different primary conveyances and be moved aroundwithin terminal complexes in the course of their travel. We are also proposing to require that transporting devices on which nonhumanprimates are placed to move them must be covered to protect the nonhumanprimates when the outdoor temperature falls below 45 anddegrees; (7.2 anddegrees;C).The current regulations require this protection when the outdoor temperaturefalls below 50 anddegrees;(10 anddegrees;C). We believe that providing thisprotection becomes necessary at the lower temperature proposed, and thatthe proposed requirement will protect the health and well-being of nonhumanprimates. Air carriers commonly use conveyor belts and inclined belts for loadingand unloading animals into airplane cargo space. These methods of loadingcan cause psychological distress to the animals. We are proposing to allownonhuman primates to be placed on inclined conveyor belts used for loadingand unloading aircraft only, if an attendant is present at each end ofthe conveyor belt in case an animal has an extreme adverse reaction. Weare proposing to prohibit placing nonhuman primates on unattended conveyorbelts or on elevated conveyor belts, such as baggage claim conveyor belts,since these forms of tilted movement cause nonhuman primates extreme distressand alternative means of moving the animals can generally be provided withoutgreat inconvenience. <ITAG tagnum="84">Statutory Authority for This Proposed Rule </ITAG>This proposed rule is issued pursuant to the Animal Welfare Act (Act),as amended, 7 U.S.C. 2131-2157. Congress, in enacting the Food SecurityAct of 1985, Pub. L. No. 99-198, added significantly to the Secretary'sexisting responsibilities to promulgate standards for the care and treatmentof animals covered under the Act. The declared policy of the Act is toensure that animals intended for use in research facilities, as pets, orfor exhibition purposes, are provided humane care and treatment; to assurethe humane treatment of animals during transportation; and to prevent thesale of stolen animals. The Act requires that the Secretary of Agriculture promulgate standardsto govern the humane handling, care, treatment and transportation of animalsby dealers, research facilities, and exhibitors. These standards are toinclude minimum requirements for handling, housing, feeding, watering,sanitation, ventilation, shelter from extremes of weather and temperatures,adequate veterinary care, and separation of species. The 1985 amendmentsto the Act specifically require the Secretary to promulgate standards forexercise of dogs and for a physical environment adequate to promote thepsychological well-being of primates. The proposed rule includes changes and additions to the standards requiredby the 1985 amendments as well as modifications based on the Department'sexperience in administering and enforcing the Act. The Act authorizes thesechanges specifically in section 13 (7 U.S.C. 2143) and in the grant ofrulemaking authority contained in section 21 (7 U.S.C. 2151). <ITAG tagnum="84">Executive Order 12291 </ITAG>This proposed action has been reviewed pursuant to the requirements ofExecutive Order 12291 and it has been determined that it will have an impactin excess of $100 million annually on the regulated industries and thegeneral economy. The Administrator has therefore determined that it wouldbe a ``major rule.'' Some of the major costs to the regulated industriesin complying with the proposed regulations would result from: (1) Renovating,equipping, replacing, or constructing animal housing facilities; (2) theexercise for dog requirements; and (3) the psychological well-being ofnonhuman primates. The economic impacts of this rule are discussed in more detail in a RegulatoryImpact Analysis, which is available for public inspection in Room 1141of the South Building, U.S. Department of Agriculture between 8:00 a.m.and 4:30 p.m., Monday through Friday, except holidays (address above).Main findings of this analysis are summarized below.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,i1,s25,xs68 </C><T4>Summary of Regulatory Impact Analysis</T4><H1>Costs </H1><H1>Benefits</H1>Direct <D>Direct </D><ITAG tagnum="1">Regulated industry <D>Increased public satisfaction from improved animal welfare.* </D></ITAG>Capital expenses: <ITAG tagnum="2">(all parts) $876 million <D>Improved research information.* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">(parts 1-2) $142 million <D>Productivity gains for regulated industries.* </D></ITAG>Annual costs: <ITAG tagnum="2">(all parts) $207 million </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">(parts 1-2) $126 million </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">APHIS program costs impact on federal sites* $2 million </ITAG>Indirect <D>Indirect </D><ITAG tagnum="1">Opportunity costs for users of biomedical research (goods and service),pet industry, and animal exhibits* <D>Market effects for suppliers of animal husbandry products.* </D></ITAG>Increased federal financial support for biomedical community.* <D>Non-market effects.* </D>Non-market effects* <F> *Not quantified.</F></ITAG> Compliance with more stringent federal regulations on the humane care andtreatment of animals used for research, testing, teaching, exhibition,and business ventures would result in major direct and indirect effectsimposed on the regulated industry and the general economy. An examinationof the estimated cost impacts indicates that the amended regulations constitutea ``major rule'' based on annual effects in excess of $100 million on theeconomy and large cost increases on regulated industries for animal usesand maintenance, in particular to the biomedical research community. However,this study could not properly assess the relative significance of thesecost increases on the regulated industry or the presence of adverse effectson competition, innovation, and the ability of domestic enterprises tocompete with foreign enterprises in international markets. Regulated persons or establishments will be required to spend approximately$876 million in capital expenditures over the next two or three years.Of this amount approximately 16 percent is attributable to Parts 1 and2. If Parts 1 and 2 were enforced separately, regulated research facilitieswill be required to spend approximately $142 million to renovate, equip,replace, or construct aseptic surgical facilities, and provide for adequatepre- and post-surgical care. Capital expenditures attributable to Part3 include costs for renovation, equipment replacement, and new constructionof animal housing facility space. Capital expenditures to improve animalhousing facilities would result from the new minimum standards for generalenvironmental conditions, space or primary enclosure size requirements,exercise of dogs, and enrichment of nonhuman primate enclosures. In addition to capital expenditures, total annual operating expendituresestimated at $207 million will also be required. Approximately 60 percentof this total ($126 million) is accounted for by Parts 1 and 2, primarilythe requirements for the establishment and operations of the institutionalanimal care and use committees, additional responsibilities for attendingveterinarians, and record-keeping requirements. Annual expenditures attributableto Part 3 would result from the need for additional personnel (animal handlers)to exercise dogs, and the daily maintenance of animal housing facilities.An important result of this regulatory analysis is that policy decisionsmust consider other direct and indirect effects associated with the promulgationand enforcement of federal rules. Increased federal legislation causesimportant economic benefits and costs which are unevenly distributed amongregistrants and licensees. Direct benefits accrue to society by knowingthat animals may be better cared for and treated humanely. The value ofthese social benefits are subject to personal preferences and concerns.Improvements in the well-being of regulated animals may also provide gainsin productivity to the industry. On the other hand, increased costs ofcompliance will be passed from the regulated industry to consumers whopurchase their goods and services. For example, the field of biomedicalresearch and education depends heavily on the use of animals to conducttests and experiments. Increased costs for animal uses have broader economicand health implications for all of us. Study results do not suggest thatthese regulations would cause establishments to abandon the use of animalssince current biomedical research outlays are in excess of $12.8 billionper year. Nonetheless, there could be important effects associated withallocating additional funds or expenditures to comply with the amendedAnimal Welfare regulations. The Department will collect additional data and refine the analysis withregard to the proposed amendments to Part 3. The results will be availableupon publication on the final rulemaking for Part 3. It is not expectedthat the revised analysis will affect the determination that this rulewould have an impact in excess of $100 million annually.<ITAG tagnum="84">Regulatory Flexibility Act</ITAG>As part of the regulatory impact analysis performed by the Department inamending the Animal Welfare regulations, we have analyzed the potentialimpact on small entities of the proposed amendments to Part 3, as requiredby the Regulatory Flexibility Act (5 U.S.C. 601 <T3>et seq.</T3>). Based upon this analysis, the Administrator has determinedthat the proposed amendments to Part 3, if implemented, would have a significanteconomic impact on a substantial number of small entities.The economic impacts of this proposed rule on small entities are discussedin greater detail in the Regulatory Flexibility Analysis, which is availablefor public inspection in Room 1141 of the South Building, U.S. Departmentof Agriculture between 8:00 a.m. and 4:30 p.m., Monday through Friday,except holidays.The principal findings of the analysis are summarized below.<ITAG tagnum="21">Study results indicate that APHIS Animal Welfare regulations wouldplace a significant burden on a substantial number of small licensees thatbreed, deal or exhibit regulated animals. Total capital expenditures requiredin the next two or three years are estimated to be approximately $93.9million. These will affect 2,155 small breeders (77 percent of small licensedbreeders), 371 small dealers (37 percent of small dealers) and 1,245 smallexhibitors (92 percent of small exhibitors). The expected increase in variableoperating costs is $6.8 million. Annual operating expenditures are significantlylower than the estimated capital expenditrues, however, these would affectall small licensees. In comparison to reported annual gross income estimatesof $6.6 million for all small breeders and $0.8 million for all small dealers,the added expenditures represent significant impacts.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Of the small licensees, breeders will be most affected. Breeders representabout 57 percent of the small licensees and will incur approximately 66percent of the total capital and variable cost impacts. An important distributionaleffect of the regulations is that the impact on breeders will be concentratedin the Central region. Eighty-five percent of small breeders, mainly dogbreeders, are located in this region.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Executive Order 12372</ITAG>This program/activity is listed in the Catalog of Federal Domestic Assistanceunder No. 10.025 and is subject to the provisions of Executive Order 12372,which requires intergovernmental consultation with state and local officials.(See 7 CFR 3015, Subpart V.)<ITAG tagnum="84">Paperwork Reduction Act</ITAG>In accordance with section 3507 of the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980(44 U.S.C. Chapter 35), the information collection provisions that areincluded in this proposed rule will be submitted for approval to the Officeof Management and Budget (OMB). Your written comments will be consideredif you submit them to the Office of Information and Regulatory Affairs,OMB, Attention: Desk Officer for APHIS, Washington, DC 20503. You shouldsubmit a duplicate copy of your comments to Helene R. Wright, Chief, RegulatoryAnalysis and Development Staff, PPD, APHIS, USDA, Room 866, Federal Building,6505 Belcrest Road, Hyattsville, MD 20782.<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 9 CFR Part 3</ITAG>Animal welfare, Humane animal handling, Pets, Transportation.Accordingly, we propose to amend Part 3 as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 3_STANDARDS</ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 3 would be revised to read as follows,and the authority citation following all the sections would be removed.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>7 U.S.C. 2131-2156; 7 CFR 2.17, 2.51, and 371.2(d).</ITAG>2. The table of contents for Subpart A consisting of andSection;andSection;3.1 through 3.19, would be revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart A_Specifications for the Humane Handling, Care, Treatment,and Transportation of Dogs and Cats</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Facilities and Operating Standards</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3.1 Housing facilities, general.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3.2 Indoor housing facilities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3.3 Sheltered housing facilities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3.4 Outdoor housing facilities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3.5 Mobile and traveling housing facilities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3.6 Primary enclosures.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Animal Health and Husbandry Standards</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3.7 Exercise and socialization for dogs.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3.8 Feeding.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3.9 Watering.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3.10 Cleaning, sanitization, housekeeping, and pest control.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3.11 Employees.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3.12 Social grouping.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Transportation Standards</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3.13 Consignments to carriers and intermediate handlers.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3.14 Primary enclosures used to transport live dogs and cats.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3.15 Primary conveyance (motor vehicle, rail, air, and marine).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3.16 Food and water requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3.17 Care in transit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3.18 Terminal facilities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3.19 Handling.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart A_Specifications for the Humane Handling, Care, Treatment,and Transportation of Dogs and Cats \1\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ These minimum standards apply only to live dogs and cats,unless stated otherwise.<ITAG tagnum="84">Facilities and Operating Standards</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 3.1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Housing facilities, general.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Structure; construction. </T3>Housing facilities for dogs and catsmust be designed and constructed so that they are structurally sound. Theymust be kept in good repair, and they must protect the animals from injury,contain the animals securely, and restrict other animals and unauthorizedhumans from entering.(b) <T3>Condition and site. </T3>Housing facilities and areas used for storinganimal food or bedding must be free of any accumulation of trash, wastematerial, junk, weeds, and other discarded materials. Animal areas insideof housing facilities must be kept neat and free of clutter, includingequipment, furniture, and stored material, but may contain materials actuallyused and necessary for cleaning the area, such as brooms, mops, mop buckets,trash containers, and fixtures necessary for proper husbandry practices,such as tables, cabinets, and sinks. Housing facilities other than thosemaintained by research facilities and federal research facilities mustbe physically separated from any other business. If a housing facilityis located on the same premises as another business, it must be physicallyseparated from the other business so that unauthorized humans, and animalsthe size of dogs, skunks, and raccoons are prevented from entering it.(c) <T3>Surfaces._</T3>(1) <T3>General requirements. </T3>The surfaces of housing facilities_includinghouses, dens, and other furniture-type fixtures and objects within thefacility_must be constructed in a manner and made of materials that allowthem to be readily cleaned and sanitized, or removed or replaced when wornor soiled. Interior surfaces and any surfaces that come in contact withdogs or cats must:(i) Be free of rust that prevents the required cleaning and sanitization,or that affects the structural strength of the surface; and(ii) Be free of jagged edges or sharp points that might injure the animals.(2) <T3>Maintenance and replacement of surfaces. </T3>All surfaces must bemaintained on a regular basis. Surfaces of housing facilities_includinghouses, dens, and other furniture-type fixtures and objects within thefacility_that cannot be readily cleaned and sanitized, must be replacedwhen worn or soiled.(3) <T3>Cleaning. </T3>Hard surfaces with which the dogs or cats come in contactmust be cleaned daily and sanitized at least once every two weeks, andas often as necessary to prevent any accumulation of excreta and diseasehazards. Floors made of dirt, sand, gravel, grass, or other similar materialmust be raked and spot-cleaned daily, and the contaminated material mustbe replaced whenever this raking and spot-cleaning is not sufficient toprevent or eliminate odors, diseases, insects, pests, or vermin infestation.All other surfaces of housing facilities must be cleaned daily and sanitizedwhen necessary to satisfy generally accepted husbandry standards and practices.Sanitization may be done using any of the methods provided in andSection;3.10(b)(3) for primary enclosures.(d) <T3>Water and electric power. </T3>The housing facility must have reliableelectric power adequate for heating, cooling, ventilation, and lighting,and for carrying out other husbandry requirements in accordance with theregulations in this subject. The housing facility must provide adequatemechanically pressurized running potable water for the dogs' and cats'drinking needs, for cleaning, and for carrying out other husbandry requirements.(e) <T3>Storage. </T3>Supplies of food and bedding must be stored in leakproofcontainers that protect the supplies from spoilage, contamination, andvermin infestation. The supplies must be stored off the floor and awayfrom the walls, to allow cleaning underneath and around the supplies. Perishablefood must be refrigerated, and all food must be stored in a manner thatprevents contamination and deterioration of its nutritive value. All opensupplies of food and bedding must be kept in leakproof containers withtightly fitting lids to prevent contamination and spoilage. Only food andbedding that is currently being used may be kept in the animal areas. Substancesthat are toxic to the dogs and cats must not be stored in animal areasor in food storage and preparation areas.(f) <T3>Drainage and waste disposal. </T3>Housing facility operators must providedaily (or more often as necessary) removal and disposal of animal and foodwastes, bedding, debris, garbage, water, other fluids and wastes, and deadanimals. Housing facilities must be equipped with disposal facilities anddrainage systems that are constructed and operated so that animal wasteand water are rapidly eliminated and animals stay dry. Disposal and drainagesystems must minimize vermin and pest infestation, insects, odors, anddisease hazards. All drains must be properly constructed, installed, andmaintained. If closed drainage systems are used, they must be equippedwith traps and prevent the backflow of gases and the backup of sewage ontothe floor. If the facility uses sump or settlement ponds, or other similarsystems for drainage and animal waste disposal, the system must be locatedfar enough away from the animal area of the housing facility to preventodors, diseases, pests, and vermin infestation. Puddles of water in animalareas must be promptly mopped up or drained so that the animals stay dry.Trash containers in housing facilities and in food storage and food preparationareas must be leakproof and must have tightly fitted lids on them at alltimes. Dead animals, animal parts, and animal waste must not be kept infood storage or food preparation areas, food freezers, food refrigerators,or animal areas.(g) <T3>Washrooms and sinks. </T3>Washing facilities such as washrooms, basins,sinks, or showers must be provided for animal caretakers and must be readilyaccessible.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 3.2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Indoor housing facilities.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Heating, cooling, and temperature. </T3>Indoor housing facilities fordogs and cats must be sufficiently heated and cooled when necessary toprotect the dogs and cats from cold and hot temperatures and to providefor their health, and well-being. When dogs or cats are present, the ambienttemperature in the facility must not fall below 50 anddegrees;F (10 anddegrees;C)for dogs and cats not acclimated to lower temperatures, for those breedsthat cannot tolerate lower temperatures without stress or discomfort (suchas short-haired breeds), and for sick, aged, young, or infirm dogs andcats. The ambient temperature must not fall below 45 anddegrees;F (7.2 anddegrees;C)at any time, and must not rise above 95 anddegrees;F (35 anddegrees;C).(b) <T3>Ventilation. </T3>Indoor housing facilities for dogs and cats mustbe sufficiently ventilated at all times when dogs and cats are presentto provide for their health, comfort, and well-being, and to minimize odors,drafts, ammonia levels, and moisture condensation. Air, preferably freshair, must be provided by windows, vents, fans, or air-conditioning. Auxiliaryventilation or air-conditioning must be provided when the ambient temperatureis 85 anddegrees;F (29.5 anddegrees;C) or higher. The relative humidity mustbe between 30 and 70 percent.(c) <T3>Lighting. </T3>Indoor housing facilities for dogs and cats must belighted well enough to permit routine inspection and cleaning of the facility,and observation of the dogs and cats. Animal areas must be lighted forat least 8 hours a day, by either natural or artificial light, correspondingto the natural period of daylight. If only artificial light, such as fluorescentlight, is provided, it must provide full-spectrum illumination. Primaryenclosures must be placed so as to protect the dogs and cats from excessivelight.(d) <T3>Interior surfaces. </T3>The floors and walls of indoor housing facilities,and any other surfaces in contact with the animals, must be imperviousto moisture. The ceilings of indoor housing facilities must be imperviousto moisture, or be replaceable. An example of this would be a suspendedceiling with replaceable panels.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 3.3 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Sheltered housing facilities.  </ITAG>(a) <T3>Heating, cooling, and temperature. </T3>The sheltered part of shelteredhousing facilities for dogs and cats must be sufficiently heated and cooledto protect the dogs and cats from cold and hot temperatures and to providefor their health, comfort, and well-being. The ambient temperature in thesheltered part of the facility must not fall below 50 anddegrees;F (10 anddegrees;C)for dogs and cats not acclimated to lower temperatures, for those breedsthat cannot tolerate lower temperatures without stress and discomfort (suchas short-haired breeds), and for sick, aged, young, or infirm dogs or cats.The ambient temperature must not fall below 35 anddegrees;F (1.7 anddegrees;C)at any time, and must not rise above 95 anddegrees;F (35 anddegrees;C).  (b) <T3>Ventilation. </T3>The enclosed or sheltered part of sheltered housingfacilities for dogs and cats must be sufficiently ventilated when dogsor cats are present to provide for their health, comfort, and well-being,and to minimize odors, draft, ammonia levels, and moisture condensation.Air, preferably fresh air, must be provided by windows, doors, vents, fans,or air-conditioning. Auxiliary ventilation, such as exhaust fans or air-conditioning,must be provided when the ambient temperature is 85 anddegrees;F (29.5 anddegrees;C)or higher.  (c) <T3>Lighting. </T3>Sheltered housing facilities for dogs and cats mustbe lighted well enough to permit routine inspection and cleaning of thefacility, and observation of the dogs and cats. Animal areas must be lightedfor at least 8 hours a day by either natural or artificial light. Primaryenclosures must be placed so as to protect the dogs and cats from excessivelight.  (d) <T3>Shelter from the elements. </T3>Dogs and cats must be provided withadequate shelter from the elements at all times.  (e) <T3>Surfaces. </T3>(1) The following areas in sheltered housing facilitiesmust be impervious to moisture:  (i) Indoor floor areas in contact with the animals;  (ii) Outdoor floor areas in contact with the animals, when the floor areasare not exposed to the direct sun, or are made of a hard material suchas wire, wood, metal, or concrete; and  (iii) All walls, boxes, houses, dens, and other surfaces in contact withthe animals.  (2) Outside floor areas in contact with the animals and exposed to thedirect sun may consist of compacted earth, sand, gravel, or grass.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 3.4 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Outdoor housing facilities.  </ITAG>(a) <T3>Restrictions. </T3>(1) The following categories of dogs or cats mustnot be kept in outdoor facilities:  (i) Dogs or cats that are not acclimated to the temperatures prevalentin the area or region where they are maintained;  (ii) Breeds of dogs or cats that cannot tolerate the prevalent temperaturesof the area without stress or discomfort (such as short-haired breeds incold climates); and  (iii) Sick, infirm, aged or young dogs or cats.  (2) When their acclimation status is unknown, dogs and cats must not bekept in outdoor facilities during any month in which, during the preceding5 years, the temperature at the facility's location has been less than35 anddegrees;F (1.7 anddegrees;C).  (b) <T3>Capacity. </T3>Outdoor facilities for dogs or cats must include a shelterstructure that is accessible to all the animals in each outdoor facility,and that is large enough to allow all animals in the shelter structureto sit, stand, and lie in a normal manner, and to turn about freely. Inaddition to the shelter structure, a separate outside area of shade mustbe provided, large enough to contain all the animals at one time and protectthem from the direct rays of the sun.  (c) <T3>Construction. </T3>Building surfaces in contact with animals in outdoorhousing facilities must be impervious to moisture. Metal barrels, old refrigeratorsor freezers, and the like must not be used as shelter structures. The floorsof outdoor housing facilities may be of compacted earth, sand, gravel,or grass, and must be replaced if there are any prevalent odors, diseases,insects, pests, or vermin.(d) <T3>Shelter from the elements. </T3>Shelters in outdoor facilities fordogs or cats must:(1) Provide the dogs and cats with adequate protection and shelter fromthe cold and heat;(2) Provide the dogs and cats with protection from the direct rays of thesun and the direct effect of wind, rain, or snow;(3) Be provided with a wind break and rain break at the entrance; and(4) Contain clean, dry, bedding material.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 3.5 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Mobile or traveling housing facilities.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Heating, cooling, and temperature. </T3>Mobile or traveling housingfacilities for dogs and cats must be sufficiently heated and cooled whennecessary to protect the dogs and cats from cold and hot temperatures andto provide for their health, comfort, and well-being. The ambient temperaturein the mobile or traveling housing facility must not fall below 50 anddegrees;F(10 anddegrees;C) for dogs and cats not acclimated to lower temperatures,for those breeds that cannot tolerate lower temperatures without stressor discomfort (such as short-haired breeds), and for sick, aged, young,or infirm dogs and cats. The ambient temperature must not fall below 35anddegrees;F (1.7 anddegrees;C) at any time, and must not exceed 95 anddegrees;F(35 anddegrees;C) for all dogs and cats.(b) <T3>Ventilation. </T3>Mobile or traveling housing facilities for dogs andcats must be sufficiently ventilated at all times when dogs or cats arepresent to provide for the health, comfort, and well-being of the animals,and to minimize odors, drafts, ammonia levels, moisture condensation, andexhaust fumes. Air, preferably fresh air, must be provided by means ofwindows, doors, vents, fans or air-conditioning. Auxiliary ventilation,such as fans, blowers, or air-conditioning, must be provided when the ambienttemperature within the animal housing area is 85 anddegrees;F (29 anddegrees;C)or higher.(c) <T3>Lighting. </T3>Mobile or traveling housing facilities for dogs andcats must be lighted well enough to permit proper cleaning and inspectionof the facility, and observation of the dogs and cats. Animal areas mustbe lighted for at least 8 hours each day, corresponding to the naturalperiod of daylight. If only artificial light, such as fluorescent light,is provided, it must provide full-spectrum illumination.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 3.6 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Primary enclosures.</ITAG>Primary enclosures for dogs and cats must meet the following minimum requirements:(a) <T3>General requirements. </T3>(1) Primary enclosures must be designedand constructed of suitable materials so that they are structurally sound.The primary enclosures must be kept in good repair.(2) Primary enclosures must be constructed and maintained so that they:(i) Have no sharp points or edges that could injure the dogs and cats;(ii) Protect the dogs and cats from injury;(iii) Contain the dogs and cats securely;(iv) Keep predators and unauthorized individuals from entering the enclosure;(v) Enable the dogs and cats to remain dry and clean;(vi) Provide shelter and protection from extreme temperatures and weatherconditions that may be uncomfortable or hazardous to the dogs and cats;(vii) Provide sufficient shade to shelter all the dogs and cats housedin the primary enclosure at one time;(viii) Provide the dogs and cats with easy and convenient access to cleanfood and water;(ix) Enable all surfaces in contact with the dogs and cats to be readilycleaned and sanitized in accordance with andSection; 3.10(b) of this subpart,or be replaceable when worn or soiled;(x) Have floors that are constructed in a manner that protects the dogs'and cats' appendages from injury, and that, if of mesh or slatted construction,do not allow the dogs' and cats' appendages to pass through any openingsin the floor; and(xi) Provide sufficient space to allow each dog and cat to turn about freely,to stand, sit, and lie in a comfortable, normal position, and to walk ina normal manner.(b) <T3>Additional requirements for cats_</T3>(1) <T3>Space. </T3>Each cat, including weaned kittens, that is housed in anyprimary enclosure must be provided minimum vertical space and floor spaceas follows:(i) Each primary enclosure housing cats must be at least 24 in. high (60.96cm);(ii) Cats up to and including 8.8 lbs (4 kg) must be provided with at least3.0 ft\2\ (0.28 m\2\);(iii) Cats over 8.8 lbs (4 kg) must be provided with at least 4.0 ft\2\(0.37 m\2\);(iv) Each queen with nursing kittens must be provided with an additionalamount of floor space, equivalent to at least 5 percent of her minimumrequired floor space for each nursing kitten in the litter (e.g., fivenursing kittens require a 25-percent increase and 10 nursing kittens requirea 50-percent increase); and(v) The minimum floor space required by this paragraph is exclusive ofany food or water pans.(2) <T3>Compatibility. </T3>All cats housed in the same primary enclosure mustbe compatible, as determined by observation. Not more than 12 adult nonconditionedcats may be housed in the same primary enclosure. Queens in heat may notbe housed in the same primary enclosure with sexually mature males, exceptfor breeding. Except when maintained in breeding colonies, queens withlitters may not be housed in the same primary enclosure with other adultcats, and kittens under 4 months of age may not be housed in the same primaryenclosure with adult cats. Cats with a vicious or aggressive dispositionmust be housed separately.(3) <T3>Litter. </T3>In all primary enclosures having a solid floor, a receptaclecontaining sufficient clean litter must be provided to contain excretaand body wastes.(4) <T3>Resting surfaces. </T3>Each primary enclosure housing cats must containa solid resting surface or surfaces that, in the aggregate, are large enoughto hold all the occupants of the primary enclosure at the same time comfortably.The resting surfaces must be elevated, impervious to moisture, and be ableto be easily cleaned and sanitized, or easily replaced when soiled or worn.The resting surfaces are not considered part of the minimum floor space.(5) <T3>Cats in mobile or traveling shows or acts. </T3>Cats that are partof a mobile or traveling show or act may be kept, while the show or actis traveling from one temporary location to another, in transport containersthat comply with all requirements of andSection; 3.14 of this subpart otherthan the marking requirements in andSection; 3.14(a)(6) of this subpart.When the show or act is not traveling, the cats must be placed in primaryenclosures that meet the minimum requirements of this section.(c) <T3>Additional requirements for dogs_</T3>(1) <T3>Space. </T3>(i) Each dog housed in a primary enclosure (including weanedpuppies) must be provided a minimum amount of floor space calculated asfollows: find the mathematical square of the sum of the length of the dogin inches (measured from the tip of its nose to the base of its tail) plus6 inches; then divide the product by 144. The calculation is: (length ofdog in inches+6)andmultiply;(length of dog in inches+6)=required floor spacein square inches. Required floor space in inches/144=required floor spacein square feet.(ii) Each bitch with nursing puppies must be provided with an additionalamount of floor space, equivalent to at least 5 percent of her minimumrequired floor space for each nursing puppy in the litter (e.g., five nursingpuppies require a 25-percent increase and 10 nursing puppies require a50-percent increase).(iii) The interior height of a primary enclosure must be at least 6 incheshigher than the highest point of the body (normally the ears) of the tallestdog in the enclosure when it is in a normal standing position.(2) <T3>Dogs on tethers. </T3>Dogs may be kept on tethers only in outside housingfacilities that meet the requirements of andSection; 3.4 of this subpart,and only when the tether meets the requirements of this paragraph. Thetether must be attached to the front of the dog's shelter structure orto a post in front of the shelter structure and must be at least threetimes the length of the dog, as measured from the tip of its nose to thebase of its tail. The tether must allow the dog convenient access to theshelter structure and to food and water containers. The tether must beof the type and strength commonly used for the size dog involved and mustbe attached to the dog by a well-fitted collar that will not cause traumaor injury to the dog. Collars made of materials such as wire, flat chains,chains with sharp edges, or chains with rusty or nonuniform links are prohibited.The tether must be attached so that the dog cannot become entangled withother objects or come into physical contact with other dogs in the outsidehousing facility, and so the dog can roam to the full range of the tether.Dog housing areas where dogs are on tethers must be enclosed by a perimeterfence that is at least 6 feet high and that protects the dogs from otheranimals, contains them if they should free themselves of the tether, andprevents dogs, raccoons, skunks, and animals of similar size from goingthrough it or under it.(3) <T3>Compatibility. </T3>All dogs housed in the same primary enclosure mustbe compatible, as determined by observation. Not more than 12 adult nonconditioneddogs may be housed in the same primary enclosure. Bitches in heat may notbe housed in the same primary enclosure with sexually mature males, exceptfor breeding. Except when maintained in breeding colonies, bitches withlitters may not be housed in the same primary enclosure with other adultdogs, and puppies under 4 months of age may not be housed in the same primaryenclosure with adult dogs. Dogs with a vicious or aggressive dispositionmust be housed separately.(4) <T3>Dogs in mobile or traveling shows or acts</T3>. Dogs that are partof a mobile or traveling show or act may be kept, while the show or actis traveling from one temporary location to another, in transport containersthat comply with all requirements of andSection; 3.14 of this subpart otherthan the marking requirements in andSection; 3.14(a)(6) of this subpart.When the show or act is not traveling, the dogs must be placed in primaryenclosures that meet the minimum requirements of this section.(d) <T3>Variance from minimum space requirements</T3>_(1) <T3>Definition</T3>. For the purposes of this subpart, a ``variance'' meansthe written permission from the Administrator that is required to operateas a licensee or registrant under the Animal Welfare Act without fullycomplying with the minimum space requirements provided in this subpart.A variance may be limited in scope both as to time and to the primary enclosurescovered by it, and will specify the portions of a registrant's or licensee'sfacilities covered by the variance.(2) <T3>Who may apply; eligibility</T3>. Registrants and licensees that maintainor handle dogs or cats, or that have dogs or cats on the premises or undertheir control or supervision, and that do not comply with one or more ofthe minimum space requirements provided in this subpart may apply to theAdministrator for a variance. Any housing facilities under constructionor in the design and preliminary construction stages on the effective dateof these regulations are not eligible for a variance, unless the registrantor licensee demonstrates to the Administrator that construction is no nearlycomplete that a variance is necessary for the registrant or licensee tocomply with the minimum space requirements.(3) <T3>When to apply</T3>. Eligible registrants and licensees requiring avariance in accordance with paragraph (d)(2) of this section must applyto the Administrator within 60 days of the effective date of these regulations.(4) <T3>Application. </T3>An application for a variance must be in writingand must list in detail each of the minimum space requirements that cannotbe complied with, the amount of time necessary for the applicant to comeinto compliance with the minimum space requirements, the specific reasonswhy the variance is being requested, the species and number of dogs andcats that will be affected by the variance, and the estimated cost of compliance.A statement from the attending veterinarian concerning the age and healthstatus of the dogs and cats affected by the variance and addressing whetherthe granting of a variance would be detrimental to the affected dogs andcats must accompany the application. The Administrator may grant the applicationif he or she determines that it is justified or deny it it he or she determinesthat it is not justified under the circumstances, or that granting it wouldbe detrimental to the health and well-being of the dogs and cats affectedby the variance. The grant or denial will be in writing. The Administratormay require a report to be submitted by an outside expert to help determinewhether a variance would be detrimental to the health and well-being ofthe dogs and cats affected. The cost of the report must be paid by theapplicant. The applicant may request that the Administrator reconsiderhis or her decision to deny an application by writing to the Administratorwithin ten (10) days after the applicant has received the denial. The applicantmust explain, in writing, why he or she believes the variance should havebeen granted. The Administrator will notify the applicant in writing ofthe final decision as promptly as circumstances allow.(5) <T3>Duration and extension</T3>. An initial variance may be granted, atthe sole discretion of the Administrator, for the period of time the Administratordetermines is necessary for the applicant to comply with the minimum spacerequirements, based upon the facts presented in the application, up toa maximum time of 2 years. The Administrator may grant a single extensionof up to 1 year upon written request if the Administrator determines thatit is justified due to unforeseen situations that prevent the registrantor licensee from fully complying during the initial variance period. Awritten request for an extension must be received by the Administratorat least 60 days before the expiration date of the initial variance. Nomore than one extension will be granted. The applicant may request thatthe Administrator reconsider his or her decision to deny an applicationfor extension by writing to the Administrator within ten (10) days afterthe applicant has received the denial. The applicant must explain, in writing,why he or she believes the extension should have been granted. The Administratorwill notify the applicant in writing of the final decision as promptlyas circumstances allow. Until a final determination is made, the extentionwill not be in effect. If the extension is granted on reconsideration,it will be retroactive to the termination date of the initial variance.(6) <T3>Revocation</T3>. A variance may be revoked by the Administrator atany time if he or she determines that it was obtained in bad faith, thatthe purpose for which the variance was granted is not being carried out,or that it is detrimental to the health and well-being of the dogs or catsaffected. Revocation of a variance will be in writing and will be effectiveupon receipt.<ITAG tagnum="84">Animal Health and Husbandry Standards</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 3.7</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Exercise and socialization for dogs.</ITAG>(a) Social contact while being housed, held, or maintained. (1) All dogshoused, held, or maintained by any dealer, exhibitor, or research facilityincluding federal research facilities, must be maintained in compatiblegroups <T3>unless</T3>:(i) Housing in compatible groups is not in accordance with an animal careand use procedure, and the animal care and use procedure has been approvedby the research facility's Committee;(ii) In the opinion of the attending veterinarian such housing would adverselyaffect the health or well-being of the dog(s); or (iii) Any dog exhibits aggressive or vicious behavior.(2) All dogs housed, held, or maintained by any dealer, exhibitor, or researchfacility, including federal research facilities, must be able to hear andsee other dogs <T3>unless</T3>:(i) Such contact is not in accordance with an animal care and use procedure,and the animal care and use procedure has been approved by the researchfacility's Committee;(ii) In the opinion of the attending veterinarian, such contact would adverselyaffect the health or well-being of the dog(s); or(iii) Only one dog is housed, held, or maintained by the dealer, exhibitor,or research facility. In such instances, the single dog must receive positivephysical contact with humans at least once a day. The positive physicalcontact with humans must total at least 60 minutes each day and may begiven in one or more periods.(b) Release for exercise and socialization_(1) Dogs housed individually.(i) Dogs housed, held, or maintained by any dealer, exhibitor, or researchfacility, including federal research facilities, must be released at leastonce a day for exercise and socialization if they are:(A) Kept individually in cages; or(B) Kept individually in pens or runs that provide less than four timesthe floor space required for that dog by andSection; 3.6(c)(1) of this subpart,and that do not allow visual and physical contact with neighboring dogs(for example, concrete block pens and runs).(ii) The exercise area must be the larger of 80 square feet or twice theminimum floor space required by andSection; 3.6(c)(1) of this subpart. However,dogs whose release for exercise and socialization is prohibited by an animalcare and use procedure approved by the Committee are not subject to the80-square-feet-minimum provision of this paragraph, but must be maintainedin pens or runs that provide each dog with at least twice the minimum floorspace required by andSection; 3.6(c)(1) of this subpart.(iii) Dogs housed, held, or maintained by any dealer, exhibitor, or researchfacility do not need to be released each day for exercise and socializationif they are kept in pens or runs that:(A) Provide at least four times the required space for that dog; and(B) Allow visual and physical contact with neighboring dogs.(2) Dogs housed, held, or maintained in groups by any dealer, exhibitor,or research facility, including a federal research facility, must be releasedat least once a day for exercise and socialization, unless the dogs aremaintained in pens or runs that provide the greater of 80 square feet or150 percent of the space each dog would require if maintained separatelyunder the minimum floor space requirements of andSection; 3.6(c)(1) of thissubpart. If a run or open area is used for exercise for dogs housed ingroups, it must be the greater of 80 square feet or 150 percent of theminimum space requirement for each dog in the exercise area. (For example,a 28-inch beagle requires a minimum floor space of 8 square feet. Therefore,for six beagles housed together, 150 percent of six times the minimum per-beaglerequirement of 8 square feet is 72 square feet. This is less than 80 squarefeet. Therefore, the larger floor space, 80 square feet, would be required.)(3) Exercise periods must total at least 30 minutes each day and may begiven in one or more release periods.(c) Methods of exercise.(1) The attending veterinarian must determine the type of exercise to beused. The exercise may be provided by:(i) Walking on a leash;(ii) Releasing the dog(s) into an open area;(iii) Providing access to a run; or(iv) Some other similar arrangement.(2) Forced exercise methods or devices such as swimming, treadmills, orcarousel type device do not meet the exercise requirements of this section.(d) Documentation of the release of each dog for exercise must be keptby the registrant or licensee, and is subject to APHIS inspection.(e) Exemptions. The attending veterinarian may exempt a particular dogfrom the exercise release period required for it under paragraph (b) ofthis section, or restrict its participation in the period, if he or shedetermines that it is necessary to do so for the dog's health, condition,or well-being. The exemption or restriction must be recorded by the attendingveterinarian. The attending veterinarian must review the grant of exemptionor restriction and observe the animal at least every 30 days to determinewhether it is still necessary.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 3.8</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Feeding.</ITAG>(a) Dogs and cats must be fed at least once each day, except as otherwisemight be required to provide adequate veterinary care. The food must beuncontaminated, wholesome, palatable, and of sufficient quantity and nutritivevalue to maintain the normal condition and weight of the animal. It mustbe appropriate for the individual animal's age.(b) Food receptacles must be used for dogs and cats, must be readily accessibleto all dogs and cats, and must be located so as to minimize contaminationby excreta and pests, and be protected from rain and snow. Feeding pansmust either be made of durable material that can be easily cleaned andsanitized or be disposable. If the food receptacles are not disposable,they must be cleaned daily and must be sanitized in accordance with andSection;3.10(b)(3) of this subpart at least every 2 weeks, and before being usedto feed a different dog or cat or social grouping of dogs or cats. If thefood receptacles are disposable, they must be discarded after one use.Self-feeders may be used for the feeding of dry food. If self-feeders areused, they must be cleaned and sanitized as needed in accordance with andSection;3.10(b)(3) of this subpart. Measures must be taken to ensure there is nomolding, deterioration, and caking of feed.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 3.9</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Watering.</ITAG>If potable water is not continually available to the dogs and cats, itmust be offered to the dogs and cats at least twice daily for periods ofnot less than 1 hour each time, unless restricted by the attending veterinarian.Water receptacles must be kept clean and must be sanitized in accordancewith andSection; 3.10(b)(3) of this subpart at least once every 2 weeks,and before being used to water a different dog or cat or social groupingof dogs or cats.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 3.10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Cleaning, sanitization, housekeeping, and pest control.</ITAG>(a) Cleaning of primary enclosures. Excreta and food waste must be removedfrom primary enclosures, and from under primary enclosures, at least daily,or more frequently if necessary to prevent an excessive accumulation offeces and food waste, to prevent soiling of the dogs or cats containedin the primary enclosures, and to reduce disease hazards, insects, pestsand odors. When a primary enclosure is being cleaned by steam or by hosingor flushing with water, any dog or cat in the primary enclosure must beremoved to prevent it from being involuntarily wetted or injured. All standingwater must be removed from the primary enclosure and animals in other primaryenclosures must be protected from being contaminated with water and otherwastes during the cleaning. The pans under primary enclosures with grill-typefloors and the ground areas under raised runs with wire or slatted floorsmust be cleaned at least daily, and as often as necessary to prevent accumulationof feces and food waste and to reduce disease hazards, pests, insects andodors.(b) Sanitization of primary enclosures and food and water receptacles.(1) A used primary enclosure must be cleaned and sanitized in accordancewith this section before it can be used to house another dog or cat.(2) Primary enclosures for dogs or cats must be sanitized at least onceevery 2 weeks using one of the methods prescribed in paragraph (b)(3) ofthis section, and more often if necessary to prevent an accumulation ofdirt, debris, food waste, excrete, and other disease hazards.(3) Hard surfaces of primary enclosures and food and water receptaclesmust be sanitized using one of the following methods: (i) Live steam under pressure; (ii) Washing with hot water (at least 180 anddegrees;F (82.2 anddegrees;C))and soap or detergent, as with a mechanical cage washer; or (iii) Washing all soiled surfaces with a detergent solution so as to removeall organic material and mineral buildup, and by following the washingfirst with a safe and effective disinfectant rinse, then with a clean waterrinse. (4) Pen, runs and outdoor housing areas using material that cannot be sanitizedusing the methods provided in paragraph (b)(3) of this section, such asgravel, sand, grass, or earth, must be sanitized by removing the contaminatedmaterial as necessary to prevent odors, diseases, pests, insects, and vermininfestation. (c) Housekeeping for premises. Premises where housing facilities are located,including buildings and surrounding grounds, must be kept clean and ingood repair to protect the animals from injury, to facilitate the husbandrypractices required in this subpart, and to reduce or eliminate breedingand living areas for rodents and other pests and vermin. Premises mustbe kept free of accumulations of trash, junk, waste products, and discardedmatter. Weeds, grasses, and bushes must be controlled so as to facilitatecleaning of the premises and pest control, and to protect the health andwell-being of the animals. (d) Pest control. An effective program for the control of insects, externalparasites affecting dogs and cats, and birds and mammals that are pests,must be established and maintained so as to promote the health and well-beingof the animals and reduce contamination by pests in animal areas. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;3.11 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Employees. </ITAG>Each person subject to the Animal Welfare regulations maintaining dogsand cats must have enough employees to carry out the level of husbandrypractices and care required in this subpart. The employees who providefor husbandry and care, or handle animals, must be supervised by an animalcaretaker who has the knowledge, background, and experience in proper husbandryand care of dogs and cats to supervise others. The employer must be certainthat the supervisor and other employees can perform to these standards.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;3.12 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Social grouping. </ITAG>Dogs and cats housed in the same primary enclosure must be maintained incompatible groups, with the following restrictions: (a) Females in heat (estrus) may not be housed in the same primary enclosurewith males, except for breeding purposes; (b) Any dog or cat exhibiting a vicious or overly aggressive dispositionmust be housed separately; (c) Puppies or kittens 180 days of age or less may not be housed in thesame primary enclosure with adult dogs or cats other than their dams, exceptwhen permanently maintained in breeding colonies; (d) Dogs or cats may not be housed in the same primary enclosure with anyother species of animals, unless they are compatible; (e) Dogs and cats under quarantine or treatment for a communicable diseasemust be separated from other dogs and cats and other susceptible speciesof animals to minimize the risk of spread of the disease. <ITAG tagnum="84">Transportation Standards </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;3.13 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Consignments to carriers and intermediate handlers. </ITAG>(a) Carriers and intermediate handlers must not accept a dog or cat fortransport in commerce more than 4 hours before the scheduled departuretime of the primary conveyance on which the animal is to be transported.However, a carrier or intermediate handler may agree with anyone consigninga dog or cat to extend this time by up to 2 hours. (b) Carriers and intermediate handlers must not accept a dog or cat fortransport in commerce unless they are provided with the name, address,and phone number of the consignee. (c) Carriers and intermediate handlers must not accept a dog or cat fortransport in commerce unless written instructions concerning in-transitfood and water requirements for each dog and cat in the shipment are securelyattached to the outside of its primary enclosure in a manner that makesthem easily noticed and read. (d) Carriers and intermediate handlers must not accept a dog or cat fortransport in commerce unless the consignor certifies in writing to thecarrier or intermediate handler that the dog or cat was offered food duringthe 12 hours and water during the 4 hours before delivery to the carrieror intermediate handler, and specifies the date and time the dog or catwas last offered food and water. A copy of the certification must accompanythe dog or cat to its destination and must include the following informationfor each primary enclosure: (1) The consignor's name and address; (2) The tag number or tattoo assigned to each dog or cat under andSection;2.50of the regulations; (3) A statement by the consignor certifying that each dog or cat containedin the primary enclosure was offered food within 12 hours and water within4 hours before delivery to the carrier or intermediate handler, and thedate and time food and water was last offered; and (4) The consignor's signature and the date and time the certification wassigned. (e) Carriers and intermediate handlers must not accept a dog or cat fortransport in commerce in a primary enclosure unless the primary enclosuremeets the requirements of andSection;3.14 of this subpart, or the consignorcertifies in writing to the carrier or intermediate handler that the primaryenclosure meets the requirements of andSection;3.14 of this subpart. Evenif the consignor provides this certification, a carrier or intermediatehandler must not accept a dog or cat for transport if the primary enclosureis obviously defective or damaged and cannot reasonably be expected tosafely and comfortably contain the dog or cat without causing sufferingor injury. A copy of the certification must accompany the dog or cat toits destination and must include the following information for each primaryenclosure: (1) The consignor's name and address; (2) The tag number or tattoo assigned to each dog or cat under andSection;2.50of the regulations; (3) A statement by the consignor certifying that each primary enclosurein the shipment meets the standards for primary enclosures in andSection;3.14of this subpart; and (4) The consignor's signature and the date the certification was signed.(f) Carriers and intermediate handlers must not accept a dog or cat fortransport in commerce unless their holding area and cargo facilities meetthe minimum temperature requirements provided in andSection;andSection;3.18and 3.19 of this subpart, or unless the consignor provides them with acertificate signed by a veterinarian and dated no more than 10 days beforedelivery of the animal to the carrier or intermediate handler for transportin commerce, certifying that the animal is acclimated to temperatures lowerthan those required in andSection;andSection;3.18 and 3.19 of this subpart.Even if the carrier or intermediate handler receives this certification,the temperatures the dog or cat is exposed to while in the carrier's orintermediate handler's custody must not be lower than the minimum temperaturespecified by the veterinarian in accordance with paragraph (f)(3) of thissection. A copy of the certification must accompany the dog or cat to itsdestination and must include the following information: (1) The consignor's name and address; (2) The tag number or tattoo assigned to each dog or cat under andSection;2.50of the regulations; (3) A statement by a veterinarian, and dated no more than 10 days beforedelivery, that to the best of his or her knowledge, each of the dogs orcats contained in the primary enclosure is acclimated to air temperatureslower than 45 anddegrees;F (7.2 anddegrees;C), but now lower than a minimumtemperature, specified on the certificate, that the veterinarian has determinedis based on generally accepted temperature standards for the age, condition,and breed of the animals; and (4) The signature of the veterinarian and the date the certification wassigned. (g) When a primary enclosure containing a dog or cat has arrived at theanimal holding area at a terminal facility after transport, the carrieror intermediate handler must attempt to notify the consignee upon arrivaland at least once in every 6-hour period thereafter. The time, date, andmethod of each attempted notification and the actual notification of theconsignee, and the name of the person who notifies or attempts to notifythe consignee must be written on the carrier's or intermediate handler'scopy of the shipping document and on the copy that accompanies the primaryenclosure. If the consignee cannot be notified within 24 hours after thedog or cat has arrived at the terminal facility, the carrier or intermediatehandler must return the animal to the consignor or to whomever the consignordesignates. If the consignee is notified of the arrival and does not acceptdelivery of the dog or cat within 48 hours after arrival of the dog orcat, the carrier or intermediate handler must return the animal to theconsignor or to whomever the consignor designates. The carrier or intermediatehandler must continue to provide proper care, feeding, and housing to thedog or cat, and maintain the dog or cat in accordance with generally acceptedprofessional and husbandry practices until the consignee accepts deliveryof the dog or cat or until it is returned to the consignor or to whomeverthe consignor designates. The carrier or intermediate handler must obligatethe consignor to reimburse the carrier or intermediate handler for thecost of return transportation and care. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;3.14 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Primary enclosures used to transport live dogs and cats. </ITAG>Any person subject to the Animal Welfare regulations must not transportor deliver for transport in commerce a dog or cat unless the followingrequirements are met: (a) <T3>Construction of primary enclosures.</T3> The dog or cat must be containedin a primary enclosure such as a compartment, transport cage, carton, orcrate. Primary enclosures used to transport dogs and cats must be constructedso that: (1) The primary enclosure is strong enough to contain the dogs and catssecurely and comfortably and to withstand the normal rigors of transportation;(2) The interior of the primary enclosure has no sharp points or edgesand no protrusions that could injure the animal contained in it;(3) The dog or cat is at all times securely contained within the enclosureand cannot put any part of its body outside the enclosure in a way thatcould result in injury to itself, to handlers, or to persons or animalsnearby;(4) The dog or cat can be easily and quickly removed from the enclosurein an emergency;(5) Unless the enclosure is permanently affixed to the conveyance, adequatedevices such as handles or handholds are provided on its exterior, andenable the enclosure to be lifted without tilting it, and ensure that anyonehandling the enclosure will not come into physical contact with the animalcontained inside;(6) Unless the enclosure is permanently affixed to the conveyance, it isclearly marked on top and on one or more sides with the words ``Live Animals,''in letters at least 1 inch (2.5 cm.) high, and with arrows or other markingsto indicate the correct upright position of the primary enclosure;(7) Any material, treatment, paint, preservative, or other chemical usedin or on the enclosure is nontoxic to the animal and not harmful to thehealth or well-being of the animal;(8) Proper ventilation is provided to the animal in accordance with paragraph(c) of this section; and(9) The primary enclosure has a solid, leak-proof bottom or a removable,leak-proof collection tray under a slatted or wire mesh floor that preventsseepage of waste products, such as excreta and body fluids, outside ofthe enclosure. If a slatted or wire mesh floor is used in the enclosure,it must be designed and constructed so that the animal cannot put any partof its body between the slats or through the holes in the mesh. Unlessthe dogs or cats are on raised slatted floors or raised floors made ofwire mesh, the primary enclosure must contain enough previously unusedlitter to absorb and cover excreta. The litter must be of a suitably absorbentmaterial that is safe and nontoxic to the dogs and cats.(b) <T3>Cleaning of primary enclosures. </T3>A primary enclosure used to holdor transport dogs or cats in commerce must be cleaned and sanitized beforeeach use in accordance with the methods provided in andSection; 3.10(b)(3)of this subpart. If the dogs or cats are in transit for more than 24 hours,the enclosures must be cleaned and any litter replaced, or other methods,such as moving the animals to another enclosure, must be utilized to preventthe soiling of the dogs or cats by body wastes.(c) <T3>Ventilation. </T3>(1) Unless the primary enclosure is permanently affixedto the conveyance, there must be ventilation openings on all four wallsof the primary enclosure. The ventilation openings must total at least8 percent of the surface area of each wall, and the total surface areaof all the ventilation openings must be at least 14 percent of the totalsurface area of all four walls of the primary enclosure. Additionally,at least one-third of the total minimum area required for ventilation mustbe located on the upper one-half of the primary enclosure;(2) Unless the primary enclosure is permanently affixed to the conveyance,projecting rims or similar devices must be located on the exterior of eachenclosure wall having a ventilation opening, in order to prevent obstructionof the openings. The projecting rims or similar devices must be large enoughto provide a minimum air circulation space of 0.75 in. (1.9 cm) betweenthe primary enclosure and anything the enclosure is placed against.(3) If a primary enclosure is permanently affixed to the primary conveyanceso that there is only a front ventilation opening for the enclosure, theprimary enclosure must be affixed to the primary conveyance in such a waythat the front ventilation opening cannot be blocked, and the front ventilationopening must open directly to an unobstructed aisle or passageway insidethe conveyance. The ventilation opening must be at least 90 percent ofthe total area of the front wall of the enclosure, and must be coveredwith bars, wire mesh, or smooth expanded metal having air spaces.(d) <T3>Compatibility. </T3>(1) Live dogs or cats transported in the same primaryenclosure must be of the same species and be maintained in compatible groups,except that dogs and cats that are private pets, are of comparable size,and are compatible, may be transported in the same primary enclosure.(2) Puppies or kittens 180 days of age or less may not be transported inthe same primary enclosure with adult dogs or acts other than their dams.(3) Dogs or cats that are overly aggressive or exhibit a vicious dispositionmust be transported individually in a primary enclosure.(4) Any female dog or cat in heat (estrus) may not be transported in thesame primary enclosure with any male dog or cat.(e) <T3>Space and placement. </T3>(1) Primary enclosures used to transportlive dogs and cats must be large enough to ensure that each animal containedin the primary enclosure has enough space to turn about normally whilestanding, to stand and sit erect, and to lie in a natural position.(2) Primary enclosures used to transport dogs and cats must be positionedin the primary conveyance so as to provide protection from the elements.(f) <T3>Transportation by air. </T3>(1) No more than two live dogs or cats,6 months of age or older, that are of comparable size, may be transportedin the same primary enclosure when shipped via air carrier, and only ifall other requirements in this section are met.(2) No more than two live puppies, 8 weeks to 6 months of age, that areof comparable size, and weighing over 20 lb (9 kg) each, may be transportedin the same primary enclosure when shipped via air carrier, and only ifall other requirements in this section are met.(3) No more than three live puppies or kittens, 8 weeks to 6 months ofage, that are of comparable size, and weighing 20 lb (9 kg) or less each,may be transported in the same primary enclosure when shipped via air carrier,and only if all other requirements in this section are met.(4) Weaned live puppies or kittens less than 8 weeks of age and of comparablesize, or puppies or kittens that are less than 8 weeks of age that arelittermates and are accompanied by their dam, may be transported in thesame primary enclosure when shipped to research facilities, including federalresearch facilities.(g) <T3>Transportation by surface vehicle. </T3>(1) No more than four livedogs or cats, 8 weeks of age or older, that are of comparable size, maybe transported in the same primary enclosure when shipped by surface vehicle(including ground and water transportation) and only if all other requirementsof this section are met.(2) Weaned live puppies or kittens less than 8 weeks of age and of comparablesize, or puppies or kittens that are less than 8 weeks of age that arelittermates and are accompanied by their dam, may be transported in thesame primary enclosure when shipped to research facilities, including federalresearch facilities. (h) <T3>Accompanying documents and records. </T3>Shipping documents that mustaccompany shipments of dogs and cats may be held by the operator of theprimary conveyance, for surface transportation only, or must be securelyattached in a readily accessible manner to the outside of any primary enclosurethat is part of the shipment, in a manner that allows them to be detachedfor examination and securely reattached, such as in a pocket or sleeve.Instructions for food and water and for administration of drugs, medication,and other special care must be attached to each primary enclosure in amanner that makes them easy to notice, to detach for examination, and toreattach securely.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 3.15</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Primary conveyances (motor vehicle, rail, air, and marine). </ITAG>(a) The animal cargo space of primary conveyances used to transport dogsand cats must be designed, constructed, and maintained in a manner thatat all times protects the health and well-being of the animals transportedin them, ensures their safety and comfort, and prevents the entry of engineexhaust from the primary conveyance during transportation. (b) The animal cargo space must have a supply of air that is sufficientfor the normal breathing of all the animals being transported in it. (c) Each primary enclosure containing dogs or cats must be positioned inthe animal cargo space in a manner that provides protection from the elementsand that allows each dog or cat enough air for normal breathing. (d) During air transportation, including time spent on the ground, dogsand cats must be held or transported in cargo areas that are heated orcooled as necessary to maintain anambient temperature that ensures thehealth and comfort of the dogs or cats. The cargo areas must be pressurizedwhen the primary conveyance used for air transportation is not on the ground. (e) During surface transportation, auxiliary ventilation, such as fans,blowers or air conditioning, must be used in any animal cargo space containinglive dogs and cats when the ambient temperature within the animal cargospace reaches 85 anddegrees;F (29.5 anddegrees;C). Moreover, the ambient temperaturemay not exceed 95 anddegrees;F (35 anddegrees;C) at any time; nor exceed 85anddegrees;F (29.5 anddegrees;C) for a period of more than 4 hours; nor fallbelow 45 anddegrees;F (7.2 anddegrees;C) for a period of more than 4 hours;nor fall below 35 anddegrees;F (1.7 anddegrees;F) at any time. (f) Primary enclosures must be positioned in the primary conveyance ina manner that allows the dogs and cats to be quickly and easily removedfrom the primary conveyance in an emergency. (g) The interior of the animal cargo space must be kept clean. (h) Live dogs and cats may not be transported with any material, substance(e.g., dry ice) or device in a manner that may reasonably be expected toharm the dogs and cats or cause inhumane conditions, unless proper precautionis taken to prevent the injury or inhumane conditions.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 3.16</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Food and water requirements. </ITAG>(a) Each dog and cat that is 16 weeks of age or more must be offered foodat least once every 24 hours. Puppies and kittens less than 16 weeks ofage must be offered food at least once every 12 hours. These time periodsapply to dealers, exhibitors, research facilities, including federal researchfacilities, who transport dogs and cats in their own primary conveyance,starting from the time the dog or cat was last offered food before transportationwas begun. These time periods apply to carriers and intermediate handlersstarting from the date and time stated on the certificate provided underandSection; 3.13(d). Each dog or cat must be offered food within 12 hoursbefore being transported in commerce. Consignors who are subject to theAnimal Welfare regulations must certify that each dog and cat was offeredfood within the 12 hours preceding delivery of the dog or cat to a carrieror intermediate handler for transportation in commerce, and must certifythe date and time of the feeding, in accordance with andSection; 3.13(d). (b) Each dog and cat must be offered potable water during the 4 hours immediatelypreceding the beginning of its transportation in commerce and at leastonce every 12 hours thereafter. This time period applies to dealers, exhibitors,and research facilities, including federal research facilities, who transportdogs and cats in their own primary conveyance, starting from the time thedog or cat was last offered potable water before being transported in commerce.This time period applies to carriers and intermediate handlers startingfrom the date and time stated on the certificate provided under andSection;3.13(d). Consignors who are subject to the Animal Welfare regulations mustcertify that each dog and cat was offered potable water within 4 hoursbefore being transported in commerce, and must certify the date and timethe water was offered, in accordance with andSection; 3.13(d).  (c) Any dealer, research facility, including a federal research facility,or exhibitor offering any dog or cat to a carrier or intermediate handlerfor transportation in commerce must securely attach to the outside of theprimary enclosure used for transporting the dog or cat, written instructionsfor the in-transit food and water requirements for the dogs and cats containedin the enclosure. The instructions must be attached in a manner that makesthem easily noticed, detached and returned to the enclosure.(d) Food and water receptacles must be securely attached inside the primaryenclosure and placed so that the receptacles can be filled from outsidethe enclosure without opening the door. Food and water containers mustbe designed, constructed, and installed so that a dog or cat cannot leavethe primary enclosure through the food or water opening. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 3.17 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Care in transit. </ITAG>(a) Surface transportation (ground and water). Any person subject to theAnimal Welfare regulations transporting dogs or cats in commerce must ensurethat the operator of the conveyance, or a person accompanying the operator,observes the dogs or cats as often as circumstance allow, but not lessthan once every 4 hours, to make sure they have sufficient air for normalbreathing, that the ambient temperature is within the limits provided inandSection; 3.15(e), and that all applicable standards of this subpart arebeing complied with. The regulated person must ensure that the operatoror person accompanying the operator determines whether any of the dogsor cats are in obvious physical distress and obtains any veterinary careneeded for the dogs or cats at the closest available veterinary facility.(b) Air transportation. During air transportation of dogs or cats, it isthe responsibility of the carrier to observe the dogs or cats as frequentlyas circumstance allow, but not less than once every 4 hours if the animalcargo area is accessible during flight. If the animal cargo area is notaccessible during flight, the carrier must observe the dogs or cats wheneverthey are loaded and unloaded and whenever the animal cargo space is otherwiseaccessible to make sure they have sufficient air for normal breathing,that the animal cargo area meets the heating and cooling requirements ofandSection; 3.15(d), and that all other applicable standards of this subpartare being complied with. The carrier must determine whether any of thedogs or cats are in obvious physical distress, and arrange for any neededveterinary care as soon as possible.  (c) If a dog or cat is obviously ill, injured, or in physical distress,it must not be transported in commerce, except to receive veterinary carefor the condition.  (d) During transportation in commerce, a dog or cat must not be removedfrom its primary enclosure unless it is placed in another primary enclosureor facility that meets the requirements of andSection; 3.6 or andSection; 3.14of this subpart.  (e) The transportation regulations contained in this subpart must be compliedwith until the dog or cat reaches its final destination, or until the consigneetakes physical delivery of the animal if the animal is consigned for transportation.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 3.18 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Terminal facilities.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Placement. </T3>Any person subject to the Animal Welfare regulationsmust not commingle shipments of dogs or cats with inanimate cargo in animalholding areas of terminal facilities.  (b) <T3>Cleaning, sanitization, and pest control. </T3>All animal holding areasof terminal facilities must be cleaned and sanitized in a manner prescribedin andSection; 3.10(b)(3) of this subpart, as often as necessary to preventan accumulation of debris or excreta and to minimize vermin infestationand disease hazards. Terminal facilities must follow an effective programin all animal holding areas for the control of insects, ectoparasites,and birds and mammals that are pests to dogs and cats.  (c) <T3>Ventilation. </T3>Air, preferably fresh air, must be provided in anyanimal holding area in a terminal facility containing dogs or cats, bymeans of windows, doors, vents, or air conditioning. The air must be circulatedby fans, blowers, or air conditioning so as to minimize drafts, odors,and moisture condensation. Auxiliary ventilation, such as exhaust fans,vents, fans, blowers, or air conditioning must be used in any animal holdingarea containing dogs and cats, when the ambient temperature is 75anddegrees;F (23.9anddegrees; C) or higher. (d) <T3>Temperature. </T3>The ambient temperature in an animal holding areacontaining dogs or cats must not fall below 456anddegrees; F (7.2anddegrees;C) or rise above 75anddegrees; F (23.9anddegrees; C) for more than four consecutivehours at any time dogs or cats are present. The ambient temperature mustnot fall below 35anddegrees; F (1.7anddegrees; C) or rise above 85anddegrees;F (29.5anddegrees; C) at any time dogs or cats are present. The ambient temperaturemust be measured in the animal holding area by the carrier, intermediatehandler, or a person transporting dogs or cats who is subject to the AnimalWelfare regulations, outside any primary enclosure containing a dog orcat at a point not more than 3 feet (0.91 m) away from an outside wallof the primary enclosure, and approximately midway up the side of the enclosure.(e) <T3>Shelter. </T3>Any person subject to the Animal Welfare regulationsholding a live dog or cat in an animal holding area of a terminal facilitymust provide the following:  (1) Shelter from sunlight and extreme heat. Shade must be provided thatis sufficient to protect the dog or cat from the direct rays of the sun. (2) Shelter from rain or snow. Sufficient protection must be provided toallow the dogs and cats to remain dry during rain, snow, and other precipitation. (f) <T3>Duration. </T3>The length of time any person subject to the AnimalWelfare regulations can hold dogs and cats in animal holding areas of terminalfacilities upon arrival is the same as that provided in andSection; 3.13(g).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 3.19 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Handling </ITAG>(a) Any person subject to the Animal Welfare regulations who moves (includingloading and unloading) dogs or cats within, to, or from the animal holdingarea of a terminal facility or a primary conveyance must do so as quicklyand efficiently as possible and must provide the following during movementof the dog or cat:  (1) <T3>Shelter from sunlight and extreme heat. </T3>Sufficient shade mustbe provided to protect the dog or cat from the direct rays of the sun.The dog or cat must not be exposed to an ambient air temperature above85anddegrees; F (29.5anddegrees; C) for a period of more than 45 minutes whilebeing moved to or from a primary conveyance or a terminal facility. Thetemperature must be measured in the manner provided in andSection; 3.18(d)of this subpart.  (2) <T3>Shelter from rain and snow. </T3>Sufficient protection must be providedto allow the dog and cat to remain dry during rain, snow, and other precipitation. (3) <T3>Shelter from cold temperatures. </T3>Transporting devices on whichlive dogs or cats are placed to move them must be covered to protect theanimals when the outdoor temperature falls below 50anddegrees; F (10anddegrees;C). The dogs or cats must not be exposed to an ambient temperature below45anddegrees; F (7.2anddegrees; C) for a period of more than 45 minutes, unlessthey are accompanied by a certificate of acclimation to lower temperaturesas provided in andSection; 3.13(f). The temperature must be measured in themanner provided in andSection; 3.18(d) of this subpart.  (b) Any person handling a primary enclosure containing a dog or cat mustuse care and must avoid causing physical or emotional distress to the dogor cat. (1) A primary enclosure containing a live dog or cat must not be placedon unattended conveyor belts, or on elevated conveyor belts, such as baggageclaim conveyor belts and inclined conveyor ramps that lead to baggage claimareas, at any time; except that a primary enclosure may be placed on inclinedconveyor ramps used to load and unload aircraft if an attendant is presentat each end of the conveyor belt.(2) A primary enclosure containing a dog or cat must not be tossed, dropped,or needlessly tilted, and must not be stacked in a manner that may reasonablybe expected to result in its falling. They must be handled and positionedin the manner that written instructions and arrows on the outside of theprimary enclosure indicate.(c) The regulations in this section apply to movement of a dog or cat fromprimary conveyance to primary conveyance, within a primary conveyance orterminal facility, and to or from a terminal facility or a primary conveyance.3. In andSection; 3.28, paragraph (b)(2) (i) and (ii) and (b)(3) (i) and(iii) would be revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 3.28</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Primary enclosures.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) * * *(2) * * *(i) The interior height of any primary enclosure used to confine guineapigs must be at least 7 inches (17.78 cm).(ii) Each guinea pig must be provided a minimum amount of floor space inany primary enclosure as follows:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,tp0,i1,s10,5,6</C> <H1>Weight or stage of maturity</H1><H1>Minimum floor space per hamster</H1><H2>in\2\</H2><H2>cm\2\</H2><ITAG tagnum="1">Weaning to 350 grams <D>60 </D><D>387.12</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andgreater;350 grams or nursing females with their litters <D>101 </D><D>651.65</D></ITAG></ITAG>(3) * * *(i) The interior height of any primary enclosure used to confine hamstersmust be at least 6 inches (15.24 cm).<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(iii) Except as provided in paragraph (b)(3)(ii) of this section, eachhamster must be provided a minimum amount of floor space in any primaryenclosure as follows:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>4,L2,tp0,i1,s8,7,7,7</C> <H1>Weight</H1><H2>g</H2><H2>ozs</H2><H1>Minimum floor space per hamster</H1><H2>in\2\</H2><H2>cm\2\</H2><ITAG tagnum="1">60 <D>2.1 </D><D>10 </D><D>64.52</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">60 to 80 <D>2.1-2.8 </D><D>13 </D><D>83.88</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">80 to 100 <D>2.8-3.5 </D><D>16 </D><D>103.23</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andgreater; 100 <D/>andgreater; 3.5 <D>19 </D><D>122.59</D></ITAG></ITAG>4. In andSection; 3.36, the introductory text would be revised to read asfollows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 3.36</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Primary enclosures used to transport live guinea pigs and hamsters.</ITAG>No person subject to the Animal Welfare regulations is allowed to offerfor transportation, or transport, in commerce any live guinea pig or hamsterin a primary enclosure that does not conform to the following requirements.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>5. In andSection; 3.37, a new paragraph (g) would be added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 3.37</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Primary conveyances (motor vehicle, rail, air, and marine).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(g) The animal cargo space of primary conveyances used to transport guineapigs or hamsters must be mechanically sound and provide fresh air by meansof windows, doors, vents, or air conditioning so as to minimize drafts,odors, and moisture condensation. Auxiliary ventilation, such as fans,blowers, or air conditioners, must be used in any cargo space containinglive guinea pigs or hamsters when the ambient temperature in the animalcargo space is 75anddegrees; F (23.9anddegrees; C) or higher. The ambient temperaturewithin the animal cargo space must not be allowed to exceedd 85anddegrees;F (29.5anddegrees; C) or to fall below 45anddegrees; F (7.2anddegrees; C), exceptthat the ambient temperature in the cargo space may be below 45anddegrees;F (7.2anddegrees; C) for hamsters if the hamsters are accompanied by a certificateof acclimation to lower temperatures, as provided in andSection; 3.35(c)of this part.6. In andSection; 3.40, the first two sentences would be revised to readas follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 3.40</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Terminal facilities.</ITAG>No person subject to the Animal Welfare regulations is allowed to commingleshipments of live guinea pigs or hamsters with inanimate cargo. All animalholding areas of a terminal facility where shipments of live guinea pigsor hamsters are maintained must be cleaned and sanitized as prescribedin andSection; 3.31 of the standards often enough to prevent an accumulationof debris or excreta, to minimize vermin infestation, and to prevent adisease hazard. * * *7. In andSection; 3.41 paragraph (a) introductory text would be revised toread as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 3.41</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Handling.</ITAG>(a) Any person who is subject to the Animal Welfare Regulations and whomoves live guinea pigs or hamsters from an animal holding area of a terminalfacility to a primary conveyance and vice versa must do so as quickly andefficiently as possible. Any person subject to the Animal Welfare Act andholding any live guinea pig or hamster in an animal holding area of a terminalfacility or transporting any live guinea pig or hamster to or from a terminalfacility must provide the following: <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>8. In andSection; 3.53, the table in paragraph (b) would be revised to readas follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 3.53</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Primary enclosures. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) * * *<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>7,L2,tp0,i1,s10,7.1,8,6.2,8,8,8</C>  <H1> </H1><H1>Individual weights</H1><H2>kg</H2><H2>lbs</H2><H1>Minimum floor space</H1><H2>m \2\</H2><H2>ft \2\</H2><H1>Minimum interior height</H1><H2>cm</H2><H2>in</H2><ITAG tagnum="1">Individual rabbits (weaned)<D>2</D><D>4.4</D><D>0.14</D><D>1.5</D><D>35.56</D><D>14</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>2-4</D><D>4.4-8.8</D><D>0.28</D><D>3.0</D><D>35.56</D><D>14</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>4-5.4</D><D>8.8-11.9</D><D>0.37</D><D>4.0</D><D>35.56</D><D>14</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>andgreater;5.4</D><D>andgreater;11.9</D><D>0.46</D><D>5.0</D><D>35.56</D><D>14</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>7,L2,tp0,i1,s10,7.1,8,6.2,8,8,8</C> <H1> </H1><H1>Weight of nursing female</H1><H2>kg</H2><H2>lbs</H2><H1>Minimum floor space/female andamp; litter</H1><H2>m \2\</H2><H2>ft \2\</H2><H1>Minimum interior height</H1><H2>cm</H2><H2>in</H2><ITAG tagnum="1">Females with litters<D>2</D><D>4.4</D><D>0.37</D><D>4.0</D><D>35.56</D><D>14</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>2-4</D><D>4.4-8.8</D><D>0.46</D><D>5.0</D><D>35.56</D><D>14</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>4-5.4</D><D>8.8-11.9</D><D>0.56</D><D>6.0</D><D>35.56</D><D>14</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>andgreater;5.4</D><D>andgreater;11.9</D><D>0.70</D><D>7.0</D><D>35.56</D><D>14</D></ITAG>9. In andSection; 3.61, the introductory paragraph would be revised to readas follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 3.61</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Primary enclosures used to transport live rabbits.</ITAG>No person subject to the Animal Welfare regulations is allowed to offerfor transportation or to transport in commerce any live rabbit in a primaryenclosure that does not conform to the following requirements. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>10. In andSection; 3.62, a new paragraph (g) would be added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 3.62</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Primary conveyances (motor vehicle, rail, air, and marine). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(g) The animal cargo space of primary conveyances used to transport rabbitsmust be mechanically sound and provide fresh air by means of windows, doors,vents, or air conditioning so as to mimimize drafts, odors, and mositurecondensation. Auxiliary ventilation, such as fans, blowers, or air conditioners,must be used in any cargo space containing live rabbits when the ambienttemperature in the animal cargo space is 75 anddegrees;F (23.9 anddegrees;C)or higher. The ambient temperature within the animal cargo space must notbe allowed to exceed 85 anddegrees;F (29.5 anddegrees;C) or to fall below 45anddegrees;(7.2 anddegrees;C), except that the ambient temperature in the cargo spacemay be below 45anddegrees;F (7.2 anddegrees;C) if the rabbits are accompaniedby a certificate of acclimation to lower temperatures, as described inandSection; 3.60(c) of this part.11. In andSection; 3.65 the first two sentences would be revised to readas follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 3.65</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Terminal facilities.</ITAG>No person subject to the Animal Welfare regulations may commingle shipmentsof live rabbits with inanimate cargo. All animal holding areas of a terminalfacility where shipments of rabbits are maintained must be cleaned andsanitized as prescribed in andSection; 3.56 of the standards often enoughto prevent an accumulation of debris or excreta, to minimize vermin infestation,and to prevent a disease hazard. * * *12. In andSection; 3.66, paragraph (a) would be revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 3.66</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Handling.</ITAG>(a) Any person who is subject to the Animal Welfare regulations and whomoves live rabbits from an animal holding area of a terminal facility toa primary conveyance and vice versa must do so as quickly and efficientlyas possible. Any person subject to the Animal Welfare regulations and holdingany live rabbit in an animal holding area of a terminal facility or transportingany live rabbit to or from a terminal facility must provide the following:<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>13. Subpart D, consisting of andSection;andSection; 3.75 through 3.93, wouldbe revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="76">Subpart D_Specifications for the Humane Handling, Care, Treatment,and Transportation of Nonhuman Primates</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Facilities and Operating Standards </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3.75 Housing facilities, general. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3.76 Indoor housing facilities. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3.77 Sheltered housing facilities. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3.78 Outdoor housing facilities. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3.79 Mobile or traveling housing facilities. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3.80 Primary enclosure. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3.81 Additional requirements for research facilities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Animal Health and Husbandry Standards </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3.82 Feeding. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3.83 Watering. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3.84 Cleaning, sanitization, housekeeping, and pest control. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3.85 Employees. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3.86 Social grouping and separation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Transportation Standards </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3.87 Consignments to carriers and intermediate handlers. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3.88 Primary enclosures used to transport nonhuman primates. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3.89 Primary conveyances (motor vehicle, rail, air, and marine). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3.90 Food and water requirements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3.91 Care in transit. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3.92 Terminal facilities. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3.93 Handling.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart D_Specifications for the Humane Handling, Care, Treatment,and Transportation of Nonhuman Primates.\1\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ Nonhuman primates include a great diversity of forms,ranging from the marmoset weighing only a few ounces, to the adult gorillaweighing hundreds of pounds, and including more than 240 species. Theycome from Asia, Africa, and Central and South America, and they live indifferent habitats in nature. Some have been transported to the UnitedStates from the natural habitats and some have been raised in captivityin the United States. Their nutritional and activity requirements differ,as do their social and environmental requirements. As a result, the conditionsappropriate for one species do not necessarily apply to another. Accordingly,these minimum specifications must be applied in accordance with the customaryand generally accepted professional and husbandry practices consideredappropriate for each species, and necessary to promote their psychologicalwell-being.<ITAG tagnum="28">These minimum standards apply only to live nonhuman primates, unlessstated otherwise. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Facilities and Operating Standards</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 3.75 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Housing facilities, general.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Structure; construction. </T3>Housing facilities for nonhuman primatesmust be designed and constructed so that they are structurally sound forthe species of nonhuman primates housed in them. They must be kept in goodrepair, and they must protect the animals from injury, contain the animalssecurely, and restrict other animals and unauthorized humans from entering.(b) <T3>Condition and site. </T3>Housing facilities and areas used for storinganimal food or bedding must be free of any accumulation of trash, wastematerial, junk, weeds, and other discarded materials. Animal areas insideof housing facilities must be kept neat and free of clutter, includingequipment, furniture, or stored material, but may contain materials actuallyused and necessary for cleaning the area, such as brooms, mops, mop buckets,trash containers, and fixtures necessary for proper husbandry practices,such as tables, cabinets, and sinks. Housing facilities other than thosemaintained by research facilities and federal research facilities mustbe physically separated from any other businesses. If a housing facilityis located on the same premises as any other businesses, it must be physicallyseparated from the other businesses so that unauthorized humans, and animalsthe size of dogs, skunks, and raccoons, are prevented from entering it.(c) <T3>Surfaces._</T3>(1) <T3>General requirements. </T3>The surfaces of housing facilities_includingperches, shelves, swings, boxes, houses, dens, and other furniture-typefixtures or objects within the facility_must be constructed in a mannerand made of materials that allow them to be readily cleaned and sanitized,or removed or replaced when worn or soiled. Furniture-type fixtures orobjects must be sturdily constructed and must be strong enough to providefor the safe activity and welfare of nonhuman primates. Outdoor floorsmay be made of dirt, sand, gravel, grass, or other similar material thatcan be readily cleaned, or can be removed or replaced whenever cleaningdoes not eliminate odors, diseases, pests, insects, or vermin. Any surfacesthat come in contact with nonhuman primates must:(i) Be free of rust that prevents the required cleaning and sanitization,or that affects the structural strength of the surface; and(ii) Be free of jagged edges or sharp points that might injure the animals.(2) Maintenance and replacement of surfaces. All surfaces must be maintainedon a regular basis. Surfaces of housing facilities_including houses, dens,and other furniture-type fixtures and objects within the facility_thatcannot be readily cleaned and sanitized, must be replaced when worn orsoiled.(3) <T3>Cleaning. </T3>Hard surfaces with which nonhuman primates come in contactmust be cleaned daily and sanitized at least once every two weeks and asoften as necessary to prevent any accumulation of excreta or disease hazards,unless the species housed in the facility engage in scent marking. If thespecies scent mark, the surfaces must be sanitized at regular intervalsdetermined in accordance with generally accepted professional and husbandrypractices and they must be spot cleaned daily. Floors made of dirt, sand,gravel, grass, or other similar material, and planted enclosures must beraked and spot-cleaned daily. Contaminated material must be removed orreplaced whenever raking and spot cleaning does not eliminate odors, diseases,insects, pests, or vermin infestation. All other surfaces of housing facilitiesmust be cleaned daily and sanitized when necessary to satisfy generallyaccepted husbandry standards and practices. Sanitization may be done byany of the methods provided in andSection; 3.84(b)(3) for primary enclosures.(d) <T3>Water and electric power. </T3>The housing facility must have reliableelectric power adequate for heating, cooling, ventilation, and lighting,and for carrying out other husbandry requirements in accordance with theregulations in this subpart. The housing facility must provide mechanicallypressurized running potable water for the nonhuman primates' drinking needs.It must be adequate for cleaning and for carrying out other husbandry requirements.(e) <T3>Storage. </T3>Supplies of food and bedding must be stored in leakproofcontainers that protect the supplies from spoilage, contamination, andvermin infestation. The supplies must be stored off the floor and awayfrom the walls, to allow cleaning underneath and around the supplies. Perishablefood must be refrigerated, and all food must be stored in a manner thatprevents contamination and deterioration of its nutritive value. Only thefood and bedding currently being used may be kept in animal areas, andwhen not in actual use, open food and bedding supplies must be kept inleakproof containers with tightly fitting lids to prevent spoilage andcontamination. Substances that are toxic to a nonhuman primate must notbe stored in animal areas, or in food storage or preparation areas.(f) <T3>Drainage and waste disposal. </T3>Housing facility operators must providedaily (or more often as necessary) removal and disposal of animal and foodwastes, bedding, dead animals, debris, garbage, water, and any other fluidsand wastes. Housing facilities must be equipped with disposal facilitiesand drainage systems that are constructed and operated so that animal wastesand water are rapidly eliminated and the animals stay dry. Disposal anddrainage systems must minimize vermin and pest infestation, insects, odors,and disease hazards. All drains must be properly constructed, installed,and maintained. If closed drainage systems are used, they must be equippedwith traps and prevent the backflow of gases and the backup of sewage ontothe floor. If the facility uses sump ponds, settlement ponds, or othersimilar systems for drainage and animal waste disposal, the system mustbe located for enough away from the animal area of the housing facilityto prevent odors, diseases, insects, pests, and vermin infestation. Ifdrip or constant flow watering devices are used to provide water to theanimals, excess water must be rapidly drained out of the animal areas bygutters or pipes so that the animals stay dry. Puddles of water in animalareas must be promptly mopped up or drained so that the animals stay dry.Trash containers in housing facilities and in food storage and food preparationareas must be leakproof and must have tightly fitted lids on them at alltimes. Dead animals, animal parts, and animal waste must not be kept infood storage or food preparation areas, food freezers, food refrigerators,and animal areas.(g) <T3>Washrooms and sinks. </T3>Washing facilities, such as washrooms, basins,sinks, or showers must be provided for animal caretakers and must be readilyaccessible<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 3.76 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Indoor housing facilities.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Heating, cooling, and temperate. </T3>Indoor housing facilities mustbe sufficiently heated and cooled when necessary to protect nonhuman primatesfrom cold and hot temperatures and to provide for their health, comfortand well-being. The ambient temperature in the facility must not fall below50 anddegrees;F (10 anddegrees;C) and must not rise above 85 anddegrees;F (29.5anddegrees;C) when nonhuman primates are present. Within this range, theambient temperature must be maintained at a level that ensures the healthand well-being of the species housed, in accordance with generally acceptedprofessional and husbandry practices.(b) <T3>Ventilation. </T3>Indoor housing facilities must be sufficiently ventilatedat all times when nonhuman primates are present to provide for their health,comfort, and well-being and to minimize odors, drafts, ammonia levels,and moisture condensation. Air, preferably fresh air, must be providedby windows, doors, vents, fans, or air conditioning. The relative humiditymust be maintained between 30 percent and 70 percent. Within this range,the relative humidity maintained must be at a level that ensures the healthand well-being of the species housed, in accordance with generally acceptedprofessional and husbandry practices.(c) <T3>Lighting. </T3>Indoor housing facilities must be lighted well enoughto permit routine inspection and cleaning of the facility, and observationof the nonhuman primates. A regular daily lighting cycle of at least 8consecutive hours of light and at least 8 consecutive hours of darknessmust be provided, by either natural or artificial light. If only artificiallight, such as fluorescent light, is provided, it must provide full-spectrumillumination. Primary enclosures must be placed in the housing facilityso as to protect the nonhuman primates from excessive light.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 3.77 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Sheltered housing facilities.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Heating, cooling, and temperature. </T3>The sheltered part of shelteredhousing facilities must be sufficiently heated and cooled when necessaryto protect the nonhuman primates from cold and hot temperatures and toprovide for their health, comfort and well-being. The ambient temperaturein the sheltered part of the facility must not fall below 50 anddegrees;F(10 anddegrees;C) and must not rise above 85 anddegrees;F (29.5 anddegrees;C).Within this range, the ambient temperature must be maintained at a levelthat ensures the health and well-being of the species housed, in accordancewith generally accepted professional and husbandry practices.(b) <T3>Ventilation. </T3>The sheltered part of sheltered animal facilitiesmust be sufficiently ventilated at all times to provide for the health,comfort, and well-being of nonhuman primates and to minimize odors, drafts,ammonia levels, and moisture condensation. Air, preferably fresh air, mustbe provided by windows, doors, vents, fans, or air conditioning. The relativehumidity maintained in the sheltered part of the facility must be between30 percent and 70 percent. Within this range, the relative humidity maintainedmust be at a level that ensures the health and well-being of the specieshoused, in accordance with generally accepted professional and husbandrypractices. (c) <T3>Lighting. </T3>The sheltered part of sheltered housing facilities mustbe lighted well enough to permit routine inspection and cleaning of thefacility, and observation of the nonhuman primates. A regular daily lightingcycle of at least 8 consecutive hours of light and at least 8 consecutivehours of darkness must be provided, by either natural or artificial light.If only artificial light, such as fluorescent light, is provided, it mustprovide full-spectrum illumination. Primary enclosures must be placed inthe housing facility so as to protect the nonhuman primates from excessivelight. (d) <T3>Shelter from the elements. </T3>Sheltered housing facilities for nonhumanprimates must provide adequate shelter from the elements at all times.It must provide protection from the sun, rain, snow, wind, and cold, andfrom any weather conditions that may occur. (e) <T3>Capacity; multiple shelters. </T3>Both the sheltered part of shelteredhousing facilities and any other necessary shelter from the elements mustbe sufficiently large to provide protection comfortably to all the nonhumanprimates housed in the facility at the same time. If aggressive or dominantanimals are housed in the facility with other animals there must be multipleshelters. (f) <T3>Perimeter fence. </T3>The outdoor area of a sheltered housing facilitymust be enclosed by a fence that is at least 6 feet high. The fence mustbe constructed so that it protects nonhuman primates by preventing unauthorizedhumans, and animals the size of dogs, skunks, and raccoons, from goingthrough it or under it and having contact with the nonhuman primates. Itmust be at least 3 feet from the outside wall or fence of the primary enclosure.A perimeter fence is not required if: (1) the outside walls of the primary enclosure are made of a sturdy, durablematerial such as concrete, wood, plastic, metal, or glass, and are highenough and constructed in a manner that prevents contact with or entryby humans and animals that are outside the sheltered housing facility;or (2) the housing facility is surrounded by a natural barrier that restrictsthe nonhuman primates to the housing facility and protects them from contactwith unauthorized humans and animals that are outside the sheltered housingfacility, and the Administrator gives written permission. (g) <T3>Public barriers. </T3>Fixed public exhibits housing nonhuman primates,such as zoos, must have a barrier between the primary enclosure and thepublic at any time the public is present that prevents physical contactbetween the public and the nonhuman primates. Nonhuman primates used intrained animal acts or in uncaged public exhibits must be under the directcontrol and supervision of an experienced handler or trainer at all timeswhen the public is present. Trained nonhuman primates may be permittedphysical contact with the public, as allowed under andSection; 2.131, butonly if they are under the direct control and supervision of an experiencedhandler or trainer at all times during the contact. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 3.78</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Outdoor housing facilities</ITAG>(a) <T3>Acclimation. </T3>Only nonhuman primates that are acclimated to theprevailing temperature and humidity at the outdoor housing facility duringthe time of year they are at the facility, and that can tolerate the rangeof temperatures and climatic conditions known to occur at the facilityat that time of year without stress or discomfort, may be kept in outdoorfacilities.(b) <T3>Shelter from the elements. </T3>Outdoor housing facilities for nonhumanprimates must provide adequate shelter from the elements at all times.It must provide protection from the sun, rain, snow, wind, and cold, andfrom any weather conditions that may occur. The shelter must provide heatto the primates to prevent the ambient temperature from falling below 50anddegrees;F (10 anddegrees;C). (c) <T3>Capacity; multiple shelters. </T3>The shelter must be sufficientlylarge to comfortably provide protection for all the nonhuman primates housedin the facility at the same time. If aggressive or dominant animals arehoused in the facility with other animals there must be multiple shelters.(d) <T3>Perimeter fence. </T3>An outdoor housing facility must be enclosedby a fence that is at least 6 feet high. The fence must be constructedso that it protects nonhuman primates by preventing unauthorized humans,and animals the size of dogs, skunks, and raccons, from going through itor under it and having contact with the nonhuman primates. It must be atleast 3 feet from the outside wall or fence of the primary enclosure. Aperimeter fence is not required if: (1) the outside walls of the primary enclosure are made of a sturdy, durablematerial such as concrete, wood, plastic, metal, or glass, and are highenough and constructed in a manner that prevents contact with or entryby humans and animals that are outside the housing facility; or(2) the housing facility is surrounded by a natural barrier that restrictsthe nonhuman primates to the housing facility and protects them from contactwith unauthorized humans and animals that are outside the housing facility,and the Administrator gives written permission.(e) <T3>Public barriers. </T3>Fixed public exhibits housing nonhuman primates,such as zoos, must have a barrier between the primary enclosure and thepublic at any time the public is present, in order to prevent physicalcontact between the public and the nonhuman primates. Nonhuman primatesused in trained animal acts or in uncaged public exhibits must be underthe direct control and supervision of an experienced handler or trainerat all times when the public is present. Trained nonhuman primates maybe allowed physical contact with the public, but only if they are underthe direct control and supervision of an experienced handler or trainerat all times during the contact.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 3.79</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Mobile or traveling housing facilities.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Heating, cooling, and temperature.</T3> Mobile or traveling housingfacilities must be sufficiently heated and cooled when necessary to protectnonhuman primates from cold and hot temperatures and to provide for theirhealth, comfort and well-being. The ambient temperature in the travelinghousing facility must not fall below 50 anddegrees;F (10 anddegrees;C) andmust not rise above 95 anddegrees;F (35 anddegrees;C) when nonhuman primatesare present. Within this range, the ambient temperature must be maintainedat a level that ensures the health and well-being of the species housed,in accordance with generally accepted professional and husbandry practices.Auxiliary ventilation, such as fans, blowers, or air conditioning, mustbe provided when the ambient temperature in the traveling housing facilityis 85 anddegrees;F (29.5 anddegrees;C) or higher.(b) <T3>Ventilation.</T3> Traveling housing facilities must be sufficientlyventilated at all times when nonhuman primates are present to provide forthe health, comfort, and well-being of nonhuman primates and to minimizeodors, drafts, ammonia levels, moisture condensation, and exhaust fumes.Air, preferably fresh air, must be provided by means of windows, doors,vents, fans, or air conditioning. The relative humidity must be maintainedat a level that ensures the health and well-being of the species housed,in accordance with generally accepted professional and husbandry practices.(c) <T3>Lighting. </T3>Mobile or traveling housing facilities must be lightedwell enough to permit routine inspection and cleaning of the facility,and observation of the nonhuman primates. A regular daily lighting cycleof at least 8 consecutive hours of light and at least 8 consecutive hoursof darkness must be provided, by either natural or artificial light. Ifonly artificial light, such as fluorescent light, is provided, it mustprovide full-spectrum illumination. Primary enclosures must be placed inthe housing facility so as to protect the nonhuman primates from excessivelight.(d) <T3>Public barriers. </T3>There must be a barrier between a mobile or travelinghousing facility and the public at any time the public is present, in orderto prevent physical contact between the nonhuman primates and the public.Nonhuman primates used in traveling exhibits, trained animal acts, or inuncaged public exhibits must be under the direct control and supervisionof an experienced handler or trainer at all times when the public is present.Trained nonhuman primates may be allowed physical contact with the public,but only if they are under the direct control and supervision of an experiencedhandler or trainer at all times during the contact.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 3.80</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Primary enclosures.</ITAG>Primary enclosures for nonhuman primates must meet the following minimumrequirements:(a) <T3>General requirements.</T3> (1) Primary enclosures must be designedand constructed of suitable materials so that they are structurally soundfor the species of nonhuman primates contained in them. They must be keptin good repair.(2) Primary enclosures must be constructed and maintained so that they_(i) Have no sharp points or edges that could injure the nonhuman primates;(ii) Protect the nonhuman primates from injury;(iii) Contain the nonhuman primates securely and prevent accidental openingof the enclosure, including opening by the animal, and unauthorized releaseof the nonhuman primates;(iv) Keep predators and unauthorized individuals from entering the enclosureor having physical contact with the nonhuman primates;(v) Enable the nonhuman primates to remain dry and clean;(vi) Provide shelter and protection from extreme temperatures and weatherconditions that may be uncomfortable or hazardous to the species of nonhumanprimate contained;(vii) Provide sufficient shade to shelter all the nonhuman primates housedin the primary enclosure at one time;(viii) Provide the nonhuman primates with easy and convenient access toclean food and water;(ix) Enable all surfaces in contact with nonhuman primates to be readilycleaned and sanitized in accordance with andSection; 3.84(b)(3), or replacedwhen worn or soiled;(x) Have floors that are constructed in a manner that protects the nonhumanprimates from injuring themselves or from having their appendages caught;and(xi) Provide sufficient space for the nonhuman primates to make normalpostural adjustments with freedom of movement.(b) <T3>Social grouping. </T3>Nonhuman primates must be housed in primary enclosureswith compatible members of the same species or with compatible membersof other nonhuman primate species, in pairs, family groups, or other compatiblesocial groupings, unless the attending veterinarian determines that doingso would endanger the health, safety, and well-being of the nonhuman primates.Compatibility of nonhuman primates must be determined in accordance withgenerally accepted professional practices and actual observation to ensurethat the nonhuman primates are in fact compatible. Individually housednonhuman primates must be able to see and hear nonhuman primates of theirown or compatible species, unless the attending veterinarian determinesthat it would endanger their health, safety, and well-being. If, in accordancewith these regulations, this contact is not provided, the isolated individuallyhoused nonhuman primates must have positive physical contact or other interactionwith their keeper or other familiar and knowledgeable person for at leastone hour each day.(c) <T3>Minimum space and physical environment requirements. Primary enclosuresmust meet the applicable minimum space and physical environment requirementsprovided in this subpart. These minimum space requirements must be meteven if perches, swings, ledges, or other suspended fixtures are placedin the enclosure.</T3>(1) Research facilities; federal research facilities.(i) The minimum space that must be provided to <T3>each </T3>nonhuman primate, whether housed individually or with othernonhuman primates, is determined by the typical weight of animals of itsspecies, except for brachiating species,\2\<NOTE/> in accordance with the following table:\3\<NOTE/><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\ The different species of nonhuman primates are dividedinto seven weight groups for determining minimum space requirements, exceptthat all brachiating species of any weight are grouped together since theyrequire additional space to engage in species-typical behavior. The groupingprovided is based upon the typical weight for various species and not onchanges associated with obesity, aging, or pregnancy. These conditionswill not be considered in determining a nonhuman primate's weight groupunless the animal is obviously unable to make normal postural adjustmentsand movements within the primary enclosure. Different species of prosimiansvary in weight and should be grouped with their appropriate weight group.They have not been included in the weight table since different speciestypically fall into different weight groups. Infants and juveniles of certainspecies are substantially lower in weight than adults of those speciesand require the minimum space requirements of lighter weight species unlessthe animal is obviously unable to make normal postural adjustments andmovements within the primary enclosure.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\3\ The following are examples of the kinds of nonhuman primatestypically included in each group:<ITAG tagnum="28">Group 1_marmosets, tamarins, and infants (up to 6 months of age) ofvarious species.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28">Group 2_capuchins, squirrel monkeys and similar size species, andjuveniles (6 months to 3 years of age) of various species.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28">Group 3_macaques and African species.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28">Group 4_male macaques and large African species.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28">Group 5_baboons and nonbrachiating species larger than 33.0 lbs. (15kg.).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28">Group 6_great apes up to 88.0 lbs. (40 kg.) and brachiating species.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28">Group 7_great apes andgreater;88.0 lbs. (40 kg.).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>7,L2,tp0,i1,s10,25,25,25,25,25,25</C> <H1>Group </H1><H1>Weight </H1><H2>lbs. </H2><H2>(kg.) </H2><H1>Floor Area/Animal </H1><H2>ft.\2\ </H2><H2>(m\2\) </H2><H1>Height </H1><H2>in. </H2><H2>(cm.)</H2><ITAG tagnum="1">1 <D>2.2 </D><D>(1) </D><D>1.6 </D><D>(0.15) </D><D>20 </D><D>(50.8) </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2 <D>2.2-6.6 </D><D>(1-3) </D><D>3.0 </D><D>(0.28) </D><D>30 </D><D>(76.2) </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3 <D>6.6-20.0 </D><D>(3-10) </D><D>4.3 </D><D>(0.40) </D><D>30 </D><D>(76.2) </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4 <D>20.0-33.0 </D><D>(10-15) </D><D>6.0 </D><D>(0.56) </D><D>32 </D><D>(81.28) </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5 <D>33.0-55.0 </D><D>(15-25) </D><D>8.0 </D><D>(0.74) </D><D>36 </D><D>(91.44) </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">6 <D>55.0-88.0 </D><D>(25-40) </D><D>25.1 </D><D>(2.33) </D><D>84 </D><D>(213.36) </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7 <D/>andgreater;88.0 <D>(</D>andgreater;40) <D>50.0 </D><D>(4.65) </D><D>84 </D><D>(213.36)</D></ITAG></ITAG> (ii) Primary enclosures not precisely meeting the floor area and heightrequirements provided in paragraph (c)(1)(i) of this section but that doprovide nonhuman primates with a sufficient volume of space and the opportunityto express species-typical behavior, such as primate pole housing, maybe used with written permission from the Administrator. An applicationfor permission must demonstrate in written and photographic detail whythe primary enclosure should be allowed. Nonhuman primates housed in thesetypes of primary enclosures that are also designed and constructed in amanner that provides for their psychological well-being by allowing exerciseand social interaction may be excused from the release period requiredin andSection; 3.81(a)(3) if it is sufficiently justified in the application.The Administrator may deny the application if he or she determines thatgranting it will be detrimental to the health and psychological well-beingof the nonhuman primates to be housed in the primary enclosure. The Administratorwill advise the research facility of his or her decision in writing.(iii) Environmental enrichments must be provided in accordance with andSection;3.81.(2) <T3>Dealers. </T3>(i) Individual nonhuman primates that are not part ofan established pair, family, or other social group may be housed individuallyif the attending veterinarian determines that it is necessary for theirhealth, safety, and well-being. Except as provided in paragraph (c)(2)(v)of this section, the minimum space that must be provided to each nonhumanprimate housed individually is twice the minimum floor area and twice theminimum height (up to a maximum height of 84 inches) that research facilitiesare required to provide in accordance with paragraph (c)(1) of this section.(ii) Except when nonhuman primates must be individually housed for thepurposes set forth in paragraph (c)(2)(v) of this section, establishedpairs, families, or other social groups of nonhuman primates must be maintainedtogether in a primary enclosure. Primary enclosures used to house nonhumanprimates in pairs, families, and other social groups must satisfy the minimumspace requirements provided in paragraph (c)(1) of this section, in accordancewith the requirements of paragraph (d) of this section for housing morethan 1 nonhuman primate in a primary enclosure.(iii) Dealers must enrich the environment in primary enclosures to promotethe psychological well-being of nonhuman primates. This can be done by,among other things:(A) Providing items such as perches, swings, mirrors, or other cage complexitiesthat enable nonhuman primates to engage in activities typical of theirage and species;(B) Providing playthings and manipulative objects; and(C) Using foraging or task-oriented feeding methods.(iv) Multiple enrichments of the environment must be provided for eachanimal housed in a primary enclosure. The nature of the enrichments providedmust be appropriate for the species of nonhuman primates housed in theenclosure.(v) Dealers may meet the minimum space requirements required of researchfacilities in paragraph (c)(1) of this section, instead of the space requirementsprovided in paragraph (c)(2)(i) of this section, in the following instances:(A) When holding a nonhuman primate for required federal, state, or localquarantine periods;(B) When a nonhuman primate is receiving veterinary care as directed bythe attending veterinarian; or(C) While transporting a nonhuman primate to or from an auction sale andwhile holding it at the sale.(3) <T3>Exhibitors.</T3> Nonhuman primates are grouped by species into thefollowing 7 groups for purposes of determining the minimum space and environmentrequirements that exhibitors must provides:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L1,tp0,s20,r70,r70</C> <H1>Nonhuman Primate Group </H1><H1>Type </H1><H1>Example</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">1<D>Prosimian Primates</D><D>Tarsiers, Galagos, Pottos, Lorises, Lemurs, Mouse Lemurs Avahis, Indris,Sifakas, and Aye-ayes</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2<D>Marmosets and Tamarins</D><D>Marmosets, Tamarins, and Callimico</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3<D>Other New World Monkeys</D><D>Howler Monkeys, Owl Monkeys, Spider Monkeys, Woolly Spider Monkeys,Uakaris, Titi Monkeys, Capuchins, Saki Monkeys, Woolly Monkeys, and SquirrelMonkeys</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4<D>Langurs and Colobines</D><D>Proboscis Monkey, Langur, Colobus Monkey</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5<D>Other Old World Monkeys</D><D>Baboons, Drills, Mandrills, Macaques, Guenons, Mangabeys, Talapoins,Patas Monkeys and Swamp Monkeys</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">6<D>Lesser Apes</D><D>Gibbons and Siamang</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7<D>Great Apes</D><D>Orangutans, Chimpanzees, Gorillas</D></ITAG></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">The minimum space and environmental enrichments that must be providedto each grouping of nonhuman primates housed in a primary enclosure mustbe appropriate for the species housed, as provided in this paragraph, andin accordance with the following chart:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/> <H1>Nonhuman Primate Group</H1><H1>Species/Type</H1><H1>Minimum No. Primates Per Enclosure</H1><H1>Minimum Primary Enclosure Size (Length, Width, Height)</H1><H1>Shelter Dens/Nest Boxes</H1><H1>Enclosure Furnishings or Equipment</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Prosimians<D>Tarsiers</D><D>Pair</D><D>1m L andmultiply; 1m W andmultiply; 2m H (3.28ft) andmultiply; (3.28ft) andmultiply;(6.56ft)</D><D>12.7cm L andmultiply; 12.7 cm W andmultiply; 12.7cm H (5.0in) andmultiply;(5.0in) andmultiply; (5.0in) for each adult in upper half of exhibit</D><D>1, 2, 3</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>Loris andamp; Galago: Smaller species</D><D>Pair or family group</D><D>1.5cm L andmultiply; 1.5cm W andmultiply; 1.5cm H (4.92ft) andmultiply; (4.92ft)andmultiply; (4.92ft)</D><D>12.7cm L andmultiply; 12.7cm W andmultiply; 12.7cm H (5in) andmultiply; (5in)andmultiply; (5in) for each adult in upper half of exhibit</D><D>1, 3</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>Larger species</D><D/><D>3m L andmultiply; 3m W andmultiply; 3m H (9.84ft) andmultiply; (9.84ft) andmultiply;(9.84ft)</D><D>76.2cm L andmultiply; 47.2cm W andmultiply; 47.7cm H (30in) andmultiply; (18.6in)andmultiply; (18.8in).</D><D/><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>Lemurs</D><D>Pair</D><D>1.52m L andmultiply; 1.52m W andmultiply; 1.83m H (4.98ft) andmultiply; (4.98ft)andmultiply; (6.0ft)</D><D>0.46m L andmultiply; 0.46m W andmultiply; 0.46m H (1.5ft) andmultiply; (1.5ft)andmultiply; (1.5ft) for each adult and in upper half of exhibit</D><D>1, 2</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>Mouse Lemurs</D><D>Pair</D><D>1.22m L andmultiply; 1.22m W andmultiply; 1.22m H</D><D>10.,16cm L andmultiply; 10.16cm W andmultiply; 10.16cm H</D><D>1</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D/><D/><D>(4.0ft) andmultiply; (4.0ft) andmultiply; (4.0ft)</D><D>(4.0in) andmultiply; (4.0in) andmultiply; (4.0in) for each adult and inupper half of exhibit</D><D/><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>Indris</D><D>Pair or family group</D><D>5m L andmultiply; 5m W andmultiply; 5m H</D><D>One shelter for all.</D><D>1, 2, 4</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>Avahis</D><D/><D>(167.4ft) andmultiply; (16.4ft) andmultiply; (16.4ft)</D><D/><D/><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>Sifakas</D><D/><D/><D/><D/><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>Aye-Ayes</D><D>Pair</D><D>4m L andmultiply; 3m W andmultiply; 3m H</D><D>76.2cm L andmultiply; 47.7cm W andmultiply; 47.7cm H</D><D>4, 7</D><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D/><D/><D>(13.12ft) andmultiply; (9.8ft) andmultiply; (9.8ft)</D><D>(2.5ft) andmultiply; (1.5ft) andmultiply; (1.5ft) for each adult and inupper half of exhibit</D><D/><ITAG tagnum="1">Marmosets<D>Smallerandless; 500g</D><D>Pair</D><D>0.91m L andmultiply; 0.91m W andmultiply; 1.83m H</D><D>One shelter for all.</D><D>1, 2, 5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Tamarins<D/><D/><D>(3ft) andmultiply; (3ft) andmultiply; (6ft)</D><D/><T3>Note: </T3>Minimum temperature of 70anddegrees;F.<D/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Callimico<D>Largerandgreater; 500g</D><D/><D>1.22m L andmultiply; 2.44m W andmultiply; 2.44m H</D><D/><D/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D/><D/><D>(4ft) andmultiply; (8ft) andmultiply; (8ft)</D><D/><D/><ITAG tagnum="1">Other New World Monkeys<D>Titis, Owl, andamp; Squirrel</D><D>Pair</D><D>2m L andmultiply; 2m W andmultiply; 2m H (6.56ft) andmultiply; (6.56ft) andmultiply;(6.56ft)</D><D>One shelter for all.</D><D>1, 2, 5, 6</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D/><D>Up to 6</D><D>2.5m L andmultiply; 2.5m W andmultiply; 2.5m H (8.2ft) andmultiply; (8.2ft)andmultiply; (8.2ft)</D><D/><T3>Note: </T3>Sakis, Titis, andamp; Owls are Monogamous.<D/><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>Capuchin</D><D>Pair</D><D>2.5m L andmultiply; 2m W andmultiply; 2m H</D><D/><D/><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>Ukaris</D><D/><D>(8.2ft) andmultiply; (8.2ft) andmultiply; (8.2ft)</D><D/><D/><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>Sakis</D><D>Up to 5</D><D>4m L andmultiply; 2.5m W andmultiply; 2.5m H (13.12ft) andmultiply; (8.2ft)andmultiply; (8.2ft)</D><D/><D/><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>Howler</D><D>Pair</D><D>3m L andmultiply; 3m andmultiply; 3m H</D><D/><D/><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>Wooly</D><D/><D>(9.84ft) andmultiply; (9.84ft) andmultiply; (9.84ft)</D><D/><D/><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>Spider</D><D>Over 2 </D><D>3.5m L andmultiply; 3.5m W andmultiply; 3.5m H (11.5ft) andmultiply; (11.5ft)andmultiply; (11.5f)</D><D/><D/><ITAG tagnum="1">Langurs, Colobines<D>Proboscis, Langur, Colobus</D><D>Pair or family group</D><D>Width, length, and height are to be at least 3 times the length fromtip of nose to tip of tail for the largest animal</D><D>Two boxes, each one at least 1\1/2\ times the length from tip of noseto tip of tail. </D><T3>Note: </T3>Temperature range should be 70-85anddegrees;F.<D>1, 2, 6</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Other Old Monkeys (Cercopithecids)<D>Baboons, Drills, Mandrills, Macaques Guenons, Mangabeys, Talapoins,Patas andamp; Swamp Monkeys</D><D>Pair or family group</D><D>Area=54 times the head and body length of the largest adult. Height=8ftminimum (2.44m)</D><D>Sufficient shelter for all.</D><D>1, 2, 3, 7</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Lesser Apes<D>Gibbons</D><D>Pair</D><D>4.27m L andmultiply; 4.27m W andmultiply; 3.05m H (14ft) andmultiply; (14ft)andmultiply; (10ft)</D><D>One shelter for all.</D><D>1, 2, 8</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>Siamangs</D><D/><D>4.27m L andmultiply; 5.48m W andmultiply; 3.05m H (14ft andmultiply; (18ft)andmultiply; (10ft)</D><D/><T3>Note: </T3>These species are arboreal brachiators, are monogamous,and are strongly territorial.<D/><ITAG tagnum="1">Greater Apes <D>Pygmy Chimpanzees</D><D>Pair</D><D>4.27m L andmultiply; 4.27m W andmultiply; 3.05m H (14ft) andmultiply; (14ft)andmultiply; (10ft)</D><D>Shelter for all by individual or group.</D><D>7, 9, 10, 11</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>Chimpanzee</D><D>One</D><D>4.27m L andmultiply;4.27m W andmultiply; 3.05m H </D><D/><D/><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>Gorilla</D><D/><D>(14ft) andmultiply; (14ft) andmultiply; (10ft)</D><D/><D/><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>Orangutan</D><D>Pair</D><D>8.54m L andmultiply; 8.54m W andmultiply; 3.05m H (28ft) andmultiply; (28ft)andmultiply; (10ft) Space should be divided into separate areas or shiftcages be available</D><D/><D/><F>1. Vertical and horizontal branches/poles of suitable size for the species.</F><F>2. Elevated perches/resting shelves of sufficient size to hold all primates.</F><F>3. Elevated pathways of tree branches/poles/or other material suitablefor the species.</F><F>4. Multidirectional pathways of branches/poles/or other material ofsuitable size for the species.</F><F>5. Elevated feed and water stations.</F><F>6. Visual barriers.</F><F>7. Nontoxic hay/straw/leaves/branches/browse for foraging or nesting.</F><F>8. Three to four horizontal branches/poles about 2 feet apart throughoutexhibit at heights that are greater than the body length of the animalwhen arms and legs are fully extended.</F><F>9. Climbing structures and elevated platforms at least 1 meter (3.28ft)apart and at varying heights.</F><F>10. Ropes anchored at each end which are taut enought to prevent beingwrapped around an arm or leg.</F><F>11. Objects to manipulate such as tires, plastic drums, or ``boomer''balls.</F></ITAG>(4) <T3>Mobile or traveling animal act exhibitors</T3>. (i) Primary enclosuresused to house nonhuman primates that participate daily in acts, shows,or training periods outside of their enclosure must satisfy the minimumspace requirements provided in paragraph (c)(1) of this section for researchfacilities. No enhancements of the primary enclosure environment are required.(ii) Primary enclosures used to house up to 3 nonhuman primates that arepermanently contained in their primary enclosure must provide at leastthree times the floor space and twice the minimum height (up to a maximumheight of 84 inches) required in paragraph (c)(1) of this section for researchfacilities. The minimum space provided must be increased in accordancewith paragraph (d) of this section for each additional 1-3 nonhuman primateshoused together in the primary enclosure. The environment in the primaryenclosure must be enriched to promote the psychological well-being of thenonhuman primates in a manner that allows them to engage in activitiesthat are typical for their age and species. The environment must be enrichedby providing items such as perches, swings, mirrors, or other increasedcage complexities; providing playthings or manipulative objects; and byusing foraging or task-oriented feeding methods.(d) Except for nonhuman primates housed by exhibitors in accordance withparagraphs (c)(3), and as provided in paragraphs (c)(2)(ii) [dealers] and(c)(4)(ii) [mobile or traveling animal act exhibitor] of this section,when more than one nonhuman primate is housed in a primary enclosure, theminimum space requirement for the enclosure is the sum of the minimum floorarea space requirements that must be provided for <T3>each</T3> nonhuman primate housed in the enclosure and double the minimumheight requirement for the largest nonhuman primate housed in the enclosure(up to a maximum height of 84 inches).\4\<NOTE/><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\4\ An example of how to determine the minimum space thatmust be provided for two nonhuman primates housed together in one primaryenclosure would be: Assume a squirrel monkey (Group 2 of paragraph (1))is housed with a baboon (Group 5 of paragraph (1)). The minimum floor arearequired would be the Group 2 minimum floor area (3.0 sq. ft.) plus theGroup 5 minimum floor area (8.0 sq. ft.), or 11 square feet. The minimumheight required would be double the Group 5 minimum height (36 in. ht.andmultiply; 2_72 in. ht.), since the minimum height required for the largestnonhuman primate housed in the enclosure is doubled.<ITAG tagnum="28">Assume a second squirrel monkey is added to the same primary enclosure.An additional Group 2 minimum floor area (3.0 sq. ft.) would be added todetermine the total minimum floor area space requirement for that primaryenclosure. (11 sq. ft. + 3 sq. ft._14 sq. ft.) The minimum height wouldnot be increased.</ITAG>(e) <T3>Variance from minimum space requirements</T3>._(1) <T3>Definition</T3>. For the purposes of this subpart, ``variance'' meansthe written permission from the Administrator that is required to operateas a licensee or registrant under the Animal Welfare Act without fullycomplying with the minimum space requirements provided in this subpart.A variance may be limited in scope both as to time and to the primary enclosurescovered by it, and will specify the portions of a registrant's or licensee'sfacilities covered by the variance.(2) <T3>Who may apply; eligibility</T3>. Registrants and licensees that maintainor handle nonhuman primates, or that have nonhuman primates on the premisesor under their control or supervision, and that do not comply with oneor more of the minimum space requirements provided in this subpart mayapply to the Administrator for a variance. Any housing facilities underconstruction or in the design and preliminary construction stages on theeffective date of these regulations must comply with these standards andare not eligible for a variance, unless the registrant or licensee demonstratesto the Administrator that construction is so nearly complete that a varianceis necessary for the registrant or licensee to fully comply with the minimumspace requirements.(3) <T3>When to apply</T3>. Eligible registrants and licensees requiring avariance in accordance with paragraph (e)(2) must apply to the Administratorwithin 60 days of the effective date of these regulations.(4) <T3>Application</T3>. An application for a variance must be in writingand must list in detail each of the minimum space requirements that cannotbe complied with, the amount of time necessary for the applicant to comeinto compliance with the minimum space requirements, the specific reasonswhy the variance is being requested, the species and number of nonhumanprimates that will be affected by the variance, and the estimated costof compliance. A statement from the attending veterinarian concerning theage and health status of the nonhuman primates affected by the varianceand addressing whether the granting of a variance would be detrimentalto the affected nonhuman primates must accompany the application. The Administratormay grant the application if he or she determines that it is justifiedor deny it if he or she determines that it is not justified under the circumstances,or that granting it would be detrimental to the health and psychologicalwell-being of the nonhuman primates affected by the variance. The grantor denial will be in writing. The Administrator may require a report tobe submitted by an outside expert to help determine whether a variancewould be detrimental to the health and psychological well-being of thenonhuman primates affected. The cost of the report must be paid by theapplicant. The applicant may request that the Administrator reconsiderhis or her decision to deny an application by writing to the Administratorwithin ten (10) days after the applicant has received the denial. The applicantmust explain, in writing, why he or she believes the variance should havebeen granted. The Administrator will notify the applicant in writing ofthe final decision as promptly as circumstances allow.(5) <T3>Duration and extension</T3>. An initial variance may be granted, atthe sole discretion of the Administrator, for the period of time the Administratordetermines is necessary for the applicant to comply with the minimum spacerequirements, based upon the facts presented in the application, up toa maximum time of 2 years. The Administrator may grant a single extensionof up to 1 year upon written request, if the Administrator determines thatit is justified due to unforeseen situations that prevent the registrantor licensee from fully complying during the initial variance period. Awritten request for an extension must be received by the Administratorat least 60 days before the expiration date of the initial variance. Nomore than 1 extension will be granted. The grant or denial of an applicationfor an extension will be in writing. The applicant may request that theAdministrator reconsider his or her decision to deny an application forextension by writing to the Administrator within ten (10) days after theapplicant has received the denial. The applicant must explain, in writing,why he or she believes the extension should have been granted. The Administratorwill notify the applicant in writing of the final decision as promptlyas circumstances allow. Until a final determination is made, the extensionwill not be in effect. If the extension is granted on reconsideration,it will be retroactive to the termination date of the initial variance.(6) <T3>Revocation</T3>. A variance may be revoked by the Administrator atany time if he or she determines that it was obtained in bad faith, thatthe purpose for which the variance was granted is not being carried out,or that it is detrimental to the health and psychological well-being ofthe nonhuman primates affected. Revocation of a variance will be in writingand effective upon receipt.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 3.81 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Additional requirements for research facilities</ITAG>(a) Research facilities, including federal research facilities, must complywith the following requirements in order to promote the psychological well-beingof nonhuman primates:(1) The physical environment in primary enclosures must be enriched byproviding means of expressing species-typical activities. Examples of environmentalenrichments include providing perches, swings, mirrors, and other increasedcage complexities; providing toys or objects to manipulate; and using foragingor task-oriented feeding methods.(2) Nonhuman primates must be housed in social groupings in accordancewith andSection; 3.80(b).(3) An individually housed nonhuman primate must be released for a minimumof four hours of exercise and social interaction per week into an areathat is at least three times the area and twice the height (up to a maximumheight of 84 inches) required for that species in andSection; 3.80(c)(1).Individually housed nonhuman primates may be placed with compatible speciesfor their exercise periods. Nonhuman primates that are not housed individuallyand those that are housed individually in a primary enclosure that providesat least twice the volume required for that species in andSection; 3.80(c)(1)do not have to be released for an exercise period.(4) Research facilities must consult with the attending veterinarian withregard to the following individually housed nonhuman primates and mustprovide additional environmental enrichments, exercise, and social interaction,in accordance with the instructions of the attending veterinarian:(i) Infants and juveniles;(ii) Adults used in research for which the animal care and use proceduredoes not provide much activity;(iii) Those that show signs of being in psychological distress throughbehavior or appearance.(b) Primate chairs. Nonhuman primates must not be placed in chairs unlessit is required by an animal care and use procedure and the Committee approvesof it for a particular animal. If the use of chairs is approved for a nonhumanprimate, it must be released daily for exercise for at least one continuoushour during the period it is placed in a chair, unless continuous restraintin a chair is required by an animal care and use procedure and approvedby the Committee. If continuous restraint is approved for a nonhuman primateit must be released for exercise for at least one hour before it is restrainedand for at least one hour after the period of restraint.(c) Records. Documentation of the release of each nonhuman primate forexercise and social interaction and of additional environmental enrichmentsthat must be provided under paragraph (a)(4) of this section must be keptby the attending veterinarian and is subject to APHIS inspection, and inthe case of federal research facilities, to inspection by officials ofany federal funding agency.(d) Exemptions. The attending veterinarian may exempt a particular nonhumanprimate from the exercise and social release period required for it underparagraphs (a)(3) and (b) of this section, or restrict its participationin the period, if he or she determines that it is necessary to do so forits health, condition, or psychological well-being due to the physicalor psychological condition of the animal. The exemption or restrictionmust be recorded by the attending veterinarian and the documentation issubject to APHIS inspection, and in the case of federal research facilities,to inspection by officials of any federal funding agency. The attendingveterinarian must review the grant of exemption or restriction and observethe animal at least every 30 days to determine whether it is still necessary.All exemptions and restrictions must be included in the Annual Report ofthe research facility.<ITAG tagnum="84">Animal Health and Husbandry Standards</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 3.82 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Feeding.</ITAG>(a) The diet for nonhuman primates must be appropriate for the species,size, age, and condition of the animal, and for the conditions in whichthe nonhuman primate is maintained, according to generally accepted professionaland husbandry practices and nutritional standards. The diet must consistof varied food items. The food must be clean, uncontaminated, wholesome,and palatable to the animals. It must be of sufficient quantity and havesufficient nutritive value to maintain the normal condition and weightof the animal and to meet its normal daily nutrition and vitamin requirements.(b) The method of feeding nonhuman primates must be varied daily in orderto promote their psychological well-being, such as by using task-orientedfeeding and allowing them to forage for food.(c) Nonhuman primates must be fed at least once each day except as otherwisemight be required to provide adequate veterinary care. Infant and juvenilenonhuman primates must be fed as often as necessary in accordance withgenerally accepted professional and husbandry practices and nutritionalstandards, based upon the animals' age and condition.(d) Food and food receptacles, if used, must be readily accessible to allthe nonhuman primates being fed. If members of dominant nonhuman primateor other species are fed together with other nonhuman primates, multiplefeeding sites must be provided. The animals must be observed to determinethat all receive a sufficient quantity of food.(e) Food and food receptacles, if used, must be located so as to minimizeany risk of contamination by excreta and pests. Food receptacles must bekept clean and must be sanitized in accordance with the procedures listedin andSection; 3.84(b)(3) of this subpart at least once every 2 weeks. Usedfood receptacles must be sanitized before they can be used to provide foodto a different nonhuman primate or social grouping of nonhuman primates.Measures must be taken to ensure there is no molding, deterioration, contamination,and caking or wetting of food placed in self-feeders.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 3.83 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Watering.</ITAG>Potable water must be provided in sufficient quantity to every nonhumanprimate housed at the facility. If potable water is not continually availableto the nonhuman primates, it must be offered to them at least twice dailyfor periods of not less than 1 hour each time, unless the attending veterinarianrequires otherwise in order to provide adequate veterinary care to theanimal. Water receptacles must be kept clean and free of waste of any kind,and must be sanitized in accordance with the methods provided in andSection;3.84(b)(3) of this subpart at least once every 2 weeks. Used water receptaclesmust be sanitized before they can be used to provide water to a differentnonhuman primate or social grouping of nonhuman primates.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 3.84 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Cleaning, sanitization, housekeeping, and pest control.</ITAG>(a) Cleaning of primary enclosures. Excreta and food waste must be removedat least daily from inside each primary enclosure and from underneath it,and more frequently if necessary, to prevent accumulation of feces andfood waste, to prevent the nonhuman primates from becoming soiled, andto reduce disease hazards, insects, pests, and odors. When a steam, hosing,flushing, or other method involving water is used to clean the primaryenclosures, nonhuman primates must be removed during the cleaning to preventthem from being involuntarily wetted or injured. Pans underneath primaryenclosures with grill-type floors must also be cleaned at least daily,and as often as necessary to prevent accumulation of feces and food waste,and to reduce disease hazards, pests, insects, and odors. Primary enclosureswith hard surfaces must be cleaned every day. Dirt floors and planted areasin primary enclosures must be raked and spot cleaned every day. Perches,bars, and shelves must be kept clean and replaced when worn. If the speciesof nonhuman primates housed in the primary enclosure engages in scent marking,the primary enclosure must be spot cleaned daily.(b) Sanitization of primary enclosures and food and water receptacles.(1) A used primary enclosure must be sanitized in accordance with thissection before it can be used to house another nonhuman primate.(2) Primary enclosures must be sanitized at least once every 2 weeks andas often as necessary to prevent any accumulation of dirt, debris, waste,food waste, excreta, or disease hazard, using one of the methods prescribedin paragraph (b)(3) of this section. However, if the species of nonhumanprimates housed in the primary enclosure engages in scent marking, theprimary enclosure must be sanitized at regular intervals determined inaccordance with generally accepted professional and husbandry practices.(3) Hard surfaces of primary enclosures and food and water receptaclesmust be sanitized using one of the following methods:(i) Live steam under pressure;(ii) Washing with hot water (at least 180 anddegrees;F (82.2 anddegrees;C))and soap or detergent, such as in a mechanical cage washer; or (iii) Washing all soiled surfaces with a detergent solution to remove allorganic material and mineral buildup, followed by a safe and effectivedisinfectant rinse, and then a clean water rinse. (4) Primary enclosures containing material that cannot be sanitized usingthe methods provided in paragraph (b)(3) of this section, such as sand,gravel, dirt, grass, or planted areas, must be sanitized by removing thecontaminated materials necessary to prevent odors, diseases, pest, insects,and vermin infestation.(c) Housekeeping for premises. Premises where housing facilities are located,including buildings and surrounding grounds, must be kept clean and ingood repair in order to protect the nonhuman primates from injury, to facilitatethe husbandry practices required in this subpart, and to reduce or eliminatebreeding and living areas for rodents, pests, and vermin. Premises mustbe kept free of accumulations of trash, junk, waste, and discarded matter.Weeds, grass, and bushes must be controlled so as to facilitate cleaningof the premises and pest control. (d) Pest control. An effective program for control of insects, externalparasites affecting nonhuman primates, and birds and mammals that are pests,must be established and maintained so as to promote the health and well-beingof the animals and reduce contamination by pests in animal areas. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 3.85</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Employees.</ITAG>Every person subject to the Animal Welfare regulations maintaining nonhumanprimates must have enough employees to carry out the level of husbandrypractices and care required in this subpart. The employees who providehusbandry practices and care, or handle animals, must be supervised byan animal caretaker who has the knowledge, background, and experience inproper husbandry and care of nonhuman primates to supervise others. Theemployer must be certain that the supervisor can perform to these standards.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 3.86</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Social grouping and separation. </ITAG>(a) Nonhuman primates housed in the same primary enclosure must be groupedwith compatible members of the same or other nonhuman primate species,or with other compatible animal species, with the following restrictions:(1) If a nonhuman primate exhibits vicious or overly aggressive behaviorit must be housed separately;(2) Nonhuman primates under quarantine or treatment for a communicabledisease must be housed separately from other nonhuman primates and susceptiblespecies of animals to minimize the risk of spread of the disease; and (3) Nonhuman primates may not be housed with other species of primatesor animals unless they are compatible, do not compete for food and shelter,and are not hazardous to the health and well-being of each other; (b) Families must be housed together and compatible groups must remainconstant. <ITAG tagnum="84">Transportation Standards </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 3.87</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Consignments to carriers and intermediate handlers.</ITAG>(a) Carriers and intermediate handlers must not accept a nonhuman primatefor transport in commerce more than 4 hours before the scheduled departuretime of the primary conveyance on which the animal is to be transported.However, a carrier or intermediate handler may agree with anyone consigninga nonhuman primate to extend this time by up to 2 hours. (b) Carriers and intermediate handlers must not accept a nonhuman primatefor transport in commerce unless they are provided with the name, address,phone number, and telex number, if applicable, of the consignee.(c) Carriers and intermediate handlers must not accept a nonhuman primatefor transport in commerce unless written instructions concerning in transitfood and water requirements for each nonhuman primate in the shipment aresecurely attached to the outside of its primary enclosure in a manner thatmakes them easily noticed and read.(d) Carriers and intermediate handlers must not accept a nonhuman primatefor transport in commerce unless the consignor certifies in writing tothe carrier or intermediate handler that the nonhuman primate was offeredfood during the 12 hours and water during the 4 hours before delivery tothe carrier or intermediate handler, and specifies the date and time thenonhuman primate was last offered food and water. A copy of the certificationmust accompany the nonhuman primate to its destination and must includethe following information for each nonhuman primate:(1) The consignor's name and address;(2) The species of nonhuman primate;(3) A statement by the consignor certifying that each nonhuman primatecontinued in the primary enclosure was offered food during the 12 hoursand water during the 4 hours before delivery to the carrier or intermediatehandler, and the date and time food and water was last offered; and(4) The consignor's signature and the date and time the certification wassigned.(e) Carriers and intermediate handlers must not accept a nonhuman primatefor transport in commerce unless the primary enclosure meets the requirementsof andSection; 3.88 of this subpart, or the consignor certifies in writingto the carrier or intermediate handler that the primary enclosure meetsthe requirements of andSection; 3.88 of this subpart. Even if the consignorprovides this certification, a carrier or intermediate handler must notaccept a nonhuman primate for transport if the primary enclosure is obviouslydefective or damaged and cannot reasonably be expected to safely and comfortablycontain the nonhuman primate without suffering or injury. A copy of thecertification must accompany the nonhuman primate to its destination andmust include the following information for each primary enclosure:(1) The consignor's name and address;(2) The number of nonhuman primates contained in the primary enclosure;(3) The species of nonhuman primate contained in the primary enclosure;(4) A statement by the consignor certifying that each primary enclosurein the shipment meets the USDA standards for primary enclosures containedin andSection; 3.88 of this subpart; and(5) The consignor's signature and the date the certification was signed.(f) Carriers and intermediate handlers must not accept a nonhuman primatefor transport in commerce unless their holding area and cargo facilitiesmeet the minimum temperature requirements provided in andSection;andSection;3.91 and 3.92 of this subpart, or unless the consignor provides them witha certificate signed by a veterinarian and dated no more than 10 days beforedelivery of the animal to the carrier or intermediate handler for transportin commerce, certifying that the animal is acclimated to temperatures lowerthan those required in andSection;andSection; 3.91 and 3.92 of this subpart.Even if the carrier or intermediate handler receives this certification,the temperatures the nonhuman primate is exposed to while in the carrier'sor intermediate handler's custody must not be lower than the minimum temperaturespecified by the veterinarian in accordance with paragraph (f)(3) of thissection, and must be reasonably within the generally and professionallyaccepted temperature range for the nonhuman primate, as determined by theveterinarian, considering its age, condition, and species. A copy of thecertification must accompany the nonhuman primate to its destination andmust include the following information for each primary enclosure:(1) The consignor's name and address;(2) The number of nonhuman primates contained in the primary enclosure;(3) The species of nonhuman primate contained in the primary enclosure;(4) A statement by a veterinarian that to the best of his or her knowledge,each of the nonhuman primates contained in the primary enclosure is acclimatedto air temperatures lower than 45 anddegrees;F (7.2 anddegrees;C), but notlower than a minimum temperature specified on the certificate based onthe generally and professionally accepted temperature range for the nonhumanprimate considering its age, condition, and species; and(5) The veterinarian's signature and the date the certification was signed.(g) When a primary enclosure containing a nonhuman primate has arrivedat the animal holding area of a terminal facility after transport, thecarrier or intermediate handler must attempt to notify the consignee uponarrival and at least once in every 6-hour period after arrival. The time,date, and method of each attempted notification and the actual notificationof the consignee, and the name of the person who notifies or attempts tonotify the consignee must be written on the carrier's or intermediate handler'scopy of the shipping document and on the copy that accompanies the primaryenclosure. If the consignee cannot be notified within 24 hours after thenonhuman primate has arrived at the terminal facility, the carrier or intermediatehandler must return the animal to the consignor or to whomever the consignerdesignates. If the consignee is notified of the arrival and does not takephysical delivery of the nonhuman primate within 48 hours after arrivalof the nonhuman primate, the carrier or intermediate handler must returnthe animal to the consignor or to whomever the consignor designates. Thecarrier or intermediate handler must continue to provide proper care, feeding,and housing to the nonhuman primate, and maintain the nonhuman primatein accordance with generally accepted professional and husbandry practicesuntil the consignee accepts delivery of the nonhuman primate or until itis returned to the consignor or to whomever the consignor designates. Thecarrier or intermediate handler must obligate the consignor to reimbursethe carrier or intermediate handler for the cost of return transportationand care.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 3.88</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Primary enclosures used to transport nonhuman primates.</ITAG>Any person subject to the Animal Welfare regulations must not transportor deliver for transport in commerce a nonhuman primate unless it is containedin a primary enclosure, such as a compartment, transport cage, carton,or crate, and the following requirements are met:(a) <T3>Construction of primary enclosures. </T3>Primary enclosures used totransport nonhuman primates may be connected or attached to each otherand must be constructed so that:(1) The primary enclosure is strong enough to contain the nonhuman primatesecurely and comfortably and to withstand the normal rigors of transportation;(2) The interior of the enclosure has no sharp points or edges and no protrusionsthat could injure the animal contained in it;(3) The nonhuman primate is at all times securely contained within theenclosure and cannot put any part of its body outside the enclosure ina way that could result in injury to the animal, to handlers, or to personsor animals nearby;(4) The nonhuman primate can be easily and quickly removed from the enclosurein an emergency;(5) The doors or other closures that provide access into the enclosureare secured with animal-proof devices that prevent accidental opening ofthe enclosure, including opening by the nonhuman primate;(6) Unless the enclosure is permanently affixed to the conveyance, adequatedevices such as handles or handholds are provided on its exterior, andenable the enclosure to be lifted without tilting it, and ensure that anyonehandling the enclosure will not come into physical contact with the animalcontained inside;(7) Any material, treatment, paint, preservative, or other chemical usedin or on the enclosure is nontoxic to the animal and not harmful to thehealth or well-being of the animal;(8) Proper ventilation is provide to the nonhuman primate in accordancewith paragraph (c) of this section;(9) Ventilation openings are covered with bars, wire mesh, or smooth expandedmethal having air spaces; and(10) The primary enclosure has a solid, leak-proof bottom, or a removable,leak-proof collection tray under a slatted or wire mesh floor that preventsseepage of waste products, such as excreta and body fluids, outside ofthe enclosure. If a slatted or wire mesh floor is used in the enclosure,it must be designed and constructed so that the animal cannot put any partof its body between the slats or through the holes in the mesh. It mustcontain enough previously unused litter to absorbe and cover excreta. Thelitter must be of a suitably absorbent material that is safe and nontoxicto the nonhumane primate and is appropriate for the species transportedin the primary enclosure. (b) <T3>Cleaning of primary enclosures</T3>. A primary enclosure used to holdor transport nonhuman primates in commerce must be cleaned and sanitizedbefore each use in accordance with the methods provided in andSection; 3.84(b)(3)of this subpart.(c) <T3>Ventilation</T3>. (1) If the primary enclosure is moveable, ventilationopenings must be constructed in one of the following ways:(i) If ventilation openings are located on two opposite walls of the primaryenclosure, the openings on each wall must be at least 30 percent of thetotal surface areas of the wall and be located above the midline of theenclosure; or(ii) If ventilation openings are located on all four walls of the primaryenclosure, the openings of every wall must be at least 20 percent of thetotal surface area of the wall and be located above the midline of theenclosure.(2) Unless the primary enclosure is permanently affixed to the conveyance,projecting rims or similar devices must be located on the exterior of eachenclosure wall having a ventilation opening, in order to prevent obstructionof the openings. The projecting rims or similar devices must be large enoughto provide a minimum air circulation space of 0.75 inches (1.9 centimeters)between the primary enclosure and anything the enclosure is placed against.(3) If a primary enclosure is permanently affixed to the primary conveyanceso that there is only a front ventilation opening for the enclosure, theprimary enclosure must be affixed to the primary conveyance in such a waythat the front ventilation opening cannot be blocked, and the front ventilationopening must open directly to an unobstructed aisle or passageway insideof the conveyance. The ventilation opening must be at least 90 percentof the total area of the front wall of the enclosure, and must be converedwith bars, wire mesh, or smooth expanded metal having air spaces.(d) <T3>Compatibility</T3>. (1) Only one live nonhumane primate can be transportedin a primary enclosure, except as follows:(i) A mother and her nursing infant may be transported together;(ii) An established male-female pair or family group may be transportedtogether, except that a female in estrus must not be transported with amale nonhuman primate;(iii) A pair of juveniles of the same species that have not reached pubertymay be transported together.(2) Nonhuman primates of different species must not be transported in adjacentor connecting primary enclosures.(e) <T3>Space requirements. </T3>Primary enclosures used to transport nonhumanprimates must be large enough so that each animal contained in the primaryenclosure has enough space to turn around freely in a normal manner andto sit in an upright, hands down position without its head touching thetop of the enclosure. However, certain larger species may be restrictedin their movements, in accordance with professionally accepted standardsof care, when greater freedom of movement would be dangerous to the animal,its handler, or to other persons.(f) <T3>Marking and labeling</T3>. Primary enclosures, other than those thatare permanently affixed to a conveyance, must be clearly marked in Englishon the top and on one or more sides with the words ``Wild Animals'' or``Live Animals,'' ``Do Not Tip,'' and ``This Side Up,'' in letters at least1 inch (2.5 cm.) high, and with arrows or other markings to indicate thecorrect upright position of the primary enclosure. Permanently affixedprimary enclosures must be clearly marked in English with the words ``WildAnimals'' or ``Live Animals,'' in the same manner.(g) <T3>Accompanying documents and records. </T3>Shipping documents that mustaccompany shipments of nonhuman primates may be held by the operator ofthe primary conveyance, for surface transportation only, or must be securelyattached in a readily accessible manner to the outside of any primary enclosurethat is part of the shipment, in a manner that allows them to be detachedfor examination and securely reattached, such as in a pocket or sleeve.Instructions for food and water and for administration of drugs, medication,and other special care must be attached to each primary enclosure in amanner that makes them easy to notice, to detach for examination, and toreattach securely.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 3.89</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Primary conveyances (motor vehicle, rail, air, and marine).</ITAG>(a) The animal cargo space of primary conveyances used to transport nonhumanprimates must be designed, constructed, and maintained in a manner thatat all times protects the health and well-being of the animals transportedin it, ensures their safety and comfort, and prevents the entry of engineexhaust from the primary conveyance during transportation.(b) The animal cargo space must have a supply of air that is sufficientfor the normal breathing of all the animals being transported in it.(c) Each primary enclosure containing nonhuman primates must be positionedin the animal cargo space in a manner that provides protection from theelements and that allow each nonhuman primate enough air for normal breathing.(d) During air transportation, the ambient temperature inside a primaryconveyance used to transport nonhuman primates must be maintained at alevel that ensures the heath and well-being of the species housed, in accordancewith generally accepted professional and husbandry practices, at all timesa nonhuman primate is present. (e) During surface transportation, the ambient temperature inside a primaryconveyance used to transport nonhuman primates must be maintained between45 anddegrees;F (7.2 anddegrees;C) and 85 anddegrees;F (30 anddegrees;C) at alltimes a nonhuman primate is present. (f) A primary enclosure containing a nonhuman primate must be placed farenough away from animals that are predators or natural enemies of nonhumanprimates, whether the other animals are in primary enclosures or not, sothat the nonhuman primate cannot touch the other animals, see them or smellthem. (g) Primary enclosures must be positioned in the primary conveyance ina manner that allows the nonhuman primates to be quickly and easily removedfrom the primary conveyance in an emergency. (h) The interior of the animal cargo space must be kept clean. (i) Nonhuman primates must not be transported with any material, substance(e.g., dry ice), or device in a manner that may reasonably be expectedto harm the nonhuman primates or cause inhumane conditions, unless properprecaution is taken to prevent the injury or inhumane conditions. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;3.90 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Food and water requirements. </ITAG>(a) Each nonhuman primate that is 1 year of age or more must be offeredfood \5\<NOTE/> at least once every 24 hours. Each nonhuman primate thatis less than 1 year of age must be offered food at least once every 12hours. These time periods apply to dealers, exhibitors, and research facilities,including federal research facilities, who transport nonhuman primatesin their own primary conveyances, starting from the time the nonhuman primatewas last offered food before transportation was begun. These time periodsapply to carriers and intermediate handlers starting from the date andtime stated on the certification provided under andSection;3.87(d). Eachnonhuman primate must be offered food within 12 hours before being transportedin commerce. Consignors who are subject to the Animal Welfare regulationsmust certify that each nonhuman primate was offered food within the 12hours preceding delivery of the nonhuman primate to a carrier or intermediatehandler for transportation in commerce, and must certify the date and timeof the feeding, in accordance with andSection;3.87(d). <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\5\ Proper food for purposes of this section is describedin andSection;3.82 of this subpart, with the necessities and circumstancesof the mode of travel taken into account. (b) Each nonhuman primate must be offered potable water during the 4 hoursimmediately preceding the beginning of its transportation in commerce,and every 12 hours thereafter. This time period applies to dealers, exhibitors,and research facilities, including federal research facilities, who transportnonhuman primates in their own primary conveyances, starting from the timethe nonhuman primate was last offered potable water before being transportedin commerce. This time period applies to carriers and intermediate handlersstarting from the date and time stated on the certification provided underandSection;3.87(d). Consignors who are subject to the Animal Welfare regulationsmust certify that each nonhuman primate was offered potable water within4 hours before being transported in commerce, and must certify the dateand time the water was offered, in accordance with andSection;3.87(d). (c) Any dealer, exhibitor, or research facility, including a federal researchfacility, offering a nonhuman primate to a carrier or intermediate handlerfor transportation in commerce must securely attach to the outside of theprimary enclosure used for transporting the nonhuman primate, written instructionsfor the in-transit food and water requirements of the nonhuman primate(s)contained in the enclosure. The instructions must be attached in a mannerthat makes them easily noticed, detached and returned to the enclosure.(d) Food and water receptacles must be securely attached inside the primaryenclosure and placed so that the receptacles can be filled from outsideof the enclosure without opening the door. Food and water receptacles mustbe designed, constructed, and installed so that a nonhuman primate cannotleave the primary enclosure through the food or water opening. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;3.91 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Care in transit. </ITAG><T3>(a) Surface transportation (ground and water). </T3>Any person subjectto the Animal Welfare regulations transporting nonhuman primates in commercemust ensure that the operator of the conveyance or a person accompanyingthe operator of the conveyance observes the nonhuman primates as oftenas circumstances allow, but not less than once every 4 hours, to make surethat they have sufficient air for normal breathing, that the ambient temperatureis within the limits provided in andSection;3.89(d), and that all other applicablestandards of this subpart are being complied with. The regulated persontransporting the nonhuman primates must ensure that the operator or theperson accompanying the operator determines whether any of the nonhumanprimates are in obvious physical distress, and obtains any veterinary careneeded for the nonhuman primates at the closest available veterinary facility.(b) <T3>Air transportation. </T3>During air transportation of nonhuman primates,it is the responsibility of the carrier to observe the nonhuman primatesas frequently as circumstances allow, but not less than once every 4 hoursif the animal cargo area is accessible during flight. If the animal cargoarea is not accessible during flight, the carrier must observe the nonhumanprimates whenever they are loaded and unloaded and whenever the animalcargo space is otherwise accessible to make sure that the nonhuman primateshave sufficient air for normal breathing, that the ambient temperatureis within the limits provided in andSection; 3.89(d), and that all otherapplicable standards of this subpart are being complied with. The carriermust determine whether any of the nonhuman primates is in obvious physicaldistress, and arrange for any needed veterinary care for the nonhuman primatesas soon as possible. (c) If a nonhuman primate is obviously ill, injured, or in physical distress,it must not be transported in commerce, except to receive veterinary carefor the condition. (d) During transportation in commerce, a nonhuman primate must not be removedfrom its primary enclosure unless it is placed in another primary enclosureor a facility that meets the requirements of andSection;3.80 or andSection;3.88of this subpart. Only persons who are experienced and authorized by theshipper, or authorized by the consignor or the consignee upon delivery,if the animal is consigned for transportation, may remove nonhuman primatesfrom their primary enclosure during transportation in commerce. (e) The transportation regulations contained in this subpart must be compliedwith until the nonhuman primate reaches its final destination, or untilthe consignee takes physical delivery of the animal if the animal is consignedfor transportation. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;3.92 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Terminal facilities.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Placement. </T3>Any persons subject to the Animal Welfare regulationsmust not commingle shipments of nonhuman primates with inanimate cargoor with other animals in animal holding areas of terminal facilities. Nonhumanprimates must not be placed near any other animals, including other speciesof nonhuman primates, and must not be able to touch or see any other animals,including other species of nonhuman primates.(b) <T3>Cleaning, sanitization, and pest control. </T3>All animal holding areasof terminal facilities must be cleaned and sanitized in a manner prescribedin andSection; 3.84(b)(3) of this subpart, as often as necessary to preventan accumulation of debris or excreta and to minimize vermin infestationand disease hazards. Terminal facilities must follow an effective programin all animal holding areas for the control of insects, ectoparasites,and birds and mammals that are pests of nonhuman primates.(c) <T3>Ventilation. </T3>Air, preferably fresh air, must be provided in anyanimal holding area in a terminal facility containing nonhuman primatesby means of windows, doors, vents, or air conditioning. The air must becirculated by fans, blowers, or air conditioning so as to minimize drafts,odors, and moisture condensation. Auxiliary ventilation, such as exhaustfans, vents, fans, blowers, or air conditioning, must be used in any animalholding area containing nonhuman primates when the ambient temperatureis 75 anddegrees;F (23.9 anddegrees;C) or higher.(d) <T3>Temperature. </T3>The ambient temperature in an animal holding areacontaining nonhuman primates must not fall below 45 anddegrees;F (7.2 anddegrees;C)or rise above 85 anddegrees;F (29.5 anddegrees;C) at any time nonhuman primatesare present. The ambient temperature must not rise above 75 anddegrees;F(23.9 anddegrees;C) for more than four consecutive hours at any time nonhumanprimates are present. The ambient temperature must be measured in the animalholding area by the carrier, intermediate handler, or a person transportingnonhuman primates who is subject to the Animal Welfare regulations, outside any primary enclosure containing a nonhuman primate at a point notmore than 3 feet (0.91 m.) away from an outside wall of the primary enclosure,on a level that is even with the enclosure and approximately midway upthe side of the enclosure.(e) <T3>Shelter. </T3>Any person subject to the Animal Welfare regulationsholding a nonhuman primate in an animal holding area of a terminal facilitymust provide the following:(1) Shelter from sunlight and extreme heat. Shade must be provided thatis sufficient to protect the nonhuman primate from the direct rays of thesun.(2) Shelter from rain or snow. Sufficient protection must be provided toallow nonhuman primates to remain dry during rain, snow, and other precipitation.(f) <T3>Duration. </T3>The length of time any person subject to the AnimalWelfare regulations can hold a nonhuman primate in an animal holding areaof a terminal facility upon arrival is the same as that provided in andSection;3.87(g).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 3.93 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Handling.</ITAG>(a) Any person subject to the Animal Welfare regulations who moves (includingloading and unloading) nonhuman primates within, to, or from the animalholding area of a terminal facility or a primary conveyance must do soas quickly and efficiently as possible, and must provide the followingduring movement of the nonhuman primate:(1) <T3>Shelter from sunlight and extreme heat. </T3>Sufficient shade mustbe provided to protect the nonhuman primates from the direct rays of thesun. A nonhuman primate must not be exposed to an ambient temperature above85 anddegrees;F (29.5 anddegrees;C) for a period of more than 45 minutes whilebeing moved to or from a primary conveyance or a terminal facility. Thetemperature must be measured in the manner provided in andSection; 3.92(d)of this subpart.(2) <T3>Shelter from rain or snow. </T3>Suffcient protection must be providedto allow nonhuman primates to remain dry during rain, snow, and other precipitation.(3) <T3>Shelter from cold temperatures. </T3>Transporting devices on whichnonhuman primates are placed to move them must be covered to protect theanimals when the outdoor temperature falls below 45 anddegrees;F (7.2 anddegrees;C).A nonhuman primate must not be exposed to an ambient air temperature below45 anddegrees;F (7.2 anddegrees;C) for a period of more than 45 minutes, unlessit is accompanied by a certificate of acclimation to lower temperaturesas provided in andSection; 3.87(f). The temperature must be measured in themanner provided in andSection; 3.92(d) of this subpart.(b) Any person handling a primary enclosure containing a nonhuman primatemust use care and must avoid causing physical or emotional distress tothe nonhuman primate.(1) A primary enclosure containing a nonhuman primate must not be placedon unattended conveyor belts or on elevated conveyor belts, such as baggageclaim conveyor belts and inclined conveyor ramps that lead to baggage claimareas, at any time; except that a primary enclosure may be placed on inclinedconveyor ramps used to load and unload aircraft if an attendant is presentat each end of the conveyor belt.(2) A primary enclosure containing a nonhuman primate must not be tossed,dropped, or needlessly tilted, and must not be stacked in a manner thatmay reasonably be expected to result in its falling. They must be handledand positioned in the manner that written instructions and arrows on theoutside of the primary enclosure indicate.(c) The regulations in this section apply to movement of a nonhuman primatefrom primary conveyance to primary conveyance, within a primary conveyanceor terminal facility, and to or from a terminal facility or a primary conveyance.<ITAG tagnum="21">Done in Washington, DC, this 7th day of March 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">James W. Glosser,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Administrator, Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-5613 Filed 3-9-89; 2:09 pm]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 3410-34-M </ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>